Begin Reading
Table of Contents
About the Author
Copyright Page
To L
Preface
My name is Edward Joseph Snowden. I used to work for the government, but now I work for the pub
lic. It took me nearly three decades to recognize that there was a distinction, and when I did,
 it got me into a bit of trouble at the office. As a result, I now spend my time trying to prot
ect the public from the person I used to be—a spy for the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) an
d National Security Agency (NSA), just another young technologist out to build what I was sure 
would be a better world.
My career in the American Intelligence Community (IC) only lasted a short seven years, which I
’m surprised to realize is just one year longer than the time I’ve spent since in exile in a 
country that wasn’t my choice. During that seven-year stint, however, I participated in the mo
st significant change in the history of American espionage—the change from the targeted survei
llance of individuals to the mass surveillance of entire populations. I helped make it technolo
gically feasible for a single government to collect all the world’s digital communications, st
ore them for ages, and search through them at will.
After 9/11, the IC was racked with guilt for failing to protect America, for letting the most d
evastating and destructive attack on the country since Pearl Harbor occur on its watch. In resp
onse, its leaders sought to build a system that would prevent them from being caught off guard 
ever again. At its foundation was to be technology, a foreign thing to their army of political 
science majors and masters of business administration. The doors to the most secretive intellig
ence agencies were flung wide open to young technologists like myself. And so the geek inherite
d the earth.
If I knew anything back then, I knew computers, so I rose quickly. At twenty-two, I got my firs
t top secret clearance from the NSA, for a position at the very bottom of the org chart. Less t
han a year later, I was at the CIA, as a systems engineer with sprawling access to some of the 
most sensitive networks on the planet. The only adult supervision was a guy who spent his shift
s reading paperbacks by Robert Ludlum and Tom Clancy. The agencies were breaking all of their o
wn rules in their quest to hire technical talent. They’d normally never hire anybody without a
 bachelor’s degree, or later at least an associate’s, neither of which I had. By all rights, 
I should never have even been let into the building.
From 2007 to 2009, I was stationed at the US Embassy in Geneva as one of the rare technologists
 deployed under diplomatic cover, tasked with bringing the CIA into the future by bringing its 
European stations online, digitizing and automating the network by which the US government spie
d. My generation did more than reengineer the work of intelligence; we entirely redefined what 
intelligence was. For us, it was not about clandestine meetings or dead drops, but about data.
By age twenty-six, I was a nominal employee of Dell, but once again working for the NSA. Contra
cting had become my cover, as it was for nearly all the tech-inclined spies of my cohort. I was
 sent to Japan, where I helped to design what amounted to the agency’s global backup—a massiv
e covert network that ensured that even if the NSA’s headquarters was reduced to ash in a nucl
ear blast, no data would ever be lost. At the time, I didn’t realize that engineering a system
 that would keep a permanent record of everyone’s life was a tragic mistake.
I came back to the States at age twenty-eight, and received a stratospheric promotion to the te
chnical liaison team handling Dell’s relationship with the CIA. My job was to sit down with th
e heads of the technical divisions of the CIA in order to design and sell the solution to any p
roblem that they could imagine. My team helped the agency build a new type of computing archite
cture—a “cloud,” the first technology that enabled every agent, no matter where they were ph
ysically located, to access and search any data they needed, no matter the distance.
In sum, a job managing and connecting the flow of intelligence gave way to a job figuring out h
ow to store it forever, which in turn gave way to a job making sure it was universally availabl
e and searchable. These projects came into focus for me in Hawaii, where I moved to take a new 
contract with the NSA at the age of twenty-nine. Up until then, I’d been laboring under the do
ctrine of Need to Know, unable to understand the cumulative purpose behind my specialized, comp
artmentalized tasks. It was only in paradise that I was finally in a position to see how all my
 work fit together, meshing like the gears of a giant machine to form a system of global mass s
urveillance.
Deep in a tunnel under a pineapple field—a subterranean Pearl Harbor–era former airplane fact
ory—I sat at a terminal from which I had practically unlimited access to the communications of
 nearly every man, woman, and child on earth who’d ever dialed a phone or touched a computer. 
Among those people were about 320 million of my fellow American citizens, who in the regular co
nduct of their everyday lives were being surveilled in gross contravention of not just the Cons
titution of the United States, but the basic values of any free society.
The reason you’re reading this book is that I did a dangerous thing for a man in my position: 
I decided to tell the truth. I collected internal IC documents that gave evidence of the US gov
ernment’s lawbreaking and turned them over to journalists, who vetted and published them to a 
scandalized world.
This book is about what led up to that decision, the moral and ethical principles that informed
 it, and how they came to be—which means that it’s also about my life.
What makes a life? More than what we say; more, even, than what we do. A life is also what we l
ove, and what we believe in. For me, what I love and believe in the most is connection, human c
onnection, and the technologies by which that is achieved. Those technologies include books, of
 course. But for my generation, connection has largely meant the Internet.
Before you recoil, knowing well the toxic madness that infests that hive in our time, understan
d that for me, when I came to know it, the Internet was a very different thing. It was a friend
, and a parent. It was a community without border or limit, one voice and millions, a common fr
ontier that had been settled but not exploited by diverse tribes living amicably enough side by
 side, each member of which was free to choose their own name and history and customs. Everyone
 wore masks, and yet this culture of anonymity-through-polyonymy produced more truth than false
hood, because it was creative and cooperative rather than commercial and competitive. Certainly
, there was conflict, but it was outweighed by goodwill and good feelings—the true pioneering 
spirit.
You will understand, then, when I say that the Internet of today is unrecognizable. It’s worth
 noting that this change has been a conscious choice, the result of a systematic effort on the 
part of a privileged few. The early rush to turn commerce into e-commerce quickly led to a bubb
le, and then, just after the turn of the millennium, to a collapse. After that, companies reali
zed that people who went online were far less interested in spending than in sharing, and that 
the human connection the Internet made possible could be monetized. If most of what people want
ed to do online was to be able to tell their family, friends, and strangers what they were up t
o, and to be told what their family, friends, and strangers were up to in return, then all comp
anies had to do was figure out how to put themselves in the middle of those social exchanges an
d turn them into profit.
This was the beginning of surveillance capitalism, and the end of the Internet as I knew it.
Now, it was the creative Web that collapsed, as countless beautiful, difficult, individualistic
 websites were shuttered. The promise of convenience led people to exchange their personal site
s—which demanded constant and laborious upkeep—for a Facebook page and a Gmail account. The a
ppearance of ownership was easy to mistake for the reality of it. Few of us understood it at th
e time, but none of the things that we’d go on to share would belong to us anymore. The succes
sors to the e-commerce companies that had failed because they couldn’t find anything we were i
nterested in buying now had a new product to sell.
That new product was Us.
Our attention, our activities, our locations, our desires—everything about us that we revealed
, knowingly or not, was being surveilled and sold in secret, so as to delay the inevitable feel
ing of violation that is, for most of us, coming only now. And this surveillance would go on to
 be actively encouraged, and even funded by an army of governments greedy for the vast volume o
f intelligence they would gain. Aside from log-ins and financial transactions, hardly any onlin
e communications were encrypted in the early twenty-aughts, which meant that in many cases gove
rnments didn’t even need to bother approaching the companies in order to know what their custo
mers were doing. They could just spy on the world without telling a soul.
The American government, in total disregard of its founding charter, fell victim to precisely t
his temptation, and once it had tasted the fruit of this poisonous tree it became gripped by an
 unrelenting fever. In secret, it assumed the power of mass surveillance, an authority that by 
definition afflicts the innocent far more than the guilty.
It was only when I came to a fuller understanding of this surveillance and its harms that I bec
ame haunted by the awareness that we the public—the public of not just one country but of all 
the world—had never been granted a vote or even a chance to voice our opinion in this process.
 The system of near-universal surveillance had been set up not just without our consent, but in
 a way that deliberately hid every aspect of its programs from our knowledge. At every step, th
e changing procedures and their consequences were kept from everyone, including most lawmakers.
 To whom could I turn? Who could I talk to? Even to whisper the truth, even to a lawyer or a ju
dge or to Congress, had been made so severe a felony that just a basic outlining of the broades
t facts would invite a lifetime sentence in a federal cell.
I was lost, and fell into a dark mood while I struggled with my conscience. I love my country, 
and I believe in public service—my whole family, my whole family line for centuries, is filled
 with men and women who have spent their lives serving this country and its citizens. I myself 
had sworn an oath of service not to an agency, nor even a government, but to the public, in sup
port and defense of the Constitution, whose guarantee of civil liberties had been so flagrantly
 violated. Now I was more than part of that violation: I was party to it. All of that work, all
 of those years—who was I working for? How was I to balance my contract of secrecy with the ag
encies that employed me and the oath I’d sworn to my country’s founding principles? To whom, 
or what, did I owe the greater allegiance? At what point was I morally obliged to break the law
?
Reflecting on those principles brought me my answers. I realized that coming forward and disclo
sing to journalists the extent of my country’s abuses wouldn’t be advocating for anything rad
ical, like the destruction of the government, or even of the IC. It would be a return to the pu
rsuit of the government’s, and the IC’s, own stated ideals.
The freedom of a country can only be measured by its respect for the rights of its citizens, an
d it’s my conviction that these rights are in fact limitations of state power that define exac
tly where and when a government may not infringe into that domain of personal or individual fre
edoms that during the American Revolution was called “liberty” and during the Internet Revolu
tion is called “privacy.”
It’s been six years since I came forward because I witnessed a decline in the commitment of so
-called advanced governments throughout the world to protecting this privacy, which I regard—a
nd the United Nations regards—as a fundamental human right. In the span of those years, howeve
r, this decline has only continued as democracies regress into authoritarian populism. Nowhere 
has this regression been more apparent than in the relationship of governments to the press.
The attempts by elected officials to delegitimize journalism have been aided and abetted by a f
ull-on assault on the principle of truth. What is real is being purposefully conflated with wha
t is fake, through technologies that are capable of scaling that conflation into unprecedented 
global confusion.
I know this process intimately enough, because the creation of irreality has always been the In
telligence Community’s darkest art. The same agencies that, over the span of my career alone, 
had manipulated intelligence to create a pretext for war—and used illegal policies and a shado
w judiciary to permit kidnapping as “extraordinary rendition,” torture as “enhanced interrog
ation,” and mass surveillance as “bulk collection”—didn’t hesitate for a moment to call me
 a Chinese double agent, a Russian triple agent, and worse: “a millennial.”
They were able to say so much, and so freely, in large part because I refused to defend myself.
 From the moment I came forward to the present, I was resolute about never revealing any detail
s of my personal life that might cause further distress to my family and friends, who were alre
ady suffering enough for my principles.
It was out of a concern for increasing that suffering that I hesitated to write this book. Ulti
mately, the decision to come forward with evidence of government wrongdoing was easier for me t
o make than the decision, here, to give an account of my life. The abuses I witnessed demanded 
action, but no one writes a memoir because they’re unable to resist the dictates of their cons
cience. This is why I have tried to seek the permission of every family member, friend, and col
league who is named, or otherwise publicly identifiable, in these pages.
Just as I refuse to presume to be the sole arbiter of another’s privacy, I never thought that 
I alone should be able to choose which of my country’s secrets should be made known to the pub
lic and which should not. That is why I disclosed the government’s documents only to journalis
ts. In fact, the number of documents that I disclosed directly to the public is zero.
I believe, just as those journalists believe, that a government may keep some information conce
aled. Even the most transparent democracy in the world may be allowed to classify, for example,
 the identity of its undercover agents and the movements of its troops in the field. This book 
includes no such secrets.
To give an account of my life while protecting the privacy of my loved ones and not exposing le
gitimate government secrets is no simple task, but it is my task. Between those two responsibil
ities—that is where to find me.
PART ONE
1
Looking Through the Window
The first thing I ever hacked was bedtime.
It felt unfair, being forced by my parents to go to sleep—before they went to sleep, before my
 sister went to sleep, when I wasn’t even tired. Life’s first little injustice.
Many of the first 2,000 or so nights of my life ended in civil disobedience: crying, begging, b
argaining, until—on night 2,193, the night I turned six years old—I discovered direct action.
 The authorities weren’t interested in calls for reform, and I wasn’t born yesterday. I had j
ust had one of the best days of my young life, complete with friends, a party, and even gifts, 
and I wasn’t about to let it end just because everyone else had to go home. So I went about co
vertly resetting all the clocks in the house by several hours. The microwave’s clock was easie
r than the stove’s to roll back, if only because it was easier to reach.
When the authorities—in their unlimited ignorance—failed to notice, I was mad with power, gal
loping laps around the living room. I, the master of time, would never again be sent to bed. I 
was free. And so it was that I fell asleep on the floor, having finally seen the sunset on June
 21, the summer solstice, the longest day of the year. When I awoke, the clocks in the house on
ce again matched my father’s watch.
* * *
IF ANYBODY BOTHERED to set a watch today, how would they know what to set it to? If you’re lik
e most people these days, you’d set it to the time on your smartphone. But if you look at your
 phone, and I mean really look at it, burrowing deep through its menus into its settings, you’
ll eventually see that the phone’s time is “automatically set.” Every so often, your phone q
uietly—silently—asks your service provider’s network, “Hey, do you have the time?” That ne
twork, in turn, asks a bigger network, which asks an even bigger network, and so on through a g
reat succession of towers and wires until the request reaches one of the true masters of time, 
a Network Time Server run by or referenced against the atomic clocks kept at places like the Na
tional Institute of Standards and Technology in the United States, the Federal Institute of Met
eorology and Climatology in Switzerland, and the National Institute of Information and Communic
ations Technology in Japan. That long invisible journey, accomplished in a fraction of a second
, is why you don’t see a blinking 12:00 on your phone’s screen every time you power it up aga
in after its battery runs out.
I was born in 1983, at the end of the world in which people set the time for themselves. That w
as the year that the US Department of Defense split its internal system of interconnected compu
ters in half, creating one network for the use of the defense establishment, called MILNET, and
 another network for the public, called the Internet. Before the year was out, new rules define
d the boundaries of this virtual space, giving rise to the Domain Name System that we still use
 today—the.govs, .mils,.edus, and, of course,.coms—and the country codes assigned to the rest
 of the world:.uk, .de, .fr, .cn, .ru, and so on. Already, my country (and so I) had an advanta
ge, an edge. And yet it would be another six years before the World Wide Web was invented, and 
about nine years before my family got a computer with a modem that could connect to it.
Of course, the Internet is not a single entity, although we tend to refer to it as if it were. 
The technical reality is that there are new networks born every day on the global cluster of in
terconnected communications networks that you—and about three billion other people, or roughly
 42 percent of the world’s population—use regularly. Still, I’m going to use the term in its
 broadest sense, to mean the universal network of networks connecting the majority of the world
’s computers to one another via a set of shared protocols.
Some of you may worry that you don’t know a protocol from a hole in the wall, but all of us ha
ve made use of many. Think of protocols as languages for machines, the common rules they follow
 to be understood by one another. If you’re around my age, you might remember having to type t
he “http” at the beginning of a website’s address into the address bar of your Web browser. 
This refers to the Hypertext Transfer Protocol, the language you use to access the World Wide W
eb, that massive collection of mostly text-based but also audio- and video-capable sites like G
oogle and YouTube and Facebook. Every time you check your email, you use a language like IMAP (
Internet Message Access Protocol), SMTP (Simple Mail Transfer Protocol), or POP3 (Post Office P
rotocol). File transfers pass through the Internet using FTP (File Transfer Protocol). And as f
or the time-setting procedure on your phone that I mentioned, those updates get fetched through
 NTP (Network Time Protocol).
All these protocols are known as application protocols, and comprise just one family of protoco
ls among the myriad online. For example, in order for the data in any of these application prot
ocols to cross the Internet and be delivered to your desktop, or laptop, or phone, it first has
 to be packaged up inside a dedicated transport protocol—think of how the regular snail-mail p
ostal service prefers you to send your letters and parcels in their standard-size envelopes and
 boxes. TCP (Transmission Control Protocol) is used to route, among other applications, Web pag
es and email. UDP (User Datagram Protocol) is used to route more time-sensitive, real-time appl
ications, such as Internet telephony and live broadcasts.
Any recounting of the multilayered workings of what in my childhood was called cyberspace, the 
Net, the Infobahn, and the Information Superhighway is bound to be incomplete, but the takeaway
 is this: these protocols have given us the means to digitize and put online damn near everythi
ng in the world that we don’t eat, drink, wear, or dwell in. The Internet has become almost as
 integral to our lives as the air through which so many of its communications travel. And, as w
e’ve all been reminded—every time our social media feeds alert us to a post that tags us in a
 compromising light—to digitize something is to record it, in a format that will last forever.
Here’s what strikes me when I think back to my childhood, particularly those first nine Intern
et-less years: I can’t account for everything that happened back then, because I have only my 
memory to rely on. The data just doesn’t exist. When I was a child, “the unforgettable experi
ence” was not yet a threateningly literal technological description, but a passionate metaphor
ical prescription of significance: my first words, my first steps, my first lost tooth, my firs
t time riding a bicycle.
My generation was the last in American and perhaps even in world history for which this is true
—the last undigitized generation, whose childhoods aren’t up on the cloud but are mostly trap
ped in analog formats like handwritten diaries and Polaroids and VHS cassettes, tangible and im
perfect artifacts that degrade with age and can be lost irretrievably. My schoolwork was done o
n paper with pencils and erasers, not on networked tablets that logged my keystrokes. My growth
 spurts weren’t tracked by smart-home technologies, but notched with a knife into the wood of 
the door frame of the house in which I grew up.
* * *
WE LIVED IN a grand old redbrick house on a little patch of lawn shaded by dogwood trees and st
rewn in summer with white magnolia flowers that served as cover for the plastic army men I used
 to crawl around with. The house had an atypical layout: its main entrance was on the second fl
oor, accessed by a massive brick staircase. This floor was the primary living space, with the k
itchen, dining room, and bedrooms.
Above this main floor was a dusty, cobwebbed, and forbidden attic given over to storage, haunte
d by what my mother promised me were squirrels, but what my father insisted were vampire werewo
lves that would devour any child foolish enough to venture up there. Below the main floor was a
 more or less finished basement—a rarity in North Carolina, especially so close to the coast. 
Basements tend to flood, and ours, certainly, was perennially damp, despite the constant workin
gs of the dehumidifier and sump pump.
At the time my family moved in, the back of the main floor was extended and divided up into a l
aundry room, a bathroom, my bedroom, and a den outfitted with a TV and a couch. From my bedroom
, I had a view of the den through the window set into what had originally been the exterior wal
l of the house. This window, which once looked outside, now looked inside.
For nearly all the years that my family spent in that house in Elizabeth City, this bedroom was
 mine, and its window was, too. Though the window had a curtain, it didn’t provide much, if an
y, privacy. From as far back as I can remember, my favorite activity was to tug the curtain asi
de and peek through the window into the den. Which is to say, from as far back as I can remembe
r, my favorite activity was spying.
I spied on my older sister, Jessica, who was allowed to stay up later than I was and watch the 
cartoons that I was still too young for. I spied on my mother, Wendy, who’d sit on the couch t
o fold the laundry while watching the nightly news. But the person I spied on the most was my f
ather, Lon—or, as he was called in the Southern style, Lonnie—who’d commandeer the den into 
the wee hours.
My father was in the Coast Guard, though at the time I didn’t have the slightest clue what tha
t meant. I knew that sometimes he wore a uniform and sometimes he didn’t. He left home early a
nd came home late, often with new gadgets—a Texas Instruments TI-30 scientific calculator, a C
asio stopwatch on a lanyard, a single speaker for a home stereo system—some of which he’d sho
w me, and some of which he’d hide. You can imagine which I was more interested in.
The gadget I was most interested in arrived one night, just after bedtime. I was in bed and abo
ut to drift off, when I heard my father’s footsteps coming down the hall. I stood up on my bed
, tugged aside the curtain, and watched. He was holding a mysterious box, close in size to a sh
oe box, and he removed from it a beige object that looked like a cinder block, from which long 
black cables snaked like the tentacles of some deep-sea monster out of one of my nightmares.
Working slowly and methodically—which was partially his disciplined, engineer’s way of doing 
everything, and partially an attempt to stay quiet—my father untangled the cables and stretche
d one across the shag carpet from the back of the box to the back of the TV. Then he plugged th
e other cable into a wall outlet behind the couch.
Suddenly the TV lit up, and with it my father’s face lit up, too. Normally he would just spend
 his evenings sitting on the couch, cracking Sun Drop sodas and watching the people on TV run a
round a field, but this was different. It took me only a moment to come to the most amazing rea
lization of my whole entire, though admittedly short, life: my father was controlling what was 
happening on TV.
I had come face-to-face with a Commodore 64—one of the first home computer systems on the mark
et.
I had no idea what a computer was, of course, let alone whether what my father was doing on it 
was playing a game or working. Although he was smiling and seemed to be having fun, he was also
 applying himself to what was happening on-screen with the same intensity with which he applied
 himself to every mechanical task around the house. I knew only one thing: whatever he was doin
g, I wanted to do it, too.
After that, whenever my father came into the den to break out the beige brick, I’d stand up on
 my bed, tug away the curtain, and spy on his adventures. One night the screen showed a falling
 ball and a bar at the bottom; my father had to move the bar horizontally to hit the ball, boun
ce it up, and knock down a wall of multicolored bricks (Arkanoid). On another night, he sat bef
ore a screen of multicolored bricks in different shapes; they were always falling, and as they 
fell he moved and rotated them to assemble them into perfect rows, which immediately vanished (
Tetris). I was truly confused, however, about what my father was doing—recreation or part of h
is job—when I peeked through the window one night and saw him flying.
My father—who’d always delighted me by pointing out the real helicopters from the Coast Guard
 Air Base when they flew by the house—was piloting his own helicopter right here, right in fro
nt of me, in our den. He took off from a little base, complete with a tiny waving American flag
, into a black night sky full of twinkling stars, and then immediately crashed to the ground. H
e gave a little cry that masked my own, but just when I thought the fun was over, he was right 
back at the little base again with the tiny flag, taking off one more time.
The game was called Choplifter! and that exclamation point wasn’t just part of its name, it wa
s also part of the experience of playing it. Choplifter! was thrilling. Again and again I watch
ed these sorties fly out of our den and over a flat desert moon, shooting at, and being shot at
 by, enemy jets and enemy tanks. The helicopter kept landing and lifting off, as my father trie
d to rescue a flashing crowd of people and ferry them to safety. That was my earliest sense of 
my father: he was a hero.
The cheer that came from the couch the first time that the diminutive helicopter touched down i
ntact with a full load of miniature people was just a little too loud. My father’s head snappe
d to the window to check whether he’d disturbed me, and he caught me dead in the eyes.
I leaped into bed, pulled up the blanket, and lay perfectly still as my father’s heavy steps a
pproached my room.
He tapped on the window. “It’s past your bedtime, buddy. Are you still up?”
I held my breath. Suddenly, he opened the window, reached into my bedroom, picked me up—blanke
t and all—and pulled me through into the den. It all happened so quickly, my feet never even t
ouched the carpet.
Before I knew it, I was sitting on my father’s lap as his copilot. I was too young and too exc
ited to realize that the joystick he’d given me wasn’t plugged in. All that mattered was that
 I was flying alongside my father.
2
The Invisible Wall
Elizabeth City is a quaint, midsize port town with a relatively intact historic core. Like most
 other early American settlements, it grew around the water, in this case around the banks of t
he Pasquotank River, whose name is an English corruption of an Algonquin word meaning “where t
he current forks.” The river flows down from Chesapeake Bay, through the swamps of the Virgini
a–North Carolina border, and empties into Albemarle Sound alongside the Chowan, the Perquimans
, and other rivers. Whenever I consider what other directions my life might have taken, I think
 of that watershed: no matter the particular course the water travels from its source, it still
 ultimately arrives at the same destination.
My family has always been connected to the sea, my mother’s side in particular. Her heritage i
s straight Pilgrim—her first ancestor on these shores was John Alden, the Mayflower’s cooper,
 or barrelmaker. He became the husband of a fellow passenger named Priscilla Mullins, who had t
he dubious distinction of being the only single woman of marriageable age onboard, and so the o
nly single woman of marriageable age in the whole first generation of the Plymouth Colony.
John and Priscilla’s Thanksgiving-time coupling almost never happened, however, due to the med
dling of the commander of the Plymouth Colony, Myles Standish. His love for Priscilla, and Pris
cilla’s rejection of him and eventual marriage to John, became the basis of a literary work th
at was referenced throughout my youth, The Courtship of Miles Standish by Henry Wadsworth Longf
ellow (himself an Alden-Mullins descendant):
Nothing was heard in the room but the hurrying pen of the stripling,
Busily writing epistles important, to go by the Mayflower,
Ready to sail on the morrow, or next day at latest, God willing!
Homeward bound with the tidings of all that terrible winter,
Letters written by Alden, and full of the name of Priscilla,
Full of the name and the fame of the Puritan maiden Priscilla!
John and Priscilla’s daughter, Elizabeth, was the first Pilgrim child born in New England. My 
mother, whose name is also Elizabeth, is her direct descendant. Because the lineage is almost e
xclusively through the women, though, the surnames changed with nearly every generation—with a
n Alden marrying a Pabodie marrying a Grinnell marrying a Stephens marrying a Jocelin. These se
afaring ancestors of mine sailed down the coast from what’s now Massachusetts to Connecticut a
nd New Jersey—plying trade routes and dodging pirates between the Colonies and the Caribbean—
until, with the Revolutionary War, the Jocelin line settled in North Carolina.
Amaziah Jocelin, also spelled Amasiah Josselyn, among other variants, was a privateer and war h
ero. As captain of the ten-gun barque The Firebrand, he was credited with the defense of Cape F
ear. Following American independence, he became the US Navy Agent, or supply officer, of the Po
rt of Wilmington, where he also established the city’s first chamber of commerce, which he cal
led, funnily enough, the Intelligence-Office. The Jocelins and their descendants—the Moores an
d Halls and Meylands and Howells and Stevens and Restons and Stokleys—who comprise the rest of
 my mother’s side fought in every war in my country’s history, from the Revolution and the Ci
vil War (in which the Carolinian relatives fought for the Confederacy against their New England
/Union cousins), to both world wars. Mine is a family that has always answered the call of duty
.
My maternal grandfather, whom I call Pop, is better known as Rear Admiral Edward J. Barrett. At
 the time of my birth he was deputy chief, aeronautical engineering division, Coast Guard Headq
uarters, Washington, DC. He’d go on to hold various engineering and operational commands, from
 Governors Island, New York City, to Key West, Florida, where he was director of the Joint Inte
ragency Task Force East (a multiagency, multinational US Coast Guard–led force dedicated to th
e interdiction of narcotics trafficking in the Caribbean). I wasn’t aware of how high up the r
anks Pop was rising, but I knew that the welcome-to-command ceremonies became more elaborate as
 time went on, with longer speeches and larger cakes. I remember the souvenir I was given by th
e artillery guard at one of them: the shell casing of a 40mm round, still warm and smelling lik
e powdered hell, which had just been fired in a salute in Pop’s honor.
Then there’s my father, Lon, who at the time of my birth was a chief petty officer at the Coas
t Guard’s Aviation Technical Training Center in Elizabeth City, working as a curriculum design
er and electronics instructor. He was often away, leaving my mother at home to raise my sister 
and me. To give us a sense of responsibility, she gave us chores; to teach us how to read, she 
labeled all our dresser drawers with their contents—SOCKS, UNDERWEAR. She would load us into o
ur Red Flyer wagon and tow us to the local library, where I immediately made for my favorite se
ction, the one that I called “Big Masheens.” Whenever my mother asked me if I was interested 
in any specific “Big Masheen,” I was unstoppable: “Dump trucks and steamrollers and forklift
s and cranes and—”
“Is that all, buddy?”
“Oh,” I’d say, “and also cement mixers and bulldozers and—”
My mother loved giving me math challenges. At Kmart or Winn-Dixie, she’d have me pick out book
s and model cars and trucks and buy them for me if I was able to mentally add together their pr
ices. Over the course of my childhood, she kept escalating the difficulty, first having me esti
mate and round to the nearest dollar, then having me figure out the precise dollar-and-cents am
ount, and then having me calculate 3 percent of that amount and add it on to the total. I was c
onfused by that last challenge—not by the arithmetic so much as by the reasoning. “Why?”
“It’s called tax,” my mother explained. “Everything we buy, we have to pay three percent to
 the government.”
“What do they do with it?”
“You like roads, buddy? You like bridges?” she said. “The government uses that money to fix 
them. They use that money to fill the library with books.”
Some time later, I was afraid that my budding math skills had failed me, when my mental totals 
didn’t match those on the cash register’s display. But once again, my mother explained. “The
y raised the sales tax. Now you have to add four percent.”
“So now the library will get even more books?” I asked.
“Let’s hope,” my mother said.
My grandmother lived a few streets over from us, across from the Carolina Feed and Seed Mill an
d a towering pecan tree. After stretching out my shirt to make a basket to fill with fallen pec
ans, I’d go up to her house and lie on the carpet beside the long low bookshelves. My usual co
mpany was an edition of Aesop’s Fables and, perhaps my favorite, Bulfinch’s Mythology. I woul
d leaf through the pages, pausing only to crack a few nuts while I absorbed accounts of flying 
horses, intricate labyrinths, and serpent-haired Gorgons who turned mortals to stone. I was in 
awe of Odysseus, and liked Zeus, Apollo, Hermes, and Athena well enough, but the deity I admire
d most had to be Hephaestus: the ugly god of fire, volcanoes, blacksmiths, and carpenters, the 
god of tinkerers. I was proud of being able to spell his Greek name, and of knowing that his Ro
man name, Vulcan, was used for the home planet of Spock from Star Trek. The fundamental premise
 of the Greco-Roman pantheon always stuck with me. Up at the summit of some mountain there was 
this gang of gods and goddesses who spent most of their infinite existence fighting with each o
ther and spying on the business of humanity. Occasionally, when they noticed something that int
rigued or disturbed them, they disguised themselves, as lambs and swans and lions, and descende
d the slopes of Olympus to investigate and meddle. It was often a disaster—someone always drow
ned, or was struck by lightning, or was turned into a tree—whenever the immortals sought to im
pose their will and interfere in mortal affairs.
Once, I picked up an illustrated version of the legends of King Arthur and his knights, and fou
nd myself reading about another legendary mountain, this one in Wales. It served as the fortres
s of a tyrannical giant named Rhitta Gawr, who refused to accept that the age of his reign had 
passed and that in the future the world would be ruled by human kings, whom he considered tiny 
and weak. Determined to keep himself in power, he descended from his peak, attacking kingdom af
ter kingdom and vanquishing their armies. Eventually he managed to defeat and kill every single
 king of Wales and Scotland. Upon killing them he shaved off their beards and wove them togethe
r into a cloak, which he wore as a gory trophy. Then he decided to challenge the strongest king
 of Britain, King Arthur, giving him a choice: Arthur could either shave off his own beard and 
surrender, or Rhitta Gawr would decapitate the king and remove the beard himself. Enraged at th
is hubris, Arthur set off for Rhitta Gawr’s mountain fortress. The king and the giant met on t
he highest peak and battled each other for days, until Arthur was gravely wounded. Just as Rhit
ta Gawr grabbed the king by the hair and prepared to cut off his head, Arthur summoned a last m
easure of strength and sank his fabled sword through the eye of the giant, who toppled over dea
d. Arthur and his knights then went about piling up a funeral cairn atop Rhitta Gawr’s corpse,
 but before they could complete the work, snow began to fall. As they departed, the giant’s bl
oodstained beard-cloak was returned to perfect whiteness.
The mountain was called Snaw Dun, which, a note explained, was Old English for “snow mound.” 
Today, Snaw Dun is called Mount Snowdon. A long-extinct volcano, it is, at approximately 3,560 
feet, the highest peak in Wales. I remember the feeling of encountering my name in this context
—it was thrilling—and the archaic spelling gave me my first palpable sense that the world was
 older than I was, even older than my parents were. The name’s association with the heroic exp
loits of Arthur and Lancelot and Gawain and Percival and Tristan and the other Knights of the R
ound Table gave me pride—until I learned that these exploits weren’t historical, but legendar
y.
Years later, with my mother’s help, I would scour the library in the hopes of separating the m
ythical from the factual. I found out that Stirling Castle in Scotland had been renamed Snowdon
 Castle, in honor of this Arthurian victory, as part of an attempt by the Scots to shore up the
ir claim to the throne of England. Reality, I learned, is nearly always messier and less flatte
ring than we might want it to be, but also in some strange way often richer than the myths.
By the time I uncovered the truth about Arthur, I had long been obsessed with a new and differe
nt type of story, or a new and different type of storytelling. On Christmas 1989, a Nintendo ap
peared in the house. I took to that two-tone-gray console so completely that my alarmed mother 
imposed a rule: I could only rent a new game when I finished reading a book. Games were expensi
ve, and, having already mastered the ones that had come with the console—a single cartridge co
mbining Super Mario Bros. and Duck Hunt—I was eager for other challenges. The only snag was th
at, at six years old, I couldn’t read as fast as I could complete a game. It was time for anot
her of my neophyte hacks. I started coming home from the library with shorter books, and books 
with lots of pictures. There were visual encyclopedias of inventions, with crazy drawings of ve
locipedes and blimps, and comic books that I realized only later were abridged, for-kids versio
ns of Jules Verne and H. G. Wells.
It was the NES—the janky but genius 8-bit Nintendo Entertainment System—that was my real educ
ation. From The Legend of Zelda, I learned that the world exists to be explored; from Mega Man,
 I learned that my enemies have much to teach; and from Duck Hunt, well, Duck Hunt taught me th
at even if someone laughs at your failures, it doesn’t mean you get to shoot them in the face.
 Ultimately, though, it was Super Mario Bros. that taught me what remains perhaps the most impo
rtant lesson of my life. I am being perfectly sincere. I am asking you to consider this serious
ly. Super Mario Bros., the 1.0 edition, is perhaps the all-time masterpiece of side-scrolling g
ames. When the game begins, Mario is standing all the way to the left of the legendary opening 
screen, and he can only go in one direction: He can only move to the right, as new scenery and 
enemies scroll in from that side. He progresses through eight worlds of four levels each, all o
f them governed by time constraints, until he reaches the evil Bowser and frees the captive Pri
ncess Toadstool. Throughout all thirty-two levels, Mario exists in front of what in gaming parl
ance is called “an invisible wall,” which doesn’t allow him to go backward. There is no turn
ing back, only going forward—for Mario and Luigi, for me, and for you. Life only scrolls in on
e direction, which is the direction of time, and no matter how far we might manage to go, that 
invisible wall will always be just behind us, cutting us off from the past, compelling us on in
to the unknown. A small kid growing up in small-town North Carolina in the 1980s has to get a s
ense of mortality from somewhere, so why not from two Italian-immigrant plumber brothers with a
n appetite for sewer mushrooms?
One day my much-used Super Mario Bros. cartridge wasn’t loading, no matter how much I blew int
o it. That’s what you had to do back then, or what we thought you had to do: you had to blow i
nto the open mouth of the cartridge to clear it of the dust, debris, and pet hair that tended t
o accumulate there. But no matter how much I blew, both into the cartridge and into the cartrid
ge slot of the console itself, the TV screen was full of blotches and waves, which were not rea
ssuring in the least.
In retrospect, the Nintendo was probably just suffering from a faulty pin connection, but given
 that my seven-year-old self didn’t even know what a pin connection was, I was frustrated and 
desperate. Worst of all, my father had only just left on a Coast Guard trip and wouldn’t be ba
ck to help me fix it for two weeks. I knew of no Mario-style time-warping tricks or pipes to di
ve into that would make those weeks pass quicker, so I resolved to fix the thing myself. If I s
ucceeded, I knew my father would be impressed. I went out to the garage to find his gray metal 
toolbox.
I decided that to figure out what was wrong with the thing, first I had to take it apart. Basic
ally, I was just copying, or trying to copy, the same motions that my father went through whene
ver he sat at the kitchen table repairing the house’s VCR or cassette deck—the two household 
machines that, to my eye, the Nintendo console most closely resembled. It took me about an hour
 to dismantle the console, with my uncoordinated and very small hands trying to twist a flat sc
rewdriver into Philips-head screws, but eventually I succeeded.
The console’s exterior was a dull, monochrome gray, but the interior was a welter of colors. I
t seemed like there was an entire rainbow of wires and glints of silver and gold jutting out of
 the green-as-grass circuitboard. I tightened a few things here, loosened a few things there—m
ore or less at random—and blew on every part. After that, I wiped them all down with a paper t
owel. Then I had to blow on the circuitboard again to remove the bits of paper towel that had g
otten stuck to what I now know were the pins.
Once I’d finished my cleaning and repairs, it was time for reassembly. Our golden Lab, Treasur
e, might have swallowed one of the tiny screws, or maybe it just got lost in the carpet or unde
r the couch. And I must not have put all the components back in the same way I’d found them, b
ecause they barely fit into the console’s shell. The shell’s lid kept popping off, so I found
 myself squeezing the components down, the way you try to shut an overstuffed suitcase. Finally
 the lid snapped into place, but only on one side. The other side bulged up, and snapping that 
side into place only caused the first side to bulge. I went back and forth like that for a whil
e, until I finally gave up and plugged the unit in again.
I pressed the Power button—and nothing. I pressed the Reset button—and nothing. Those were th
e only two buttons on the console. Before my repairs, the light next to the buttons had always 
glowed molten red, but now even that was dead. The console just sat there lopsided and useless,
 and I felt a surge of guilt and dread.
My father, when he came home from his Coast Guard trip, wasn’t going to be proud of me: he was
 going to jump on my head like a Goomba. But it wasn’t his anger I feared so much as his disap
pointment. To his peers, my father was a master electronics systems engineer who specialized in
 avionics. To me, he was a household mad scientist who’d try to fix everything himself—electr
ical outlets, dishwashers, hot-water heaters, and AC units. I’d work as his helper whenever he
’d let me, and in the process I’d come to know both the physical pleasures of manual work and
 the intellectual pleasures of basic mechanics, along with the fundamental principles of electr
onics—the differences between voltage and current, between power and resistance. Every job we 
undertook together would end either in a successful act of repair or a curse, as my father woul
d fling the unsalvageable piece of equipment across the room and into the cardboard box of thin
gs-that-can’t-be-unbroken. I never judged him for these failures—I was always too impressed b
y the fact that he had dared to hazard an attempt.
When he returned home and found out what I’d done to the NES, he wasn’t angry, much to my sur
prise. He wasn’t exactly pleased, either, but he was patient. He explained that understanding 
why and how things had gone wrong was every bit as important as understanding what component ha
d failed: figuring out the why and how would let you prevent the same malfunction from happenin
g again in the future. He pointed to each of the console’s parts in turn, explaining not just 
what it was, but what it did, and how it interacted with all the other parts to contribute to t
he correct working of the mechanism. Only by analyzing a mechanism in its individual parts were
 you able to determine whether its design was the most efficient to achieve its task. If it was
 the most efficient, just malfunctioning, then you fixed it. But if not, then you made modifica
tions to improve the mechanism. This was the only proper protocol for repair jobs, according to
 my father, and nothing about it was optional—in fact, this was the fundamental responsibility
 you had to technology.
Like all my father’s lessons, this one had broad applications beyond our immediate task. Ultim
ately, it was a lesson in the principle of self-reliance, which my father insisted that America
 had forgotten sometime between his own childhood and mine. Ours was now a country in which the
 cost of replacing a broken machine with a newer model was typically lower than the cost of hav
ing it fixed by an expert, which itself was typically lower than the cost of sourcing the parts
 and figuring out how to fix it yourself. This fact alone virtually guaranteed technological ty
ranny, which was perpetuated not by the technology itself but by the ignorance of everyone who 
used it daily and yet failed to understand it. To refuse to inform yourself about the basic ope
ration and maintenance of the equipment you depended on was to passively accept that tyranny an
d agree to its terms: when your equipment works, you’ll work, but when your equipment breaks d
own you’ll break down, too. Your possessions would possess you.
It turned out that I had probably just broken a solder joint, but to find out exactly which one
, my father wanted to use special test equipment that he had access to at his laboratory at the
 Coast Guard base. I suppose he could have brought the test equipment home with him, but for so
me reason he brought me to work instead. I think he just wanted to show me his lab. He’d decid
ed I was ready.
I wasn’t. I’d never been anywhere so impressive. Not even the library. Not even the Radio Sha
ck at the Lynnhaven Mall. What I remember most are the screens. The lab itself was dim and empt
y, the standard-issue beige and white of government construction, but even before my father hit
 the lights I couldn’t help but be transfixed by the pulsating glow of electric green. Why doe
s this place have so many TVs? was my first thought, quickly followed up by, And why are they a
ll tuned to the same channel? My father explained that these weren’t TVs but computers, and th
ough I’d heard the word before, I didn’t know what it meant. I think I initially assumed that
 the screens—the monitors—were the computers themselves.
He went on to show them to me, one by one, and tried to explain what they did: this one process
ed radar signals, and that one relayed radio transmissions, and yet another one simulated the e
lectronic systems on aircraft. I won’t pretend that I understood even half of it. These comput
ers were more advanced than nearly everything in use at that time in the private sector, far ah
ead of almost anything I had ever imagined. Sure, their processing units took a full five minut
es to boot, their displays only showed one color, and they had no speakers for sound effects or
 music. But those limitations only marked them as serious.
My father plopped me down in a chair, raising it until I could just about reach the desk, and t
he rectangular hunk of plastic that was on it. For the first time in my life, I found myself in
 front of a keyboard. My father had never let me type on his Commodore 64, and my screen time h
ad been restricted to video game consoles with their purpose-built controllers. But these compu
ters were professional, general-purpose machines, not gaming devices, and I didn’t understand 
how to make them work. There was no controller, no joystick, no gun—the only interface was tha
t flat hunk of plastic set with rows of keys printed with letters and numbers. The letters were
 even arranged in a different order than the one that I’d been taught at school. The first let
ter was not A but Q, followed by W, E, R, T, and Y. At least the numbers were in the same order
 in which I’d learned them.
My father told me that every key on the keyboard had a purpose—every letter, every number—and
 that their combinations had purposes, too. And just like with the buttons on a controller or j
oystick, if you could figure out the right combinations, you could work miracles. To demonstrat
e, he reached over me, typed a command, and pressed the Enter key. Something popped up on-scree
n that I now know is called a text editor. Then he grabbed a Post-it note and a pen and scribbl
ed out some letters and numbers, and told me to type them up exactly while he went off to repai
r the broken Nintendo.
The moment he was gone, I began reproducing his scribbles on-screen by pecking away at the keys
. A left-handed kid raised to be a rightie, I immediately found this to be the most natural met
hod of writing I’d ever encountered.
10 INPUT “WHAT IS YOUR NAME?”; NAME$
20 PRINT “HELLO, “+ NAME$ + “!”
It may sound easy to you, but you’re not a young child. I was. I was a young child with chubby
, stubby fingers who didn’t even know what quotation marks were, let alone that I had to hold 
down the Shift key in order to type them. After a whole lot of trial, and a whole lot of error,
 I finally succeeded in finishing the file. I pressed Enter and, in a flash, the computer was a
sking me a question: WHAT IS YOUR NAME?
I was fascinated. The note didn’t say what I was supposed do next, so I decided to answer, and
 pressed my new friend Enter once more. Suddenly, out of nowhere, HELLO, EDDIE! wrote itself on
-screen in a radioactive green that floated atop the blackness.
This was my introduction to programming and to computing in general: a lesson in the fact that 
these machines do what they do because somebody tells them to, in a very special, very careful 
way. And that somebody can even be seven years old.
Almost immediately, I grasped the limitations of gaming systems. They were stifling in comparis
on to computer systems. Nintendo, Atari, Sega—they all confined you to levels and worlds that 
you could advance through, even defeat, but never change. The repaired Nintendo console went ba
ck to the den, where my father and I competed in two-player Mario Kart, Double Dragon, and Stre
et Fighter. By that point, I was significantly better than him at all those games—the first pu
rsuit at which I proved more adept than my father—but every so often I’d let him beat me. I d
idn’t want him to think that I wasn’t grateful.
I’m not a natural programmer, and I’ve never considered myself any good at it. But I did, ove
r the next decade or so, become good enough to be dangerous. To this day, I still find the proc
ess magical: typing in the commands in all these strange languages that the processor then tran
slates into an experience that’s available not just to me but to everyone. I was fascinated by
 the thought that one individual programmer could code something universal, something bound by 
no laws or rules or regulations except those essentially reducible to cause and effect. There w
as an utterly logical relationship between my input and the output. If my input was flawed, the
 output was flawed; if my input was flawless, the computer’s output was, too. I’d never befor
e experienced anything so consistent and fair, so unequivocally unbiased. A computer would wait
 forever to receive my command but would process it the very moment I hit Enter, no questions a
sked. No teacher had ever been so patient, yet so responsive. Nowhere else—certainly not at sc
hool, and not even at home—had I ever felt so in control. That a perfectly written set of comm
ands would perfectly execute the same operations time and again would come to seem to me—as it
 did to so many smart, tech-inclined children of the millennium—the one stable saving truth of
 our generation.
3
Beltway Boy
I was just shy of my ninth birthday when my family moved from North Carolina to Maryland. To my
 surprise, I found that my name had preceded me. “Snowden” was everywhere throughout Anne Aru
ndel, the county we settled in, though it was a while before I learned why.
Richard Snowden was a British major who arrived in the province of Maryland in 1658 with the un
derstanding that Lord Baltimore’s guarantee of religious freedom for both Catholics and Protes
tants would also be extended to Quakers. In 1674, Richard was joined by his brother John, who’
d agreed to leave Yorkshire in order to shorten his prison sentence for preaching the Quaker fa
ith. When William Penn’s ship, the Welcome, sailed up the Delaware in 1682, John was one of th
e few Europeans to greet it.
Three of John’s grandsons went on to serve in the Continental Army during the Revolution. As t
he Quakers are pacifists, they came in for community censure for deciding to join the fight for
 independence, but their conscience demanded a reconsideration of their pacifism. William Snowd
en, my direct paternal ancestor, served as a captain, was taken prisoner by the British in the 
Battle of Fort Washington in New York, and died in custody at one of the notorious sugar house 
prisons in Manhattan. (Legend has it that the British killed their POWs by forcing them to eat 
gruel laced with ground glass.) His wife, Elizabeth née Moor, was a valued adviser to General 
Washington, and the mother to another John Snowden—a politician, historian, and newspaper publ
isher in Pennsylvania whose descendants dispersed southward to settle amid the Maryland holding
s of their Snowden cousins.
Anne Arundel County encompasses nearly all of the 1,976 acres of woodland that King Charles II 
granted to the family of Richard Snowden in 1686. The enterprises the Snowdens established ther
e include the Patuxent Iron Works, one of colonial America’s most important forges and a major
 manufacturer of cannonballs and bullets, and Snowden Plantation, a farm and dairy run by Richa
rd Snowden’s grandsons. After serving in the heroic Maryland Line of the Continental Army, the
y returned to the plantation and—most fully living the principles of independence—abolished t
heir family’s practice of slavery, freeing their two hundred African slaves nearly a full cent
ury before the Civil War.
Today, the former Snowden fields are bisected by Snowden River Parkway, a busy four-lane commer
cial stretch of upmarket chain restaurants and car dealerships. Nearby, Route 32/Patuxent Freew
ay leads directly to Fort George G. Meade, the second-largest army base in the country and the 
home of the NSA. Fort Meade, in fact, is built atop land that was once owned by my Snowden cous
ins, and that was either bought from them (in one account) or expropriated from them (according
 to others) by the US government.
I knew nothing of this history at the time: my parents joked that the state of Maryland changed
 the name on the signs every time somebody new moved in. They thought that was funny but I just
 found it spooky. Anne Arundel County is only a bit more than 250 miles away from Elizabeth Cit
y via I-95, yet it felt like a different planet. We’d exchanged the leafy riverside for a conc
rete sidewalk, and a school where I’d been popular and academically successful for one where I
 was constantly mocked for my glasses, my disinterest in sports, and, especially, for my accent
—a strong Southern drawl that led my new classmates to call me “retarded.”
I was so sensitive about my accent that I stopped speaking in class and started practicing alon
e at home until I managed to sound “normal”—or, at least, until I managed not to pronounce t
he site of my humiliation as “Anglish clay-iss” or say that I’d gotten a paper cut on my “f
anger.” Meanwhile, all that time I’d been afraid to speak freely had caused my grades to plum
met, and some of my teachers decided to have me IQ-tested as a way of diagnosing what they thou
ght was a learning disability. When my score came back, I don’t remember getting any apologies
, just a bunch of extra “enrichment assignments.” Indeed, the same teachers who’d doubted my
 ability to learn now began to take issue with my newfound interest in speaking up.
My new home was on the Beltway, which traditionally referred to Interstate 495, the highway tha
t encircles Washington, DC, but now describes the vast and ever-expanding blast radius of bedro
om communities around the nation’s capital, stretching north to Baltimore, Maryland, and south
 to Quantico, Virginia. The inhabitants of these suburbs almost invariably either serve in the 
US government or work for one of the companies that do business with the US government. There i
s, to put it plainly, no other reason to be there.
We lived in Crofton, Maryland, halfway between Annapolis and Washington, DC, at the western edg
e of Anne Arundel County, where the residential developments are all in the vinyl-sided Federal
ist style and have quaint ye-olde names like Crofton Towne, Crofton Mews, The Preserve, The Rid
ings. Crofton itself is a planned community fitted around the curves of the Crofton Country Clu
b. On a map, it resembles nothing so much as the human brain, with the streets coiling and kink
ing and folding around one another like the ridges and furrows of the cerebral cortex. Our stre
et was Knights Bridge Turn, a broad, lazy loop of split-level housing, wide driveways, and two-
car garages. The house we lived in was seven down from one end of the loop, seven down from the
 other—the house in the middle. I got a Huffy ten-speed bike and with it, a paper route, deliv
ering the Capital, a venerable newspaper published in Annapolis, whose daily distribution becam
e distressingly erratic, especially in the winter, especially between Crofton Parkway and Route
 450, which, as it passed by our neighborhood, acquired a different name: Defense Highway.
For my parents this was an exciting time. Crofton was a step up for them, both economically and
 socially. The streets were tree-lined and pretty much crime-free, and the multicultural, multi
racial, multilingual population, which reflected the diversity of the Beltway’s diplomatic cor
ps and intelligence community, was well-to-do and well educated. Our backyard was basically a g
olf course, with tennis courts just around the corner, and beyond those an Olympic-size pool. C
ommuting-wise, too, Crofton was ideal. It took my father just forty minutes to get to his new p
osting as a chief warrant officer in the Aeronautical Engineering Division at Coast Guard Headq
uarters, which at the time was located at Buzzard Point in southern Washington, DC, adjacent to
 Fort Lesley J. McNair. And it took my mother just twenty or so minutes to get to her new job a
t the NSA, whose boxy futuristic headquarters, topped with radomes and sheathed in copper to se
al in the communications signals, forms the heart of Fort Meade.
I can’t stress this enough, for outsiders: this type of employment was normal. Neighbors to ou
r left worked for the Defense Department; neighbors to the right worked in the Department of En
ergy and the Department of Commerce. For a while, nearly every girl at school on whom I had a c
rush had a father in the FBI. Fort Meade was just the place where my mother worked, along with 
about 125,000 other employees, approximately 40,000 of whom resided on-site, many with their fa
milies. The base was home to over 115 government agencies, in addition to forces from all five 
branches of the military. To put it in perspective, in Anne Arundel County, population just ove
r half a million, every eight hundredth person works for the post office, every thirtieth perso
n works for the public school system, and every fourth person works for, or serves in, a busine
ss, agency, or branch connected to Fort Meade. The base has its own post offices, schools, poli
ce, and fire departments. Area children, military brats and civilians alike, would flock to the
 base daily to take golf, tennis, and swimming lessons. Though we lived off base, my mother sti
ll used its commissary as our grocery store, to stock up on items in bulk. She also took advant
age of the base’s PX, or Post Exchange, as a one-stop shop for the sensible and, most importan
t, tax-free clothing that my sister and I were constantly outgrowing. Perhaps it’s best, then,
 for readers not raised in this milieu to imagine Fort Meade and its environs, if not the entir
e Beltway, as one enormous boom-or-bust company town. It is a place whose monoculture has much 
in common with, say, Silicon Valley’s, except that the Beltway’s product isn’t technology bu
t government itself.
I should add that both my parents had top secret clearances, but my mother also had a full-scop
e polygraph—a higher-level security check that members of the military aren’t subject to. The
 funny thing is, my mother was the farthest thing from a spy. She was a clerk at an independent
 insurance and benefits association that serviced employees of the NSA—essentially, providing 
spies with retirement plans. But still, to process pension forms she had to be vetted as if she
 were about to parachute into a jungle to stage a coup.
My father’s career remains fairly opaque to me to this day, and the fact is that my ignorance 
here isn’t anomalous. In the world I grew up in, nobody really talked about their jobs—not ju
st to children, but to each other. It is true that many of the adults around me were legally pr
ohibited from discussing their work, even with their families, but to my mind a more accurate e
xplanation lies in the technical nature of their labor and the government’s insistence on comp
artmentalization. Tech people rarely, if ever, have a sense of the broader applications and pol
icy implications of the projects to which they’re assigned. And the work that consumes them te
nds to require such specialized knowledge that to bring it up at a barbecue would get them disi
nvited from the next one, because nobody cared.
In retrospect, maybe that’s what got us here.
4
American Online
It was soon after we moved to Crofton that my father brought home our first desktop computer, a
 Compaq Presario 425, list price $1,399 but purchased at his military discount, and initially s
et up—much to my mother’s chagrin—smack in the middle of the dining-room table. From the mom
ent it appeared, the computer and I were inseparable. If previously I’d been loath to go outsi
de and kick around a ball, now the very idea seemed ludicrous. There was no outside greater tha
n what I could find inside this drab clunky PC clone, with what felt at the time like an imposs
ibly fast 25-megahertz Intel 486 CPU and an inexhaustible 200-megabyte hard disk. Also, get thi
s, it had a color monitor—an 8-bit color monitor, to be precise, which means that it could dis
play up to 256 different colors. (Your current device can probably display in the millions.)
This Compaq became my constant companion—my second sibling, and first love. It came into my li
fe just at the age when I was first discovering an independent self and the multiple worlds tha
t can simultaneously exist within this world. That process of exploration was so exciting that 
it made me take for granted and even neglect, for a while at least, the family and life that I 
already had. Another way of saying this is, I was just experiencing the early throes of puberty
. But this was a technologized puberty, and the tremendous changes that it wrought in me were, 
in a way, being wrought everywhere, in everyone.
My parents would call my name to tell me to get ready for school, but I wouldn’t hear them. Th
ey’d call my name to tell me to wash up for dinner, but I’d pretend not to hear them. And whe
never I was reminded that the computer was a shared computer and not my personal machine, I’d 
relinquish my seat with such reluctance that as my father, or mother, or sister took their turn
, they’d have to order me out of the room entirely lest I hover moodily over their shoulders a
nd offer advice—showing my sister word-processing macros and shortcuts when she was writing a 
research paper, or giving my parents spreadsheet tips when they tried to do their taxes.
I’d try to rush them through their tasks, so I could get back to mine, which were so much more
 important—like playing Loom. As technology had advanced, games involving Pong paddles and hel
icopters—the kind my father had played on that by now superannuated Commodore—had lost ground
 to ones that realized that at the heart of every computer user was a book reader, a being with
 the desire not just for sensation but for story. The crude Nintendo, Atari, and Sega games of 
my childhood, with plots along the lines of (and this is a real example) rescuing the president
 of the United States from ninjas, now gave way to detailed reimaginings of the ancient tales t
hat I’d paged through while lying on the carpet of my grandmother’s house.
Loom was about a society of Weavers whose elders (named after the Greek Fates Clotho, Lachesis,
 and Atropos) create a secret loom that controls the world, or, according to the script of the 
game, that weaves “subtle patterns of influence into the very fabric of reality.” When a youn
g boy discovers the loom’s power, he’s forced into exile, and everything spirals into chaos u
ntil the world decides that a secret fate machine might not be such a great idea, after all.
Unbelievable, sure. But then again, it’s just a game.
Still, it wasn’t lost on me, even at that young age, that the titular machine of the game was 
a symbol of sorts for the computer on which I was playing it. The loom’s rainbow-colored threa
ds were like the computer’s rainbow-colored internal wires, and the lone gray thread that fore
told an uncertain future was like the long gray phone cord that came out of the back of the com
puter and connected it to the great wide world beyond. There, for me, was the true magic: with 
just this cord, the Compaq’s expansion card and modem, and a working phone, I could dial up an
d connect to something new called the Internet.
Readers who were born postmillennium might not understand the fuss, but trust me, this was a go
ddamned miracle. Nowadays, connectivity is just presumed. Smartphones, laptops, desktops, every
thing’s connected, always. Connected to what exactly? How? It doesn’t matter. You just tap th
e icon your older relatives call “the Internet button” and boom, you’ve got it: the news, pi
zza delivery, streaming music, and streaming video that we used to call TV and movies. Back the
n, however, we walked uphill both ways, to and from school, and plugged our modems directly int
o the wall, with manly twelve-year-old hands.
I’m not saying that I knew much about what the Internet was, or how exactly I was connecting t
o it, but I did understand the miraculousness of it all. Because in those days, when you told t
he computer to connect, you were setting off an entire process wherein the computer would beep 
and hiss like a traffic jam of snakes, after which—and it could take lifetimes, or at least wh
ole minutes—you could pick up any other phone in the house on an extension line and actually h
ear the computers talking. You couldn’t actually understand what they were saying to each othe
r, of course, since they were speaking in a machine language that transmitted up to fourteen th
ousand symbols per second. Still, even that incomprehension was an astonishingly clear indicati
on that phone calls were no longer just for older teenage sisters.
Internet access, and the emergence of the Web, was my generation’s big bang or Precambrian exp
losion. It irrevocably altered the course of my life, as it did the lives of everyone. From the
 age of twelve or so, I tried to spend my every waking moment online. Whenever I couldn’t, I w
as busy planning my next session. The Internet was my sanctuary; the Web became my jungle gym, 
my treehouse, my fortress, my classroom without walls. If it were possible, I became more seden
tary. If it were possible, I became more pale. Gradually, I stopped sleeping at night and inste
ad slept by day in school. My grades went back into free fall.
I wasn’t worried by this academic setback, however, and I’m not sure that my parents were, ei
ther. After all, the education that I was getting online seemed better and even more practical 
for my future career prospects than anything provided by school. That, at least, was what I kep
t telling my mother and father.
My curiosity felt as vast as the Internet itself: a limitless space that was growing exponentia
lly, adding webpages by the day, by the hour, by the minute, on subjects I knew nothing about, 
on subjects I’d never heard of before—yet the moment that I did hear about them, I’d develop
 an insatiable desire to understand them in their every detail, with few rests or snacks or eve
n toilet breaks allowed. My appetite wasn’t limited to serious tech subjects like how to fix a
 CD-ROM drive, of course. I also spent plenty of time on gaming sites searching for god-mode ch
eat codes for Doom and Quake. But I was generally just so overwhelmed by the sheer amount of in
formation immediately available that I’m not sure I was able to say where one subject ended an
d another began. A crash course on how to build my own computer led to a crash course in proces
sor architecture, with side excursions into information about martial arts, guns, sports cars, 
and—full disclosure—softcore-ish goth-y porn.
I sometimes had the feeling that I had to know everything and wasn’t going to sign off until I
 did. It was like I was in a race with the technology, in the same way that some of the teenage
 boys around me were in a race with one another to see who’d grow the tallest, or who’d get f
acial hair first. At school I was surrounded by kids, some from foreign countries, who were jus
t trying to fit in and would expend enormous effort to seem cool, to keep up with the trends. B
ut owning the latest No Fear hat and knowing how to bend its brim was child’s play—literally,
 child’s play—compared to what I was doing. I found it so thoroughly demanding to keep pace w
ith all of the sites and how-to tutorials I followed that I started to resent my parents whenev
er they—in response to a particularly substandard report card or a detention I received—would
 force me off the computer on a school night. I couldn’t bear to have those privileges revoked
, disturbed by the thought that every moment that I wasn’t online more and more material was a
ppearing that I’d be missing. After repeated parental warnings and threats of grounding, I’d 
finally relent and print out whatever file I was reading and bring the dot-matrix pages up to b
ed. I’d continue studying in hard copy until my parents had gone to bed themselves, and then I
’d tiptoe out into the dark, wary of the squeaky door and the creaky floorboards by the stairs
. I’d keep the lights off and, guiding myself by the glow of the screen saver, I’d wake the c
omputer up and go online, holding my pillows against the machine to stifle the dial tone of the
 modem and the ever-intensifying hiss of its connection.
How can I explain it, to someone who wasn’t there? My younger readers, with their younger stan
dards, might think of the nascent Internet as way too slow, the nascent Web as too ugly and un-
entertaining. But that would be wrong. Back then, being online was another life, considered by 
most to be separate and distinct from Real Life. The virtual and the actual had not yet merged.
 And it was up to each individual user to determine for themselves where one ended and the othe
r began.
It was precisely this that was so inspiring: the freedom to imagine something entirely new, the
 freedom to start over. Whatever Web 1.0 might’ve lacked in user-friendliness and design sensi
bility, it more than made up for by its fostering of experimentation and originality of express
ion, and by its emphasis on the creative primacy of the individual. A typical GeoCities site, f
or example, might have a flashing background that alternated between green and blue, with white
 text scrolling like an exclamatory chyron across the middle—Read This First!!!—below the .gi
f of a dancing hamster. But to me, all these kludgy quirks and tics of amateur production merel
y indicated that the guiding intelligence behind the site was human, and unique. Computer scien
ce professors and systems engineers, moonlighting English majors and mouth-breathing, basement-
dwelling armchair political economists were all only too happy to share their research and conv
ictions—not for any financial reward, but merely to win converts to their cause. And whether t
hat cause was PC or Mac, macrobiotic diets or the abolition of the death penalty, I was interes
ted. I was interested because they were enthused. Many of these strange and brilliant people co
uld even be contacted and were quite pleased to answer my questions via the forms (“click this
 hyperlink or copy and paste it into your browser”) and email addresses (@usenix.org, @frontie
r.net) provided on their sites.
As the millennium approached, the online world would become increasingly centralized and consol
idated, with both governments and businesses accelerating their attempts to intervene in what h
ad always been a fundamentally peer-to-peer relationship. But for one brief and beautiful stret
ch of time—a stretch that, fortunately for me, coincided almost exactly with my adolescence—t
he Internet was mostly made of, by, and for the people. Its purpose was to enlighten, not to mo
netize, and it was administered more by a provisional cluster of perpetually shifting collectiv
e norms than by exploitative, globally enforceable terms of service agreements. To this day, I 
consider the 1990s online to have been the most pleasant and successful anarchy I’ve ever expe
rienced.
I was especially involved with the Web-based bulletin-board systems or BBSes. On these, you cou
ld pick a username and type out whatever message you wanted to post, either adding to a preexis
ting group discussion or starting a new one. Any and all messages that replied to your post wou
ld be organized by thread. Imagine the longest email chain you’ve ever been on, but in public.
 These were also chat applications, like Internet Relay Chat, which provided an immediate-grati
fication instant-message version of the same experience. There you could discuss any topic in r
eal time, or at least as close to real time as a telephone conversation, live radio, or TV news
.
Most of the messaging and chatting I did was in search of answers to questions I had about how 
to build my own computer, and the responses I received were so considered and thorough, so gene
rous and kind, they’d be unthinkable today. My panicked query about why a certain chipset for 
which I’d saved up my allowance didn’t seem to be compatible with the motherboard I’d alread
y gotten for Christmas would elicit a two-thousand-word explanation and note of advice from a p
rofessional tenured computer scientist on the other side of the country. Not cribbed from any m
anual, this response was composed expressly for me, to troubleshoot my problems step-by-step un
til I’d solved them. I was twelve years old, and my correspondent was an adult stranger far aw
ay, yet he treated me like an equal because I’d shown respect for the technology. I attribute 
this civility, so far removed from our current social-media sniping, to the high bar for entry 
at the time. After all, the only people on these boards were the people who could be there—who
 wanted to be there badly enough—who had the proficiency and passion, because the Internet of 
the 1990s wasn’t just one click away. It took significant effort just to log on.
Once, a certain BBS that I was on tried to coordinate casual in-the-flesh meetings of its regul
ar members throughout the country: in DC, in New York, at the Consumer Electronics Show in Las 
Vegas. After being pressured rather hard to attend—and promised extravagant evenings of eating
 and drinking—I finally just told everyone how old I was. I was afraid that some of my corresp
ondents might stop interacting with me, but instead they became, if anything, even more encoura
ging. I was sent updates from the electronics show and images of its catalog; one guy offered t
o ship me secondhand computer parts through the mail, free of charge.
* * *
I MIGHT HAVE told the BBSers my age, but I never told them my name, because one of the greatest
 joys of these platforms was that on them I didn’t have to be who I was. I could be anybody. T
he anonymizing or pseudonymizing features brought equilibrium to all relationships, correcting 
their imbalances. I could take cover under virtually any handle, or “nym,” as they were calle
d, and suddenly become an older, taller, manlier version of myself. I could even be multiple se
lves. I took advantage of this feature by asking what I sensed were my more amateur questions o
n what seemed to me the more amateur boards, under different personas each time. My computer sk
ills were improving so swiftly that instead of being proud of all the progress I’d made, I was
 embarrassed by my previous ignorance and wanted to distance myself from it. I wanted to disass
ociate my selves. I’d tell myself that squ33ker had been so dumb when “he” had asked that qu
estion about chipset compatibility way back, long ago, last Wednesday.
For all of this cooperative, collectivist free-culture ethos, I’m not going to pretend that th
e competition wasn’t merciless, or that the population—almost uniformly male, heterosexual, a
nd hormonally charged—didn’t occasionally erupt into cruel and petty squabbles. But in the ab
sence of real names, the people who claimed to hate you weren’t real people. They didn’t know
 anything about you beyond what you argued, and how you argued it. If, or rather when, one of y
our arguments incurred some online wrath, you could simply drop that screen name and assume ano
ther mask, under the cover of which you could even join in the mimetic pile-on, beating up on y
our disowned avatar as if it were a stranger. I can’t tell you what sweet relief that sometime
s was.
In the 1990s, the Internet had yet to fall victim to the greatest iniquity in digital history: 
the move by both government and businesses to link, as intimately as possible, users’ online p
ersonas to their offline legal identity. Kids used to be able to go online and say the dumbest 
things one day without having to be held accountable for them the next. This might not strike y
ou as the healthiest environment in which to grow up, and yet it is precisely the only environm
ent in which you can grow up—by which I mean that the early Internet’s dissociative opportuni
ties actually encouraged me and those of my generation to change our most deeply held opinions,
 instead of just digging in and defending them when challenged. This ability to reinvent oursel
ves meant that we never had to close our minds by picking sides, or close ranks out of fear of 
doing irreparable harm to our reputations. Mistakes that were swiftly punished but swiftly rect
ified allowed both the community and the “offender” to move on. To me, and to many, this felt
 like freedom.
Imagine, if you will, that you could wake up every morning and pick a new name and a new face b
y which to be known to the world. Imagine that you could choose a new voice and new words to sp
eak in it, as if the “Internet button” were actually a reset button for your life. In the new
 millennium, Internet technology would be turned to very different ends: enforcing fidelity to 
memory, identarian consistency, and so ideological conformity. But back then, for a while at le
ast, it protected us by forgetting our transgressions and forgiving our sins.
My most significant early encounters with online self-presentation happened not on BBSes, howev
er, but in a more fantastical realm: the pseudo-feudal lands and dungeons of role-playing games
, MMORPGs (massively multiplayer online role-playing games) in particular. In order to play Ult
ima Online, which was my favorite MMORPG, I had to create and assume an alternative identity, o
r “alt.” I could choose, for example, to be a wizard or warrior, a tinkerer or thief, and I c
ould toggle between these alts with a freedom that was unavailable to me in off-line life, whos
e institutions tend to regard all mutability as suspicious.
I’d roam the Ultima gamescape as one of my alts, interacting with the alts of others. As I got
 to know these other alts, by collaborating with them on certain quests, I’d sometimes come to
 realize that I’d met their users before, just under different identities, while they, in turn
, might realize the same about me. They’d read my messages and figure out, through a character
istic phrase I’d used, or a particular quest that I’d suggest, that I—who was currently, say
, a knight who called herself Shrike—was also, or had also been, a bard who called himself Cor
win, and a smith who called himself Belgarion. Sometimes I just enjoyed these interactions as o
pportunities for banter, but more often than not I treated them competitively, measuring my suc
cess by whether I was able to identify more of another user’s alts than they were able to iden
tify of mine. These contests to determine whether I could unmask others without being unmasked 
myself required me to be careful not to fall into any messaging patterns that might expose me, 
while simultaneously engaging others and remaining alert to the ways in which they might inadve
rtently reveal their true identities.
While the alts of Ultima were multifarious in name, they were essentially stabilized by the nat
ure of their roles, which were well defined, even archetypal, and so enmeshed within the game’
s established social order as to make playing them sometimes feel like discharging a civic duty
. After a day at school or at a job that might seem purposeless and unrewarding, it could feel 
as if you were performing a useful service by spending the evening as a healer or shepherd, a h
elpful alchemist or mage. The relative stability of the Ultima universe—its continued developm
ent according to defined laws and codes of conduct—ensured that each alt had their role-specif
ic tasks, and would be judged according to their ability, or willingness, to complete them and 
fulfill the societal expectations of their function.
I loved these games and the alternative lives they let me live, though love wasn’t quite as li
berating for the other members of my family. Games, especially of the massively multiplayer var
iety, are notoriously time-consuming, and I was spending so many hours playing Ultima that our 
phone bills were becoming exorbitant and no calls were getting through. The line was always bus
y. My sister, now deep into her teen years, became furious when she found out that my online li
fe had caused her to miss some crucial high-school gossip. However, it didn’t take her long to
 figure out that all she had to do to get her revenge was pick up the phone, which would break 
the Internet connection. The modem’s hiss would stop, and before she’d even received a normal
 dial tone, I’d be screaming my head off downstairs.
If you’re interrupted in the middle of, say, reading the news online, you can always go back a
nd pick up wherever you left off. But if you’re interrupted while playing a game that you can
’t pause or save—because a hundred thousand others are playing it at the same time—you’re r
uined. You could be on top of the world, some legendary dragon-slayer with your own castle and 
an army, but after just thirty seconds of CONNECTION LOST you’d find yourself reconnecting to 
a bone-gray screen that bore a cruel epitaph: YOU ARE DEAD.
I’m a bit embarrassed nowadays at how seriously I took all of this, but I can’t avoid the fac
t that I felt, at the time, as if my sister was intent on destroying my life—particularly on t
hose occasions when she’d make sure to catch my eye from across the room and smile before pick
ing up the downstairs receiver, not because she wanted to make a phone call but purely because 
she wanted to remind me who was boss. Our parents got so fed up with our shouting matches that 
they did something uncharacteristically indulgent. They switched our Internet billing plan from
 pay-by-the-minute to flat-fee unlimited access, and installed a second phone line.
Peace smiled upon our abode.
5
Hacking
All teenagers are hackers. They have to be, if only because their life circumstances are untena
ble. They think they’re adults, but the adults think they’re kids.
Remember, if you can, your own teen years. You were a hacker, too, willing to do anything to ev
ade parental supervision. Basically, you were fed up with being treated like a child.
Recall how it felt when anyone older and bigger than you sought to control you, as if age and s
ize were identical with authority. At one time or another, your parents, teachers, coaches, sco
utmasters, and clergy would all take advantage of their position to invade your private life, i
mpose their expectations on your future, and enforce your conformity to past standards. Wheneve
r these adults substituted their hopes, dreams, and desires for your own, they were doing so, b
y their account, “for your own good” or “with your best interests at heart.” And while some
times this was true, we all remember those other times when it wasn’t—when “because I said s
o” wasn’t enough and “you’ll thank me one day” rang hollow. If you’ve ever been an adoles
cent, you’ve surely been on the receiving end of one of these clichés, and so on the losing e
nd of an imbalance of power.
To grow up is to realize the extent to which your existence has been governed by systems of rul
es, vague guidelines, and increasingly unsupportable norms that have been imposed on you withou
t your consent and are subject to change at a moment’s notice. There were even some rules that
 you’d only find out about after you’d violated them.
If you were anything like me, you were scandalized.
If you were anything like me, you were nearsighted, scrawny, and, age-wise, barely entering the
 double digits when you first started to wonder about politics.
In school, you were told that in the system of American politics, citizens give consent through
 the franchise to be governed by their equals. This is democracy. But democracy certainly wasn
’t in place in my US history class, where, if my classmates and I had the vote, Mr. Martin wou
ld have been out of a job. Instead, Mr. Martin made the rules for US history, Ms. Evans made th
e rules for English, Mr. Sweeney made the rules for science, Mr. Stockton made the rules for ma
th, and all of those teachers constantly changed those rules to benefit themselves and maximize
 their power. If a teacher didn’t want you to go to the bathroom, you’d better hold it in. If
 a teacher promised a field trip to the Smithsonian Institution but then canceled it for an ima
ginary infraction, they’d offer no explanation beyond citing their broad authority and the mai
ntenance of proper order. Even back then, I realized that any opposition to this system would b
e difficult, not least because getting its rules changed to serve the interests of the majority
 would involve persuading the rule makers to put themselves at a purposeful disadvantage. That,
 ultimately, is the critical flaw or design defect intentionally integrated into every system, 
in both politics and computing: the people who create the rules have no incentive to act agains
t themselves.
What convinced me that school, at least, was an illegitimate system was that it wouldn’t recog
nize any legitimate dissent. I could plead my case until I lost my voice, or I could just accep
t the fact that I’d never had a voice to begin with.
However, the benevolent tyranny of school, like all tyrannies, has a limited shelf life. At a c
ertain point, the denial of agency becomes a license to resist, though it’s characteristic of 
adolescence to confuse resistance with escapism or even violence. The most common outlets for a
 rebellious teen were useless to me, because I was too cool for vandalism and not cool enough f
or drugs. (To this day, I’ve never even gotten drunk on liquor or smoked a cigarette.) Instead
, I started hacking—which remains the sanest, healthiest, and most educational way I know for 
kids to assert autonomy and address adults on equal terms.
Like most of my classmates, I didn’t like the rules but was afraid of breaking them. I knew ho
w the system worked: you corrected a teacher’s mistake, you got a warning; you confronted the 
teacher when they didn’t admit the mistake, you got detention; someone cheated off your exam, 
and though you didn’t expressly let them cheat, you got detention and the cheater got suspende
d. This is the origin of all hacking: the awareness of a systemic linkage between input and out
put, between cause and effect. Because hacking isn’t just native to computing—it exists where
ver rules do. To hack a system requires getting to know its rules better than the people who cr
eated it or are running it, and exploiting all the vulnerable distance between how those people
 had intended the system to work and how it actually works, or could be made to work. In capita
lizing on these unintentional uses, hackers aren’t breaking the rules as much as debunking the
m.
Humans are hardwired to recognize patterns. All the choices we make are informed by a cache of 
assumptions, both empirical and logical, unconsciously derived and consciously developed. We us
e these assumptions to assess the potential consequences of each choice, and we describe the ab
ility to do all of this, quickly and accurately, as intelligence. But even the smartest among u
s rely on assumptions that we’ve never put to the test—and because we do, the choices we make
 are often flawed. Anyone who knows better, or thinks more quickly and more accurately than we 
do, can take advantage of those flaws to create consequences that we never expected. It’s this
 egalitarian nature of hacking—which doesn’t care who you are, just how you reason—that make
s it such a reliable method of dealing with the type of authority figures so convinced of their
 system’s righteousness that it never occurred to them to test it.
I didn’t learn any of this at school, of course. I learned it online. The Internet gave me the
 chance to pursue all the topics I was interested in, and all the links between them, unconstra
ined by the pace of my classmates and my teachers. The more time I spent online, however, the m
ore my schoolwork felt extracurricular.
The summer I turned thirteen, I resolved never to return, or at least to seriously reduce my cl
assroom commitments. I wasn’t quite sure how I’d swing that, though. All the plans I came up 
with were likely to backfire. If I was caught skipping class, my parents would revoke my comput
er privileges; if I decided to drop out, they’d bury my body deep in the woods and tell the ne
ighbors I’d run away. I had to come up with a hack—and then, on the first day of the new scho
ol year, I found one. Indeed, it was basically handed to me.
At the start of each class, the teachers passed out their syllabi, detailing the material to be
 covered, the required reading, and the schedule of tests and quizzes and assignments. Along wi
th these, they gave us their grading policies, which were essentially explanations of how As, B
s, Cs, and Ds were calculated. I’d never encountered information like this. Their numbers and 
letters were like a strange equation that suggested a solution to my problem.
After school that day, I sat down with the syllabi and did the math to figure out which aspects
 of each class I could simply ignore and still expect to receive a passing grade. Take my US hi
story class, for example. According to the syllabus, quizzes were worth 25 percent, tests were 
worth 35 percent, term papers were worth 15 percent, homework was worth 15 percent, and class p
articipation—that most subjective of categories, in every subject—was worth 10 percent. Becau
se I usually did well on my quizzes and tests without having to do too much studying, I could c
ount on them for a reliable pool of time-efficient points. Term papers and homework, however, w
ere the major time-sucks: low-value, high-cost impositions on Me Time.
What all of those numbers told me was that if I didn’t do any homework but aced everything els
e, I’d wind up with a cumulative grade of 85, a B. If I didn’t do any homework or write any t
erm papers but aced everything else, I’d wind up with a cumulative grade of 70, a C-minus. The
 10 percent that was class participation would be my buffer. Even if the teacher gave me a zero
 in that—if they interpreted my participation as disruption—I could still manage a 65, a D-mi
nus. I’d still pass.
My teachers’ systems were terminally flawed. Their instructions for how to achieve the highest
 grade could be used as instructions for how to achieve the highest freedom—a key to how to av
oid doing what I didn’t like to do and still slide by.
The moment I figured that out, I stopped doing homework completely. Every day was bliss, the ki
nd of bliss forbidden to anybody old enough to work and pay taxes, until Mr. Stockton asked me 
in front of the entire class why I hadn’t handed in the past half-dozen or so homework assignm
ents. Untouched as I was by the guile of age—and forgetting for a moment that by giving away m
y hack, I was depriving myself of an advantage—I cheerfully offered my equation to the math te
acher. My classmates’ laughter lasted just a moment before they set about scribbling, calculat
ing whether they, too, could afford to adopt a post-homework life.
“Pretty clever, Eddie,” Mr. Stockton said, moving on to the next lesson with a smile.
I was the smartest kid in school—until about twenty-four hours later, when Mr. Stockton passed
 out the new syllabus. This stated that any student who failed to turn in more than six homewor
ks by the end of the semester would get an automatic F.
Pretty clever, Mr. Stockton.
Then, he took me aside after class and said, “You should be using that brain of yours not to f
igure out how to avoid work, but how to do the best work you can. You have so much potential, E
d. But I don’t think you realize that the grades you get here will follow you for the rest of 
your life. You have to start thinking about your permanent record.”
* * *
UNSHACKLED FROM HOMEWORK, at least for a while, and so with more time to spare, I also did some
 more conventional—computer-based—hacking. As I did, my abilities improved. At the bookstore,
 I’d page through tiny, blurrily photocopied, stapled-together hacker zines with names like 26
00 and Phrack, absorbing their techniques, and in the process absorbing their antiauthoritarian
 politics.
I was at the bottom of the technical totem pole, a script kiddie n00b working with tools I didn
’t understand that functioned according to principles that were beyond me. People still ask me
 why, when I finally did gain some proficiency, I didn’t race out to empty bank accounts or st
eal credit card numbers. The honest answer is that I was too young and dumb to even know that t
his was an option, let alone to know what I’d do with the stolen loot. All I wanted, all I nee
ded, I already had for free. Instead, I figured out simple ways to hack some games, giving myse
lf extra lives and letting me do things like see through walls. Also, there wasn’t a lot of mo
ney on the Internet back then, at least not by today’s standards. The closest that anyone I kn
ew or anything I read ever came to theft was “phreaking,” or making free phone calls.
If you asked some of the big-shot hackers of the day why, for example, they’d hacked into a ma
jor news site only to do nothing more meaningful than replace the headlines with a trippy GIF p
roclaiming the skills of Baron von Hackerface that would be taken down in less than half an hou
r, the reply would’ve been a version of the answer given by the mountaineer who was asked his 
reason for climbing Mount Everest: “Because it’s there.” Most hackers, particularly young on
es, set out to search not for lucre or power, but for the limits of their talent and any opport
unity to prove the impossible possible.
I was young, and while my curiosity was pure, it was also, in retrospect, pretty psychologicall
y revealing, in that some of my earliest hacking attempts were directed toward allaying my neur
oses. The more I came to know about the fragility of computer security, the more I worried over
 the consequences of trusting the wrong machine. As a teenager, my first hack that ever courted
 trouble dealt with a fear that suddenly became all I could think about: the threat of a full-o
n, scorched-earth nuclear holocaust.
I’d been reading some article about the history of the American nuclear program, and before I 
knew it, with just a couple of clicks, I was at the website of the Los Alamos National Laborato
ry, the country’s nuclear research facility. That’s just the way the Internet works: you get 
curious, and your fingers do the thinking for you. But suddenly I was legitimately freaked out:
 the website of America’s largest and most significant scientific research and weapons develop
ment institution, I noticed, had a glaring security hole. Its vulnerability was basically the v
irtual version of an unlocked door: an open directory structure.
I’ll explain. Imagine I sent you a link to download a .pdf file that’s kept on its own page o
f a multipage website. The URL for this file would typically be something like website.com/file
s/pdfs/filename.pdf. Now, as the structure of a URL derives directly from directory structure, 
each part of this URL represents a distinct “branch” of the directory “tree.” In this insta
nce, within the directory of website.com is a folder of files, within which is a subfolder of p
dfs, within which is the specific filename.pdf that you’re seeking to download. Today, most we
bsites will confine your visit to that specific file, keeping their directory structures closed
 and private. But back in those dinosaur days, even major websites were created and run by folk
s who were new to the technology, and they often left their directory structures wide open, whi
ch meant that if you truncated your file’s URL—if you simply changed it to something like web
site.com/files—you’d be able to access every file on the site, pdf or otherwise, including th
ose that weren’t necessarily meant for visitors. This was the case with the Los Alamos site.
In the hacking community, this is basically Baby’s First Hack—a totally rudimentary traversal
 procedure known as “dirwalking,” or “directory walking.” And that’s just what I did: I wa
lked as fast as I could from file to subfolder to upper-level folder and back again, a teen let
 loose through the parent directories. Within a half hour of reading an article about the threa
t of nuclear weapons, I’d stumbled upon a trove of files meant only for the lab’s security-cl
eared workers.
To be sure, the documents I accessed weren’t exactly the classified plans for building a nucle
ar device in my garage. (And, anyway, it’s not as if those plans weren’t already available on
 about a dozen DIY websites.) Instead, what I got was more along the lines of confidential inte
roffice memoranda and other personal employee information. Still, as someone suddenly acutely w
orried about mushroom clouds on the horizon, and also—especially—as the child of military par
ents, I did what I figured I was supposed to: I told an adult. I sent an explanatory email to t
he laboratory’s webmaster about the vulnerability, and waited for a response that never came.
Every day after school I visited the site to check if the directory structure had changed, and 
it hadn’t—nothing had changed, except my capacity for shock and indignation. I finally got on
 the phone, my house’s second line, and called the general information phone number listed at 
the bottom of the laboratory’s site.
An operator picked up, and the moment she did I started stammering. I don’t even think I got t
o the end of the phrase “directory structure” before my voice broke. The operator interrupted
 with a curt “please hold for IT,” and before I could thank her she’d transferred me to a vo
ice mail.
By the time the beep came, I’d regained some modicum of confidence and, with a steadier larynx
, I left a message. All I recall now of that message was how I ended it—with relief, and by re
peating my name and phone number. I think I even spelled out my name, like my father sometimes 
did, using the military phonetic alphabet: “Sierra November Oscar Whiskey Delta Echo November.
” Then I hung up and went on with my life, which for a week consisted pretty much exclusively 
of checking the Los Alamos website.
Nowadays, given the government’s cyberintelligence capabilities, anyone who was pinging the Lo
s Alamos servers a few dozen times a day would almost certainly become a person of interest. Ba
ck then, however, I was merely an interested person. I couldn’t understand—didn’t anybody ca
re?
Weeks passed—and weeks can feel like months to a teenager—until one evening, just before dinn
er, the phone rang. My mother, who was in the kitchen making dinner, picked up.
I was at the computer in the dining room when I heard it was for me: “Yes, uh-huh, he’s here.
” Then, “May I ask who’s calling?”
I turned around in my seat and she was standing over me, holding the phone against her chest. A
ll the color had left her face. She was trembling.
Her whisper had a mournful urgency I’d never heard before, and it terrified me: “What did you
 do?”
Had I known, I would have told her. Instead, I asked, “Who is it?”
“Los Alamos, the nuclear laboratory.”
“Oh, thank God.”
I gently pried the phone away from her and sat her down. “Hello?”
On the line was a friendly representative from Los Alamos IT, who kept calling me Mr. Snowden. 
He thanked me for reporting the problem and informed me that they’d just fixed it. I restraine
d myself from asking what had taken so long—I restrained myself from reaching over to the comp
uter and immediately checking the site.
My mother hadn’t taken her eyes off me. She was trying to piece together the conversation, but
 could only hear one side. I gave her a thumbs-up, and then, to further reassure her, I affecte
d an older, serious, and unconvincingly deep voice and stiffly explained to the IT rep what he 
already knew: how I’d found the directory traversal problem, how I’d reported it, how I hadn
’t received any response until now. I finished up with, “I really appreciate you telling me. 
I hope I didn’t cause any problems.”
“Not at all,” the IT rep said, and then asked what I did for a living.
“Nothing really,” I said.
He asked whether I was looking for a job and I said, “During the school year, I’m pretty busy
, but I’ve got a lot of vacation and the summers are free.”
That’s when the lightbulb went off, and he realized that he was dealing with a teenager. “Wel
l, kid,” he said, “you’ve got my contact. Be sure and get in touch when you turn eighteen. N
ow pass me along to that nice lady I spoke to.”
I handed the phone to my anxious mother and she took it back with her into the kitchen, which w
as filling up with smoke. Dinner was burnt, but I’m guessing the IT rep said enough compliment
ary things about me that any punishment I was imagining went out the window.
6
Incomplete
I don’t remember high school very well, because I spent so much of it asleep, compensating for
 all my insomniac nights on the computer. At Arundel High most of my teachers didn’t mind my l
ittle napping habit, and left me alone so long as I wasn’t snoring, though there were still a 
cruel, joyless few who considered it their duty to always wake me—with the screech of chalk or
 the clap of erasers—and ambush me with a question: “And what do you think, Mr. Snowden?”
I’d lift my head off my desk, sit up in my chair, yawn, and—as my classmates tried to stifle 
their laughter—I’d have to answer.
The truth is, I loved these moments, which were among the greatest challenges high school had t
o offer. I loved being put on the spot, groggy and dazed, with thirty pairs of eyes and ears tr
ained on me and expecting my failure, while I searched for a clue on the half-empty blackboard.
 If I could think quickly enough to come up with a good answer, I’d be a legend. But if I was 
too slow, I could always crack a joke—it’s never too late for a joke. In the absolute worst c
ase, I’d sputter, and my classmates would think I was stupid. Let them. You should always let 
people underestimate you. Because when people misappraise your intelligence and abilities, they
’re merely pointing out their own vulnerabilities—the gaping holes in their judgment that nee
d to stay open if you want to cartwheel through later on a flaming horse, correcting the record
 with your sword of justice.
When I was a teen, I think I was a touch too enamored of the idea that life’s most important q
uestions are binary, meaning that one answer is always Right, and all the rest of the answers a
re Wrong. I think I was enchanted by the model of computer programming, whose questions can onl
y be answered in one of two ways: 1 or 0, the machine-code version of Yes or No, True or False.
 Even the multiple-choice questions of my quizzes and tests could be approached through the opp
ositional logic of the binary. If I didn’t immediately recognize one of the possible answers a
s correct, I could always try to reduce my choices by a process of elimination, looking for ter
ms such as “always” or “never” and seeking out invalidating exceptions.
Toward the end of my freshman year, however, I was faced with a very different kind of assignme
nt—a question that couldn’t be answered by filling in bubbles with a #2 pencil, but only by r
hetoric: full sentences in full paragraphs. In plain terms, it was an English class assignment,
 a writing prompt: “Please produce an autobiographical statement of no fewer than 1,000 words.
” I was being ordered by strangers to divulge my thoughts on perhaps the only subject on which
 I didn’t have any thoughts: the subject of me, whoever he was. I just couldn’t do it. I was 
blocked. I didn’t turn anything in and received an Incomplete.
My problem, like the prompt itself, was personal. I couldn’t “produce an autobiographical sta
tement” because my life at the time was too confusing. This was because my family was falling 
apart. My parents were getting a divorce. It all happened so fast. My father moved out and my m
other put the house in Crofton on the market, and then moved with my sister and me into an apar
tment, and then into a condominium in a development in nearby Ellicott City. I’ve had friends 
tell me that you aren’t really an adult until you bury a parent or become one yourself. But wh
at no one ever mentions is that for kids of a certain age, divorce is like both of those happen
ing simultaneously. Suddenly, the invulnerable icons of your childhood are gone. In their stead
, if there’s anyone at all, is a person even more lost than you are, full of tears and rage, w
ho craves your reassurance that everything will turn out okay. It won’t, though, at least not 
for a while.
As the custody and visitation rights were being sorted by the courts, my sister threw herself i
nto college applications, was accepted, and started counting down the days until she’d leave f
or the University of North Carolina at Wilmington. Losing her meant losing my closest tie to wh
at our family had been.
I reacted by turning inward. I buckled down and willed myself into becoming another person, a s
hape-shifter putting on the mask of whoever the people I cared about needed at the time. Among 
family, I was dependable and sincere. Among friends, mirthful and unconcerned. But when I was a
lone, I was subdued, even morose, and constantly worried about being a burden. I was haunted by
 all the road trips to North Carolina I’d complained through, all the Christmases I’d ruined 
by bringing home bad report cards, all the times I’d refused to get off-line and do my chores.
 Every childhood fuss I’d ever made flickered in my mind like crime-scene footage, evidence th
at I was responsible for what had happened.
I tried to throw off the guilt by ignoring my emotions and feigning self-sufficiency, until I p
rojected a sort of premature adulthood. I stopped saying that I was “playing” with the comput
er, and started saying that I was “working” on it. Just changing those words, without remotel
y changing what I was doing, made a difference in how I was perceived, by others and even by my
self.
I stopped calling myself “Eddie.” From now on, I was “Ed.” I got my first cell phone, which
 I wore clipped to my belt like a grown-ass man.
The unexpected blessing of trauma—the opportunity for reinvention—taught me to appreciate the
 world beyond the four walls of home. I was surprised to find that as I put more and more dista
nce between myself and the two adults who loved me the most, I came closer to others, who treat
ed me like a peer. Mentors who taught me to sail, trained me to fight, coached me in public spe
aking, and gave me the confidence to stand onstage—all of them helped to raise me.
At the beginning of my sophomore year, though, I started getting tired a lot and falling asleep
 more than usual—not just at school anymore, but now even at the computer. I’d wake up in the
 middle of the night in a more or less upright position, the screen in front of me full of gibb
erish because I’d passed out atop the keys. Soon enough my joints were aching, my nodes were s
wollen, the whites of my eyes turned yellow, and I was too exhausted to get out of bed, even af
ter sleeping for twelve hours or more at a stretch.
After having had more blood taken from me than I’d ever imagined was in my body, I was eventua
lly diagnosed with infectious mononucleosis. It was both a seriously debilitating and seriously
 humiliating illness for me to have, not least because it’s usually contracted through what my
 classmates called “hooking up,” and at age fifteen the only “hooking up” I’d ever done in
volved a modem. School was totally forgotten, my absences piled up, and not even that made me h
appy. Not even an all-ice-cream diet made me happy. I barely had the energy to do anything but 
play the games my parents gave me—each of them trying to bring the cooler game, the newer game
, as if they were in a competition to perk me up or mitigate their guilt about the divorce. Whe
n I no longer had it in me to even work a joystick, I wondered why I was alive. Sometimes I’d 
wake up unable to recognize my surroundings. It would take me a while to figure out whether the
 dimness meant that I was at my mother’s condo or my father’s one-bedroom, and I’d have no r
ecollection of having been driven between them. Every day became the same.
It was a haze. I remember reading The Conscience of a Hacker (aka The Hacker’s Manifesto), Nea
l Stephenson’s Snow Crash, and reams of J. R. R. Tolkien, falling asleep midchapter and gettin
g the characters and action confused, until I was dreaming that Gollum was by my bedside and wh
ining, “Master, Master, information wants to be free.”
While I was resigned to all the fever dreams sleep brought me, the thought of having to catch u
p on my schoolwork was the true nightmare. After I’d missed approximately four months of class
, I got a letter in the mail from Arundel High informing me that I’d have to repeat my sophomo
re year. I’d say I was shocked, but the moment I read the letter, I realized that I’d known t
his was inevitable and had been dreading it for weeks. The prospect of returning to school, let
 alone of repeating two semesters, was unimaginable to me, and I was ready to do whatever it to
ok to avoid it.
Just at the point when my glandular disease had developed into a full-on depression, receiving 
the school news shook me out of my slump. Suddenly I was upright and getting dressed in somethi
ng other than pajamas. Suddenly I was online and on the phone, searching for the system’s edge
s, searching for a hack. After a bit of research, and a lot of form-filling, my solution landed
 in the mailbox: I’d gotten myself accepted to college. Apparently, you don’t need a high sch
ool diploma to apply.
Anne Arundel Community College was a local institution, certainly not as venerable as my sister
’s school, but it would do the trick. All that mattered was that it was accredited. I took the
 offer of admission to my high school administrators, who, with a curious and barely concealed 
mixture of resignation and glee, agreed to let me enroll. I’d attend college classes two days 
a week, which was just about the most that I could manage to stay upright and functional. By ta
king classes above my grade level, I wouldn’t have to suffer through the year I’d missed. I’
d just skip it.
AACC was about twenty-five minutes away, and the first few times I drove myself were perilous—
I was a newly licensed driver who could barely stay awake at the wheel. I’d go to class and th
en come directly home to sleep. I was the youngest person in all my classes, and might even hav
e been the youngest person at the school, alternately a mascot-like object of novelty and a dis
comfiting presence. This, along with the fact that I was still recovering, meant that I didn’t
 hang out much. Also, because AACC was a commuter school, it had no active campus life. The ano
nymity of the school suited me fine, though, as did my classes, most of which were distinctly m
ore interesting than anything I’d napped through at Arundel High.
* * *
BEFORE I GO any further and leave high school forever, I should note that I still owe that Engl
ish class assignment, the one marked Incomplete. My autobiographical statement. The older I get
, the heavier it weighs on me, and yet writing it hasn’t gotten any easier.
The fact is, no one with a biography like mine ever comes comfortably to autobiography. It’s h
ard to have spent so much of my life trying to avoid identification, only to turn around comple
tely and share “personal disclosures” in a book. The Intelligence Community tries to inculcat
e in its workers a baseline anonymity, a sort of blank-page personality upon which to inscribe 
secrecy and the art of imposture. You train yourself to be inconspicuous, to look and sound lik
e others. You live in the most ordinary house, you drive the most ordinary car, you wear the sa
me ordinary clothes as everyone else. The difference is, you do it on purpose: normalcy, the or
dinary, is your cover. This is the perverse reward of a self-denying career that brings no publ
ic glory: the private glory comes not during work, but after, when you can go back out among ot
her people again and successfully convince them that you’re one of them.
Though there are a score of more popular and surely more accurate psychological terms for this 
type of identity split, I tend to think of it as human encryption. As in any process of encrypt
ion, the original material—your core identity—still exists, but only in a locked and scramble
d form. The equation that enables this ciphering is a simple proportion: the more you know abou
t others, the less you know about yourself. After a time, you might forget your likes and even 
your dislikes. You can lose your politics, along with any and all respect for the political pro
cess that you might have had. Everything gets subsumed by the job, which begins with a denial o
f character and ends with a denial of conscience. “Mission First.”
Some version of the above served me for years as an explanation of my dedication to privacy, an
d my inability or unwillingness to get personal. It’s only now, when I’ve been out of the IC 
almost as long as I was in it, that I realize: it isn’t nearly enough. After all, I was hardly
 a spy—I wasn’t even shaving—when I failed to turn in my English class assignment. Instead, 
I was a kid who’d been practicing spycraft for a while already—partly through my online exper
iments with game-playing identities, but more than anything through dealing with the silence an
d lies that followed my parents’ divorce.
With that rupture, we became a family of secret-keepers, experts at subterfuge and hiding. My p
arents kept secrets from each other, and from me and my sister. My sister and I would eventuall
y keep our own secrets, too, when one of us was staying with our father for the weekend and the
 other was staying with our mother. One of the most difficult trials that a child of divorce ha
s to face is being interrogated by one parent about the new life of the other.
My mother would be gone for stretches, back on the dating scene. My father tried his best to fi
ll the void, but, at times, he would become enraged by the protracted and expensive divorce pro
cess. Whenever that happened, it would seem to me as if our roles had reversed. I had to be ass
ertive and stand up to him, to reason with him.
It’s painful to write this, though not so much because the events of this period are painful t
o recall as because they’re in no way indicative of my parents’ fundamental decency—or of ho
w, out of love for their children, they were eventually able to bury their differences, reconci
le with respect, and flourish separately in peace.
This kind of change is constant, common, and human. But an autobiographical statement is static
, the fixed document of a person in flux. This is why the best account that someone can ever gi
ve of themselves is not a statement but a pledge—a pledge to the principles they value, and to
 the vision of the person they hope to become.
I’d enrolled in community college to save myself time after a setback, not because I intended 
to continue with my higher education. But I made a pledge to myself that I’d at least complete
 my high school degree. It was a weekend when I finally kept that promise, driving out to a pub
lic school near Baltimore to take the last test I’d ever take for the state of Maryland: the e
xam for the General Education Development (GED) degree, which the US government recognizes as t
he standard equivalent to a high school diploma.
I remember leaving the exam feeling lighter than ever, having satisfied the two years of school
ing that I still owed to the state just by taking a two-day exam. It felt like a hack, but it w
as more than that. It was me staying true to my word.
7
9/11
From the age of sixteen, I was pretty much living on my own. With my mother throwing herself in
to her work, I often had her condo to myself. I set my own schedule, cooked my own meals, and d
id my own laundry. I was responsible for everything but paying the bills.
I had a 1992 white Honda Civic and drove it all over the state, listening to the indie alternat
ive 99.1 WHFS—“Now Hear This” was one of its catchphrases—because that’s what everybody el
se did. I wasn’t very good at being normal, but I was trying.
My life became a circuit, tracing a route between my home, my college, and my friends, particul
arly a new group that I met in Japanese class. I’m not quite sure how long it took us to reali
ze that we’d become a clique, but by the second semester we attended class as much to see each
 other as to learn the language. This, by the way, is the best way to “seem normal”: surround
 yourself with people just as weird, if not weirder, than you are. Most of these friends were a
spiring artists and graphic designers obsessed with then controversial anime, or Japanese anima
tion. As our friendships deepened, so, too, did my familiarity with anime genres, until I could
 rattle off relatively informed opinions about a new library of shared experiences with titles 
like Grave of the Fireflies, Revolutionary Girl Utena, Neon Genesis Evangelion, Cowboy Bebop, T
he Vision of Escaflowne, Rurouni Kenshin, Nausicaa of the Valley of the Wind, Trigun, The Slaye
rs, and my personal favorite, Ghost in the Shell.
One of these new friends—I’ll call her Mae—was an older woman, much older, at a comfortably 
adult twenty-five. She was something of an idol to the rest of us, as a published artist and av
id cosplayer. She was my Japanese conversation partner and, I was impressed to find out, also r
an a successful Web-design business that I’ll call Squirrelling Industries, after the pet suga
r gliders she occasionally carried around in a purple felt Crown Royal bag.
That’s the story of how I became a freelancer: I started working as a Web designer for the gir
l I met in class. She, or I guess her business, hired me under the table at the then lavish rat
e of $30/hour in cash. The trick was how many hours I’d actually get paid for.
Of course, Mae could’ve paid me in smiles—because I was smitten, just totally in love with he
r. And though I didn’t do a particularly good job of concealing that, I’m not sure that Mae m
inded, because I never missed a deadline or even the slightest opportunity to do a favor for he
r. Also, I was a quick learner. In a company of two, you’ve got to be able to do everything. T
hough I could, and did, conduct my Squirrelling Industries business anywhere—that, after all, 
is the point of working online—she preferred that I come into the office, by which I mean her 
house, a two-story town house that she shared with her husband, a neat and clever man whom I’l
l call Norm.
Yes, Mae was married. What’s more, the town house that she and Norm lived in was located on ba
se at the southwestern edge of Fort Meade, where Norm worked as an air force linguist assigned 
to the NSA. I can’t tell you if it’s legal to run a business out of your home if your home is
 federal property on a military installation, but as a teenager infatuated with a married woman
 who was also my boss, I wasn’t exactly going to be a stickler for propriety.
It’s nearly inconceivable now, but at the time Fort Meade was almost entirely accessible to an
yone. It wasn’t all bollards and barricades and checkpoints trapped in barbed wire. I could ju
st drive onto the army base housing the world’s most secretive intelligence agency in my ’92 
Civic, windows down, radio up, without having to stop at a gate and show ID. It seemed like eve
ry other weekend or so a quarter of my Japanese class would congregate in Mae’s little house b
ehind NSA headquarters to watch anime and create comics. That’s just the way it was, in those 
bygone days when “It’s a free country, isn’t it?” was a phrase you heard in every schoolyar
d and sitcom.
On workdays I’d show up at Mae’s in the morning, pulling into her cul-de-sac after Norm left 
for the NSA, and I’d stay through the day, until just before he returned. On the occasions tha
t Norm and I happened to overlap during the two years or so I spent working for his wife, he wa
s, all things considered, kind and generous to me. At first, I assumed that he was oblivious to
 my infatuation, or had such a low opinion of my chances as a seducer that he didn’t mind leav
ing me alone with his wife. But one day, when we happened to pass each other—him going, me com
ing—he politely mentioned that he kept a gun on the nightstand.
Squirrelling Industries, which was really just Mae and me, was pretty typical of basement start
-ups circa the dot-com boom, small enterprises competing for scraps before everything went bust
. How it worked was that a large company—a carmaker, for instance—would hire a major ad agenc
y or PR firm to build their website and just generally spiff up their Internet presence. The la
rge company would know nothing about building websites, and the ad agency or PR firm would know
 only slightly more—just enough to post a job description seeking a Web designer at one of the
 then proliferating freelance work portals.
Mom-and-pop operations—or, in this case, older-married-woman/young-single-man operations—woul
d then bid for the jobs, and the competition was so intense that the quotes would be driven rid
iculously low. Factor in the cut that the winning contractor would have to pay to the work port
al, and the money was barely enough for an adult to survive on, let alone a family. On top of t
he lack of financial reward, there was also a humiliating lack of credit: the freelancers could
 rarely mention what projects they’d done, because the ad agency or PR firm would claim to hav
e developed it all in-house.
I got to know a lot about the world, particularly the business world, with Mae as my boss. She 
was strikingly canny, working twice as hard as her peers to make it in what was then a fairly m
acho industry, where every other client was out to screw you for free labor. This culture of ca
sual exploitation incentivized freelancers to find ways to hack around the system, and Mae had 
a talent for managing her relationships in such a way as to bypass the work portals. She tried 
to cut out the middlemen and third parties and deal directly with the largest clients possible.
 She was wonderful at this, particularly after my help on the technical side allowed her to foc
us exclusively on the business and art. She parlayed her illustration skills into logo design a
nd offered basic branding services. As for my work, the methods and coding were simple enough f
or me to pick up on the fly, and although they could be brutally repetitive, I wasn’t complain
ing. I took to even the most menial Notepad++ job with pleasure. It’s amazing what you do for 
love, especially when it’s unrequited.
I can’t help but wonder whether Mae was fully aware of my feelings for her all along, and simp
ly leveraged them to her best advantage. But if I was a victim, I was a willing one, and my tim
e under her left me better off.
Still, about a year into my tenure with Squirrelling Industries, I realized I had to plan for m
y future. Professional industry certifications for the IT sector were becoming hard to ignore. 
Most job listings and contracts for advanced work were beginning to require that applicants be 
officially accredited by major tech companies like IBM and Cisco in the use and service of thei
r products. At least, that was the gist of a radio commercial that I kept hearing. One day, com
ing home from my commute after hearing the commercial for what must have been the hundredth tim
e, I found myself dialing the 1-800 number and signing up for the Microsoft certification cours
e that was being offered by the Computer Career Institute at Johns Hopkins University. The enti
re operation, from its embarrassingly high cost to its location at a “satellite campus” inste
ad of at the main university, had the faint whiff of a scam, but I didn’t care. It was a naked
ly transactional affair—one that would allow Microsoft to impose a tax on the massively rising
 demand for IT folks, HR managers to pretend that an expensive piece of paper could distinguish
 bona fide pros from filthy charlatans, and nobodies like me to put the magic words “Johns Hop
kins” on their résumé and jump to the front of the hiring line.
The certification credentials were being adopted as industry standard almost as quickly as the 
industry could invent them. An “A+ Certification” meant that you were able to service and rep
air computers. A “Net+ Certification” meant that you were able to handle some basic networkin
g. But these were just ways to become the guy who worked the Help Desk. The best pieces of pape
r were grouped under the rubric of the Microsoft Certified Professional series. There was the e
ntry-level MCP, the Microsoft Certified Professional; the more accomplished MCSA, the Microsoft
 Certified Systems Administrator; and the top piece of printed-out technical credibility, the M
CSE, Microsoft Certified Systems Engineer. This was the brass ring, the guaranteed meal ticket.
 At the lowest of the low end, an MCSE’s starting salary was $40,000 per year, a sum that—at 
the turn of the millennium and the age of seventeen—I found astonishing. But why not? Microsof
t was trading above $100 per share, and Bill Gates had just been named the richest man in the w
orld.
In terms of technical know-how, the MCSE wasn’t the easiest to get, but it also didn’t requir
e what most self-respecting hackers would consider unicorn genius either. In terms of time and 
money, the commitment was considerable. I had to take seven separate tests, which cost $150 eac
h, and pay something like $18,000 in tuition to Hopkins for the full battery of prep classes, w
hich—true to form—I didn’t finish, opting to go straight to the testing after I felt I’d ha
d enough. Unfortunately, Hopkins didn’t give refunds.
With payments looming on my tuition loan, I now had a more practical reason to spend time with 
Mae: money. I asked her to give me more hours. She agreed, and asked me to start coming in at 9
:00 a.m. It was an egregiously early hour, especially for a freelancer, which was why I was run
ning late one Tuesday morning.
I was speeding down Route 32 under a beautiful Microsoft-blue sky, trying not to get caught by 
any speed traps. With a little luck, I’d roll into Mae’s sometime before 9:30, and—with my w
indow down and my hand riding the wind—it felt like a lucky day. I had the talk radio cranked 
and was waiting for the news to switch to the traffic.
Just as I was about to take the Canine Road shortcut into Fort Meade, an update broke through a
bout a plane crash in New York City.
Mae came to the door and I followed her up the stairs from the dim entryway to the cramped offi
ce next to her bedroom. There wasn’t much to it: just our two desks side by side, a drawing ta
ble for her art, and a cage for her squirrels. Though I was slightly distracted by the news, we
 had work to do. I forced myself to focus on the task at hand. I was just opening the project’
s files in a simple text editor—we wrote the code for websites by hand—when the phone rang.
Mae picked up. “What? Really?”
Because we were sitting so close together, I could hear her husband’s voice. And he was yellin
g.
Mae’s expression turned to alarm, and she loaded a news site on her computer. The only TV was 
downstairs. I was reading the site’s report about a plane hitting one of the Twin Towers of th
e World Trade Center, when Mae said, “Okay. Wow. Okay,” and hung up.
She turned to me. “A second plane just hit the other tower.”
Until that moment, I’d thought it had been an accident.
Mae said, “Norm thinks they’re going to close the base.”
“Like, the gates?” I said. “Seriously?” The scale of what had happened had yet to hit me. I
 was thinking about my commute.
“Norm said you should go home. He doesn’t want you to get stuck.”
I sighed, and saved the work I’d barely started. Just when I got up to leave, the phone rang a
gain, and this time the conversation was even shorter. Mae was pale.
“You’re not going to believe this.”
Pandemonium, chaos: our most ancient forms of terror. They both refer to a collapse of order an
d the panic that rushes in to fill the void. For as long as I live, I’ll remember retracing my
 way up Canine Road—the road past the NSA’s headquarters—after the Pentagon was attacked. Ma
dness poured out of the agency’s black glass towers, a tide of yelling, ringing cell phones, a
nd cars revving up in the parking lots and fighting their way onto the street. At the moment of
 the worst terrorist attack in American history, the staff of the NSA—the major signals intell
igence agency of the American IC—was abandoning its work by the thousands, and I was swept up 
in the flood.
NSA director Michael Hayden issued the order to evacuate before most of the country even knew w
hat had happened. Subsequently, the NSA and the CIA—which also evacuated all but a skeleton cr
ew from its own headquarters on 9/11—would explain their behavior by citing a concern that one
 of the agencies might potentially, possibly, perhaps be the target of the fourth and last hija
cked airplane, United Airlines Flight 93, rather than, say, the White House or Capitol.
I sure as hell wasn’t thinking about the next likeliest targets as I crawled through the gridl
ock, with everyone trying to get their cars out of the same parking lot simultaneously. I wasn
’t thinking about anything at all. What I was doing was obediently following along, in what to
day I recall as one totalizing moment—a clamor of horns (I don’t think I’d ever heard a car 
horn at an American military installation before) and out-of-phase radios shrieking the news of
 the South Tower’s collapse while the drivers steered with their knees and feverishly pressed 
redial on their phones. I can still feel it—the present-tense emptiness every time my call was
 dropped by an overloaded cell network, and the gradual realization that, cut off from the worl
d and stalled bumper to bumper, even though I was in the driver’s seat, I was just a passenger
.
The stoplights on Canine Road gave way to humans, as the NSA’s special police went to work dir
ecting traffic. In the ensuing hours, days, and weeks they’d be joined by convoys of Humvees t
opped with machine guns, guarding new roadblocks and checkpoints. Many of these new security me
asures became permanent, supplemented by endless rolls of wire and massive installations of sur
veillance cameras. With all this security, it became difficult for me to get back on base and d
rive past the NSA—until the day I was employed there.
These trappings of what would be called the War on Terror weren’t the only reason I gave up on
 Mae after 9/11, but they certainly played a part. The events of that day had left her shaken. 
In time, we stopped working together and grew distant. I’d chat her up occasionally, only to f
ind that my feelings had changed and I’d changed, too. By the time Mae left Norm and moved to 
California, she felt like a stranger to me. She was too opposed to the war.
8
9/12
Try to remember the biggest family event you’ve ever been to—maybe a family reunion. How many
 people were there? Maybe 30, 50? Though all of them together comprise your family, you might n
ot really have gotten the chance to know each and every individual member. Dunbar’s number, th
e famous estimate of how many relationships you can meaningfully maintain in life, is just 150.
 Now think back to school. How many people were in your class in grade school, and in high scho
ol? How many of them were friends, and how many others did you just know as acquaintances, and 
how many still others did you simply recognize? If you went to school in the United States, let
’s say it’s a thousand. It certainly stretches the boundaries of what you could say are all 
“your people,” but you may still have felt a bond with them.
Nearly three thousand people died on 9/11. Imagine everyone you love, everyone you know, even e
veryone with a familiar name or just a familiar face—and imagine they’re gone. Imagine the em
pty houses. Imagine the empty school, the empty classrooms. All those people you lived among, a
nd who together formed the fabric of your days, just not there anymore. The events of 9/11 left
 holes. Holes in families, holes in communities. Holes in the ground.
Now, consider this: over one million people have been killed in the course of America’s respon
se.
The two decades since 9/11 have been a litany of American destruction by way of American self-d
estruction, with the promulgation of secret policies, secret laws, secret courts, and secret wa
rs, whose traumatizing impact—whose very existence—the US government has repeatedly classifie
d, denied, disclaimed, and distorted. After having spent roughly half that period as an employe
e of the American Intelligence Community and roughly the other half in exile, I know better tha
n most how often the agencies get things wrong. I know, too, how the collection and analysis of
 intelligence can inform the production of disinformation and propaganda, for use as frequently
 against America’s allies as its enemies—and sometimes against its own citizens. Yet even giv
en that knowledge, I still struggle to accept the sheer magnitude and speed of the change, from
 an America that sought to define itself by a calculated and performative respect for dissent t
o a security state whose militarized police demand obedience, drawing their guns and issuing th
e order for total submission now heard in every city: “Stop resisting.”
This is why whenever I try to understand how the last two decades happened, I return to that Se
ptember—to that ground-zero day and its immediate aftermath. To return to that fall means comi
ng up against a truth darker than the lies that tied the Taliban to al-Qaeda and conjured up Sa
ddam Hussein’s illusory stockpile of WMDs. It means, ultimately, confronting the fact that the
 carnage and abuses that marked my young adulthood were born not only in the executive branch a
nd the intelligence agencies, but also in the hearts and minds of all Americans, myself include
d.
I remember escaping the panicked crush of the spies fleeing Fort Meade just as the North Tower 
came down. Once on the highway, I tried to steer with one hand while pressing buttons with the 
other, calling family indiscriminately and never getting through. Finally I managed to get in t
ouch with my mother, who at this point in her career had left the NSA and was working as a cler
k for the federal courts in Baltimore. They, at least, weren’t evacuating.
Her voice scared me, and suddenly the only thing in the world that mattered to me was reassurin
g her.
“It’s okay. I’m headed off base,” I said. “Nobody’s in New York, right?”
“I don’t—I don’t know. I can’t get in touch with Gran.”
“Is Pop in Washington?”
“He could be in the Pentagon for all I know.”
The breath went out of me. By 2001, Pop had retired from the Coast Guard and was now a senior o
fficial in the FBI, serving as one of the heads of its aviation section. This meant that he spe
nt plenty of time in plenty of federal buildings throughout DC and its environs.
Before I could summon any words of comfort, my mother spoke again. “There’s someone on the ot
her line. It might be Gran. I’ve got to go.”
When she didn’t call me back, I tried her number endlessly but couldn’t get through, so I wen
t home to wait, sitting in front of the blaring TV while I kept reloading news sites. The new c
able modem we had was quickly proving more resilient than all of the telecom satellites and cel
l towers, which were failing across the country.
My mother’s drive back from Baltimore was a slog through crisis traffic. She arrived in tears,
 but we were among the lucky ones. Pop was safe.
The next time we saw Gran and Pop, there was a lot of talk—about Christmas plans, about New Ye
ar’s plans—but the Pentagon and the towers were never mentioned.
My father, by contrast, vividly recounted his 9/11 to me. He was at Coast Guard Headquarters wh
en the towers were hit, and he and three of his fellow officers left their offices in the Opera
tions Directorate to find a conference room with a screen so they could watch the news coverage
. A young officer rushed past them down the hall and said, “They just bombed the Pentagon.” M
et with expressions of disbelief, the young officer repeated, “I’m serious—they just bombed 
the Pentagon.” My father hustled over to a wall-length window that gave him a view across the 
Potomac of about two-fifths of the Pentagon and swirling clouds of thick black smoke.
The more that my father related this memory, the more intrigued I became by the line: “They ju
st bombed the Pentagon.” Every time he said it, I recall thinking, “They”? Who were “They”
?
America immediately divided the world into “Us” and “Them,” and everyone was either with “
Us” or against “Us,” as President Bush so memorably remarked even while the rubble was still
 smoldering. People in my neighborhood put up new American flags, as if to show which side they
’d chosen. People hoarded red, white, and blue Dixie cups and stuffed them through every chain
-link fence on every overpass of every highway between my mother’s home and my father’s, to s
pell out phrases like UNITED WE STAND and STAND TOGETHER NEVER FORGET.
I sometimes used to go to a shooting range and now alongside the old targets, the bull’s-eyes 
and flat silhouettes, were effigies of men in Arab headdress. Guns that had languished for year
s behind the dusty glass of the display cases were now marked SOLD. Americans also lined up to 
buy cell phones, hoping for advance warning of the next attack, or at least the ability to say 
good-bye from a hijacked flight.
Nearly a hundred thousand spies returned to work at the agencies with the knowledge that they’
d failed at their primary job, which was protecting America. Think of the guilt they were feeli
ng. They had the same anger as everybody else, but they also felt the guilt. An assessment of t
heir mistakes could wait. What mattered most at that moment was that they redeem themselves. Me
anwhile, their bosses got busy campaigning for extraordinary budgets and extraordinary powers, 
leveraging the threat of terror to expand their capabilities and mandates beyond the imaginatio
n not just of the public but even of those who stamped the approvals.
September 12 was the first day of a new era, which America faced with a unified resolve, streng
thened by a revived sense of patriotism and the goodwill and sympathy of the world. In retrospe
ct, my country could have done so much with this opportunity. It could have treated terror not 
as the theological phenomenon it purported to be, but as the crime it was. It could have used t
his rare moment of solidarity to reinforce democratic values and cultivate resilience in the no
w-connected global public.
Instead, it went to war.
The greatest regret of my life is my reflexive, unquestioning support for that decision. I was 
outraged, yes, but that was only the beginning of a process in which my heart completely defeat
ed my rational judgment. I accepted all the claims retailed by the media as facts, and I repeat
ed them as if I were being paid for it. I wanted to be a liberator. I wanted to free the oppres
sed. I embraced the truth constructed for the good of the state, which in my passion I confused
 with the good of the country. It was as if whatever individual politics I’d developed had cra
shed—the anti-institutional hacker ethos instilled in me online, and the apolitical patriotism
 I’d inherited from my parents, both wiped from my system—and I’d been rebooted as a willing
 vehicle of vengeance. The sharpest part of the humiliation comes from acknowledging how easy t
his transformation was, and how readily I welcomed it.
I wanted, I think, to be part of something. Prior to 9/11, I’d been ambivalent about serving b
ecause it had seemed pointless, or just boring. Everyone I knew who’d served had done so in th
e post–Cold War world order, between the fall of the Berlin Wall and the attacks of 2001. In t
hat span, which coincided with my youth, America lacked for enemies. The country I grew up in w
as the sole global superpower, and everything seemed—at least to me, or to people like me—pro
sperous and settled. There were no new frontiers to conquer or great civic problems to solve, e
xcept online. The attacks of 9/11 changed all that. Now, finally, there was a fight.
My options dismayed me, however. I thought I could best serve my country behind a terminal, but
 a normal IT job seemed too comfortable and safe for this new world of asymmetrical conflict. I
 hoped I could do something like in the movies or on TV—those hacker-versus-hacker scenes with
 walls of virus-warning blinkenlights, tracking enemies and thwarting their schemes. Unfortunat
ely for me, the primary agencies that did that—the NSA, the CIA—had their hiring requirements
 written a half century ago and often rigidly required a traditional college degree, meaning th
at though the tech industry considered my AACC credits and MCSE certification acceptable, the g
overnment wouldn’t. The more I read around online, however, the more I realized that the post-
9/11 world was a world of exceptions. The agencies were growing so much and so quickly, especia
lly on the technical side, that they’d sometimes waive the degree requirement for military vet
erans. It’s then that I decided to join up.
You might be thinking that my decision made sense, or was inevitable, given my family’s record
 of service. But it didn’t and it wasn’t. By enlisting, I was as much rebelling against that 
well-established legacy as I was conforming to it—because after talking to recruiters from eve
ry branch, I decided to join the army, whose leadership some in my Coast Guard family had alway
s considered the crazy uncles of the US military.
When I told my mother, she cried for days. I knew better than to tell my father, who’d already
 made it very clear during hypothetical discussions that I’d be wasting my technical talents t
here. I was twenty years old; I knew what I was doing.
The day I left, I wrote my father a letter—handwritten, not typed—that explained my decision,
 and slipped it under the front door of his apartment. It closed with a statement that still ma
kes me wince. “I’m sorry, Dad,” I wrote, “but this is vital for my personal growth.”
9
X-Rays
I joined the army, as its slogan went, to be all I could be, and also because it wasn’t the Co
ast Guard. It didn’t hurt that I’d scored high enough on its entrance exams to qualify for a 
chance to come out of training as a Special Forces sergeant, on a track the recruiters called 1
8 X-Ray, which was designed to augment the ranks of the small flexible units that were doing th
e hardest fighting in America’s increasingly shadowy and disparate wars. The 18 X-Ray program 
was a considerable incentive, because traditionally, before 9/11, I would’ve had to already be
 in the army before being given a shot at attending the Special Forces’ exceedingly demanding 
qualification courses. The new system worked by screening prospective soldiers up front, identi
fying those with the highest levels of fitness, intelligence, and language-learning ability—th
e ones who might make the cut—and using the inducements of special training and a rapid advanc
e in rank to enlist promising candidates who might otherwise go elsewhere. I’d put in a couple
 of months of grueling runs to prepare—I was in great shape, but I always hated running—befor
e my recruiter called to say that my paperwork was approved: I was in, I’d made it. I was the 
first candidate he’d ever signed up for the program, and I could hear the pride and cheer in h
is voice when he told me that after training, I’d probably be made a Special Forces Communicat
ions, Engineering, or Intelligence sergeant.
Probably.
But first, I had to get through basic training at Fort Benning, Georgia.
I sat next to the same guy the whole way down there, from bus to plane to bus, Maryland to Geor
gia. He was enormous, a puffy bodybuilder somewhere between two and three hundred pounds. He ta
lked nonstop, his conversation alternating between describing how he’d slap the drill sergeant
 in the face if he gave him any lip and recommending the steroid cycles I should take to most e
ffectively bulk up. I don’t think he took a breath until we arrived at Fort Benning’s Sand Hi
ll training area—which in hindsight, I have to say, didn’t actually seem to have that much sa
nd.
The drill sergeants greeted us with withering fury and gave us nicknames based on our initial i
nfractions and grave mistakes, like getting off the bus wearing a brightly colored floral-patte
rned shirt, or having a name that could be modified slightly into something funnier. Soon I was
 Snowflake and my seatmate was Daisy and all he could do was clench his jaw—nobody dared to cl
ench a fist—and fume.
Once the drill sergeants noticed that Daisy and I were already acquainted, and that I was the l
ightest in the platoon, at five foot nine and 124 pounds, and he the heaviest, they decided to 
entertain themselves by pairing us together as often as possible. I still remember the buddy ca
rry, an exercise where you had to carry your supposedly wounded partner the length of a footbal
l field using a number of different methods like the “neck drag,” the “fireman,” and the es
pecially comedic “bridal carry.” When I had to carry Daisy, you couldn’t see me beneath his 
bulk. It would look like Daisy was floating, though I’d be under him sweating and cursing, str
aining to get his gigantic ass to the other side of the goal line before collapsing myself. Dai
sy would then get up with a laugh, drape me around his neck like a damp towel, and go skipping 
along like a child in the woods.
We were always dirty and always hurting, but within weeks I was in the best shape of my life. M
y slight build, which had seemed like a curse, soon became an advantage, because so much of wha
t we did were body-weight exercises. Daisy couldn’t climb a rope, which I scampered up like a 
chipmunk. He struggled to lift his incredible bulk above the bar for the bare minimum of pull-u
ps, while I could do twice the number with one arm. He could barely manage a handful of push-up
s before breaking a sweat, whereas I could do them with claps, or with just a single thumb. Whe
n we did the two-minute push-up tests, they stopped me early for maxing the score.
Everywhere we went, we marched—or ran. We ran constantly. Miles before mess, miles after mess,
 down roads and fields and around the track, while the drill sergeant called cadence:
I went to the desert
where the terrorists run
pulled out my machete
pulled out my gun.
Left, right, left, right—kill kill kill!
Mess with us and you know we will!
I went to the caves
where the terrorists hide
pulled out a grenade
and threw it inside.
Left, right, left, right—kill kill kill!
Mess with us and you know we will!
* * *
RUNNING IN UNIT formation, calling cadence—it lulls you, it puts you outside yourself, filling
 your ears with the din of dozens of men echoing your own shouting voice and forcing your eyes 
to fix on the footfalls of the runner in front of you. After a while you don’t think anymore, 
you merely count, and your mind dissolves into the rank and file as you pace out mile after mil
e. I would say it was serene if it wasn’t so deadening. I would say I was at peace if I weren
’t so tired. This was precisely as the army intended. The drill sergeant goes unslapped not so
 much because of fear but because of exhaustion: he’s never worth the effort. The army makes i
ts fighters by first training the fight out of them until they’re too weak to care, or to do a
nything besides obey.
It was only at night in the barracks that we could get some respite, which we had to earn by to
eing the line in front of our bunks, reciting the Soldier’s Creed, and then singing “The Star
-Spangled Banner.” Daisy would always forget the words. Also, he was tone-deaf.
Some guys would stay up late talking about what they were going to do to bin Laden once they fo
und him, and they were all sure they were going to find him. Most of their fantasies had to do 
with decapitation, castration, or horny camels. Meanwhile, I’d have dreams about running, not 
through the lush and loamy Georgia landscape but through the desert.
Sometime during the third or fourth week we were out on a land navigation movement, which is wh
en your platoon goes into the woods and treks over variegated terrain to predetermined coordina
tes, clambering over boulders and wading across streams, with just a map and a compass—no GPS,
 no digital technology. We’d done versions of this movement before, but never in full kit, wit
h each of us lugging a rucksack stuffed with around fifty pounds of gear. Worse still, the raw 
boots the army had issued me were so wide that I floated in them. I felt my toes blister even a
s I set out, loping across the range.
Toward the middle of the movement, I was on point and scrambled atop a storm-felled tree that a
rched over the path at about chest height so that I could shoot an azimuth to check our bearing
s. After confirming that we were on track, I went to hop down, but with one foot extended I not
iced the coil of a snake directly below me. I’m not exactly a naturalist, so I don’t know wha
t species of snake it was, but then again, I didn’t really care. Kids in North Carolina grow u
p being told that all snakes are deadly and I wasn’t about to start doubting it now.
Instead, I started trying to walk on air. I widened the stride of my outstretched foot, once, t
wice, twisting for the extra distance, when suddenly I realized I was falling. When my feet hit
 the ground, some distance beyond the snake, a fire shot up my legs that was more painful than 
any viper bite I could imagine. A few stumbling steps, which I had to take in order to regain m
y balance, told me that something was wrong. Grievously wrong. I was in excruciating pain, but 
I couldn’t stop, because I was in the army and the army was in the middle of the woods. I gath
ered my resolve, pushed the pain away, and just focused on maintaining a steady pace—left, rig
ht, left, right—relying on the rhythm to distract me.
It got harder to walk as I went on, and although I managed to tough it out and finish, the only
 reason was that I didn’t have a choice. By the time I got back to the barracks, my legs were 
numb. My rack, or bunk, was up top, and I could barely get myself into it. I had to grab its po
st, hoist up my torso like I was getting out of a pool, and drag my lower half in after.
The next morning I was torn from a fitful sleep by the clanking of a metal trash can being thro
wn down the squad bay, a wake-up call that meant someone hadn’t done their job to the drill se
rgeant’s satisfaction. I shot up automatically, swinging myself over the edge and springing to
 the floor. When I landed, my legs gave way. They crumpled and I fell. It was like I had no leg
s at all.
I tried to get up, grabbing for the lower bunk to try my hoist-by-the-arms maneuver again, but 
as soon as I moved my legs every muscle in my body seized and I sank down immediately.
Meanwhile a crowd had gathered around me, with laughter that turned to concern and then to sile
nce as the drill sergeant approached. “What’s the matter with you, broke-dick?” he said. “G
et up off my floor before I make you a part of it, permanently.” When he saw the agony flash a
cross my face as I immediately and unwisely struggled to respond to his commands, he put his ha
nd to my chest to stop me. “Daisy! Get Snowflake here down to the bench.” Then he crouched do
wn over me, as if he didn’t want the others to hear him being gentle, and said in a quiet rasp
, “As soon as it opens, Private, you’re going to crutch your broken ass to Sick Call,” which
 is where the army sends its injured to be abused by professionals.
There’s a major stigma about getting injured in the army, mostly because the army is dedicated
 to making its soldiers feel invincible but also because it likes to protect itself from accusa
tions of mis-training. This is why almost all training-injury victims are treated like whiners 
or, worse, malingerers.
After he carried me down to the bench, Daisy had to go. He wasn’t hurt, and those of us who we
re had to be kept separated. We were the untouchables, the lepers, the soldiers who couldn’t t
rain because of anything from sprains, lacerations, and burns to broken ankles and deep necroti
zed spider bites. My new battle buddies would now come from this bench of shame. A battle buddy
 is the person who, by policy, goes everywhere you go, just as you go everywhere they go, if th
ere’s even the remotest chance that either of you might be alone. Being alone might lead to th
inking, and thinking can cause the army problems.
The battle buddy assigned to me was a smart, handsome, former catalog model Captain America typ
e who’d injured his hip about a week earlier but hadn’t attended to it until the pain had bec
ome unbearable and left him just as gimpy as me. Neither of us felt up to talking, so we crutch
ed along in grim silence—left, right, left, right, but slowly. At the hospital I was X-rayed a
nd told that I had bilateral tibial fractures. These are stress fractures, fissures on the surf
ace of the bones that can deepen with time and pressure until they crack the bones down to the 
marrow. The only thing I could do to help my legs heal was to get off my feet and stay off them
. It was with those orders that I was dismissed from the examination room to get a ride back to
 the battalion.
Except I couldn’t go yet, because I couldn’t leave without my battle buddy. He’d gone in to 
be X-rayed after me and hadn’t returned. I assumed he was still being examined, so I waited. A
nd waited. Hours passed. I spent the time reading newspapers and magazines, an unthinkable luxu
ry for someone in basic training.
A nurse came over and said my drill sergeant was on the phone at the desk. By the time I hobble
d over to take the call, he was livid. “Snowflake, you enjoying your reading? Maybe you could 
get some pudding while you’re at it, and some copies of Cosmo for the girls? Why in the hell h
aven’t you two dirtbags left yet?”
“Drill Sarn”—that’s how everybody said it in Georgia, where my Southern accent had resurfac
ed for the moment—“I’m still waiting on my battle buddy, Drill Sarn.”
“And where the fuck is he, Snowflake?”
“Drill Sarn, I don’t know. He went into the examination room and hasn’t come out, Drill Sarn
.”
He wasn’t happy with the answer, and barked even louder. “Get off your crippled ass and go fu
cking find him, goddamnit.”
I got up and crutched over to the intake counter to make inquiries. My battle buddy, they told 
me, was in surgery.
It was only toward evening, after a barrage of calls from the drill sergeant, that I found out 
what had happened. My battle buddy had been walking around on a broken hip for the past week, a
pparently, and if he hadn’t been taken into surgery immediately and had it screwed back togeth
er, he might have been incapacitated for life. Major nerves could have been severed, because th
e break was as sharp as a knife.
I was sent back to Fort Benning alone, back to the bench. Anybody on the bench for more than th
ree or four days was at serious risk of being “recycled”—forced to start basic training over
 from scratch—or, worse, of being transferred to the Medical Unit and sent home. These were gu
ys who’d dreamed of being in the army their entire lives, guys for whom the army had been thei
r only way out of cruel families and dead-end careers, who now had to face the prospect of fail
ure and a return to civilian life irreparably damaged.
We were the cast-offs, the walking wounded hellguard who had no other duty than to sit on a ben
ch in front of a brick wall twelve hours a day. We had been judged by our injuries as unfit for
 the army and now had to pay for this fact by being separated and shunned, as if the drill serg
eants feared we’d contaminate others with our weakness or with the ideas that had occurred to 
us while benched. We were punished beyond the pain of our injuries themselves, excluded from pe
tty joys like watching the fireworks on the Fourth of July. Instead, we pulled “fire guard” t
hat night for the empty barracks, a task that involved watching to make sure that the empty bui
lding didn’t burn down.
We pulled fire guard two to a shift, and I stood in the dark on my crutches, pretending to be u
seful, alongside my partner. He was a sweet, simple, beefy eighteen-year-old with a dubious, pe
rhaps self-inflicted injury. By his own account, he should never have enlisted to begin with. T
he fireworks were bursting in the distance while he told me how much of a mistake he’d made, a
nd how agonizingly lonely he was—how much he missed his parents and his home, their family far
m somewhere way out in Appalachia.
I sympathized, though there wasn’t much I could do but send him to speak to the chaplain. I tr
ied to offer advice, suck it up, it might be better once you’re used to it. But then he put hi
s bulk in front of me and, in an endearingly childlike way, told me point-blank that he was goi
ng AWOL—a crime in the military—and asked me whether I would tell anybody. It was only then t
hat I noticed he’d brought his laundry bag. He meant that he was going AWOL that very moment.
I wasn’t sure how to deal with the situation, beyond trying to talk some sense into him. I war
ned him that going AWOL was a bad idea, that he’d end up with a warrant out for his arrest and
 any cop in the country could pick him up for the rest of his life. But the guy only shook his 
head. Where he lived, he said, deep in the mountains, they didn’t even have cops. This, he sai
d, was his last chance to be free.
I understood, then, that his mind was made up. He was much more mobile than I was, and he was b
ig. If he ran, I couldn’t chase him; if I tried to stop him, he might snap me in half. All I c
ould do was report him, but if I did, I’d be penalized for having let the conversation get thi
s far without calling for reinforcements and beating him with a crutch.
I was angry. I realized I was yelling at him. Why didn’t he wait until I was in the latrine to
 make a break for it? Why was he putting me in this position?
He spoke softly. “You’re the only one who listens,” he said, and began to cry.
The saddest part of that night is that I believed him. In the company of a quarter thousand, he
 was alone. We stood in silence as the fireworks popped and snapped in the distance. I sighed a
nd said, “I’ve got to go to the latrine. I’m going to be a while.” Then I limped away and d
idn’t look back.
That was the last I ever saw of him. I think I realized, then and there, that I wasn’t long fo
r the army, either.
My next doctor’s appointment was merely confirmation.
The doctor was a tall, lanky Southerner with a wry demeanor. After examining me and a new set o
f X-rays, he said that I was in no condition to continue with my company. The next phase of tra
ining was airborne, and he told me, “Son, if you jump on those legs, they’re going to turn in
to powder.”
I was despondent. If I didn’t finish the basic training cycle on time, I’d lose my slot in 18
X, which meant that I’d be reassigned according to the needs of the army. They could make me i
nto whatever they wanted: regular infantry, a mechanic, a desk jockey, a potato peeler, or—in 
my greatest nightmare—doing IT at the army’s help desk.
The doctor must have seen how dejected I was, because he cleared his throat and gave me a choic
e: I could get recycled and try my luck with reassignment, or he could write me a note putting 
me out on what was called “administrative separation.” This, he explained, was a special type
 of severance, not characterized as either honorable or dishonorable, only available to enliste
es who’d been in the services fewer than six months. It was a clean break, more like an annulm
ent than a divorce, and could be taken care of rather quickly.
I’ll admit, the idea appealed to me. In the back of my mind, I even thought it might be some k
ind of karmic reward for the mercy I’d shown to the Appalachian who’d gone AWOL. The doctor l
eft me to think, and when he came back in an hour I accepted his offer.
Shortly thereafter I was transferred to the Medical Unit, where I was told that in order for th
e administrative separation to go through I had to sign a statement attesting that I was all be
tter, that my bones were all healed. My signature was a requirement, but it was presented as a 
mere formality. Just a few scribbles and I could go.
As I held the statement in one hand and the pen in the other, a knowing smile crossed my face. 
I recognized the hack: what I’d thought was a kind and generous offer made by a caring army do
ctor to an ailing enlistee was the government’s way of avoiding liability and a disability cla
im. Under the military’s rules, if I’d received a medical discharge, the government would hav
e had to pay the bills for any issues stemming from my injury, any treatments and therapies it 
required. An administrative discharge put the burden on me, and my freedom hinged on my willing
ness to accept that burden.
I signed, and left that same day, on crutches that the army let me keep.
10
Cleared and in Love
I can’t remember exactly when, in the midst of my convalescence, I started thinking clearly ag
ain. First the pain had to ebb away, then gradually the depression ebbed, too, and after weeks 
of waking to no purpose beyond watching the clock change I slowly began paying attention to wha
t everyone around me was telling me: I was still young and I still had a future. I only felt th
at way myself, however, once I was finally able to stand upright and walk on my own. It was one
 of the myriad things that, like the love of my family, I’d simply taken for granted before.
As I made my first forays into the yard outside my mother’s condo, I came to realize that ther
e was another thing I’d taken for granted: my talent for understanding technology.
Forgive me if I come off like a dick, but there’s no other way to say this: I’d always been s
o comfortable with computers that I almost didn’t take my abilities seriously, and didn’t wan
t to be praised for them or to succeed because of them. I’d wanted, instead, to be praised for
 and to succeed at something else—something that was harder for me. I wanted to show that I wa
sn’t just a brain in a jar; I was also heart and muscle.
That explained my stint in the army. And over the course of my convalescence, I came to realize
 that although the experience had wounded my pride, it had improved my confidence. I was strong
er now, not afraid of the pain as much as grateful to be improved by it. Life beyond the barbed
 wire was getting easier. In the final reckoning, all the army had cost me was my hair, which h
ad grown back, and a limp, which was healing.
I was ready to face the facts: if I still had the urge to serve my country, and I most certainl
y did, then I’d have to serve it through my head and hands—through computing. That, and only 
that, would be giving my country my best. Though I wasn’t much of a veteran, having passed thr
ough the military’s vetting could only help my chances of working at an intelligence agency, w
hich was where my talents would be most in demand and, perhaps, most challenged.
Thus I became reconciled to what in retrospect was inevitable: the need for a security clearanc
e. There are, generally speaking, three levels of security clearance: from low to high, confide
ntial, secret, and top secret. The last of these can be further extended with a Sensitive Compa
rtmented Information qualifier, creating the coveted TS/SCI access required by positions with t
he top-tier agencies—CIA and NSA. The TS/SCI was by far the hardest access to get, but also op
ened the most doors, and so I went back to Anne Arundel Community College while I searched for 
jobs that would sponsor my application for the grueling Single Scope Background Investigation t
he clearance required. As the approval process for a TS/SCI can take a year or more, I heartily
 recommend it to anyone recovering from an injury. All it involves is filling out some paperwor
k, then sitting around with your feet up and trying not to commit too many crimes while the fed
eral government renders its verdict. The rest, after all, is out of your hands.
On paper, I was a perfect candidate. I was a kid from a service family, nearly every adult memb
er of which had some level of clearance; I’d tried to enlist and fight for my country until an
 unfortunate accident had laid me low. I had no criminal record, no drug habit. My only financi
al debt was the student loan for my Microsoft certification, and I hadn’t yet missed a payment
.
None of this stopped me, of course, from being nervous.
I drove to and from classes at AACC as the National Background Investigations Bureau rummaged t
hrough nearly every aspect of my life and interviewed almost everyone I knew: my parents, my ex
tended family, my classmates and friends. They went through my spotty school transcripts and, I
’m sure, spoke to a few of my teachers. I got the impression that they even spoke to Mae and N
orm, and to a guy I’d worked with one summer at a snow cone stand at Six Flags America. The go
al of all this background checking was not only to find out what I’d done wrong, but also to f
ind out how I might be compromised or blackmailed. The most important thing to the IC is not th
at you’re 100 percent perfectly clean, because if that were the case they wouldn’t hire anybo
dy. Instead, it’s that you’re robotically honest—that there’s no dirty secret out there tha
t you’re hiding that could be used against you, and thus against the agency, by an enemy power
.
This, of course, set me thinking—sitting stuck in traffic as all the moments of my life that I
 regretted went spinning around in a loop inside my head. Nothing I could come up with would ha
ve raised even an iota of eyebrow from investigators who are used to finding out that the middl
e-aged analyst at a think tank likes to wear diapers and get spanked by grandmothers in leather
. Still, there was a paranoia that the process created, because you don’t have to be a closet 
fetishist to have done things that embarrass you and to fear that strangers might misunderstand
 you if those things were exposed. I mean, I grew up on the Internet, for Christ’s sake. If yo
u haven’t entered something shameful or gross into that search box, then you haven’t been onl
ine very long—though I wasn’t worried about the pornography. Everybody looks at porn, and for
 those of you who are shaking your heads, don’t worry: your secret is safe with me. My worries
 were more personal, or felt more personal: the endless conveyor belt of stupid jingoistic thin
gs I’d said, and the even stupider misanthropic opinions I’d abandoned, in the process of gro
wing up online. Specifically, I was worried about my chat logs and forum posts, all the supreme
ly moronic commentary that I’d sprayed across a score of gaming and hacker sites. Writing pseu
donymously had meant writing freely, but often thoughtlessly. And since a major aspect of early
 Internet culture was competing with others to say the most inflammatory thing, I’d never hesi
tate to advocate, say, bombing a country that taxed video games, or corralling people who didn
’t like anime into reeducation camps. Nobody on those sites took any of it seriously, least of
 all myself.
When I went back and reread the posts, I cringed. Half the things I’d said I hadn’t even mean
t at the time—I’d just wanted attention—but I didn’t fancy my odds of explaining that to a 
gray-haired man in horn-rimmed glasses peering over a giant folder labeled PERMANENT RECORD. Th
e other half, the things I think I had meant at the time, were even worse, because I wasn’t th
at kid anymore. I’d grown up. It wasn’t simply that I didn’t recognize the voice as my own—
it was that I now actively opposed its overheated, hormonal opinions. I found that I wanted to 
argue with a ghost. I wanted to fight with that dumb, puerile, and casually cruel self of mine 
who no longer existed. I couldn’t stand the idea of being haunted by him forever, but I didn’
t know the best way to express my remorse and put some distance between him and me, or whether 
I should even try to do that. It was heinous to be so inextricably, technologically bound to a 
past that I fully regretted but barely remembered.
This might be the most familiar problem of my generation, the first to grow up online. We were 
able to discover and explore our identities almost totally unsupervised, with hardly a thought 
spared for the fact that our rash remarks and profane banter were being preserved for perpetuit
y, and that one day we might be expected to account for them. I’m sure everyone who had an Int
ernet connection before they had a job can sympathize with this—surely everyone has that one p
ost that embarrasses them, or that text or email that could get them fired.
My situation was somewhat different, however, in that most of the message boards of my day woul
d let you delete your old posts. I could put together one tiny little script—not even a real p
rogram—and all of my posts would be gone in under an hour. It would’ve been the easiest thing
 in the world to do. Trust me, I considered it.
But ultimately, I couldn’t. Something kept preventing me. It just felt wrong. To blank my post
s from the face of the earth wasn’t illegal, and it wouldn’t even have made me ineligible for
 a security clearance had anyone found out. But the prospect of doing so bothered me nonetheles
s. It would’ve only served to reinforce some of the most corrosive precepts of online life: th
at nobody is ever allowed to make a mistake, and anybody who does make a mistake must answer fo
r it forever. What mattered to me wasn’t so much the integrity of the written record but that 
of my soul. I didn’t want to live in a world where everyone had to pretend that they were perf
ect, because that was a world that had no place for me or my friends. To erase those comments w
ould have been to erase who I was, where I was from, and how far I’d come. To deny my younger 
self would have been to deny my present self’s validity.
I decided to leave the comments up and figure out how to live with them. I even decided that tr
ue fidelity to this stance would require me to continue posting. In time, I’d outgrow these ne
w opinions, too, but my initial impulse remains unshakable, if only because it was an important
 step in my own maturity. We can’t erase the things that shame us, or the ways we’ve shamed o
urselves, online. All we can do is control our reactions—whether we let the past oppress us, o
r accept its lessons, grow, and move on.
This was the first thing that you might call a principle that occurred to me during this idle b
ut formative time, and though it would prove difficult, I’ve tried to live by it.
Believe it or not, the only online traces of my existence whose past iterations have never give
n me worse than a mild sense of embarrassment were my dating profiles. I suspect this is becaus
e I’d had to write them with the expectation that their words truly mattered—since the entire
 purpose of the enterprise was for somebody in Real Life to actually care about them, and, by e
xtension, about me.
I’d joined a website called HotOrNot.com, which was the most popular of the rating sites of th
e early 2000s, like RateMyFace and AmIHot. (Their most effective features were combined by a yo
ung Mark Zuckerberg into a site called FaceMash, which later became Facebook.) HotOrNot was the
 most popular of these pre-Facebook rating sites for a simple reason: it was the best of the fe
w that had a dating component.
Basically, how it worked was that users voted on each other’s photos: Hot or Not. An extra fun
ction for registered users such as myself was the ability to contact other registered users, if
 each had rated the other’s photos Hot and clicked “Meet Me.” This banal and crass process i
s how I met Lindsay Mills, my partner and the love of my life.
Looking at the photos now, I’m amused to find that nineteen-year-old Lindsay was gawky, awkwar
d, and endearingly shy. To me at the time, though, she was a smoldering blonde, absolutely volc
anic. What’s more, the photos themselves were beautiful: they had a serious artistic quality, 
self-portraits more than selfies. They caught the eye and held it. They played coyly with light
 and shade. They even had a hint of meta fun: there was one taken inside the photo lab where sh
e worked, and another where she wasn’t even facing the camera.
I rated her Hot, a perfect ten. To my surprise, we matched (she rated me an eight, the angel), 
and in no time we were chatting. Lindsay was studying fine art photography. She had her own web
site, where she kept a journal and posted more shots: forests, flowers, abandoned factories, an
d—my favorite—more of her.
I scoured the Web and used each new fact I found about her to create a fuller picture: the town
 she was born in (Laurel, Maryland), her school’s name (MICA, the Maryland Institute College o
f Art). Eventually, I admitted to cyberstalking her. I felt like a creep, but Lindsay cut me of
f. “I’ve been searching about you, too, mister,” she said, and rattled off a list of facts a
bout me.
These were among the sweetest words I’d ever heard, yet I was reluctant to see her in person. 
We scheduled a date, and as the days ticked down my nervousness grew. It’s a scary proposition
, to take an online relationship off-line. It would be scary even in a world without ax murdere
rs and scammers. In my experience, the more you’ve communicated with someone online, the more 
disappointed you’ll be by meeting them in person. Things that are the easiest to say on-screen
 become the most difficult to say face-to-face. Distance favors intimacy: no one talks more ope
nly than when they’re alone in a room, chatting with an unseen someone alone in a different ro
om. Meet that person, however, and you lose your latitude. Your talk becomes safer and tamer, a
 common conversation on neutral ground.
Online, Lindsay and I had become total confidants, and I was afraid of losing our connection in
 person. In other words, I was afraid of being rejected.
I shouldn’t have been.
Lindsay—who’d insisted on driving—told me that she’d pick me up at my mother’s condo. The 
appointed hour found me standing outside in the twilight cold, guiding her by phone through the
 similarly named, identical-looking streets of my mother’s development. I was keeping an eye o
ut for a gold ’98 Chevy Cavalier, when suddenly I was blinded, struck in the face by a beam of
 light from the curb. Lindsay was flashing her brights at me across the snow.
“Buckle up.” Those were the first words that Lindsay said to me in person, as I got into her 
car. Then she said, “What’s the plan?”
It’s then that I realized that despite all the thinking I had been doing about her, I’d done 
no thinking whatsoever about our destination.
If I’d been in this situation with any other woman, I’d have improvised, covering for myself.
 But with Lindsay it was different. With Lindsay, it didn’t matter. She drove us down her favo
rite road—she had a favorite road—and we talked until we ran out of miles on Guilford and end
ed up in the parking lot of the Laurel Mall. We just sat in her car and talked.
It was perfection. Talking face-to-face turned out to be just an extension of all our phone cal
ls, emails, and chats. Our first date was a continuation of our first contact online and the st
art of a conversation that will last as long as we will. We talked about our families, or what 
was left of them. Lindsay’s parents were also divorced: her mother and father lived twenty min
utes apart, and as a kid Lindsay had been shuttled back and forth between them. She’d lived ou
t of a bag. Mondays, Wednesdays, and Fridays she slept in her room at her mother’s house. Tues
days, Thursdays, and Saturdays she slept in her room at her father’s house. Sundays were the d
ramatic day, because she had to choose.
She told me how bad my taste was, and criticized my date apparel: a button-down shirt decorated
 with metallic flames over a wifebeater and jeans (I’m sorry). She told me about the two other
 guys she was dating, whom she’d already mentioned online, and Machiavelli would’ve blushed a
t the ways in which I set about undermining them (I’m not sorry). I told her everything, too, 
including the fact that I wouldn’t be able to talk to her about my work—the work I hadn’t ev
en started. This was ludicrously pretentious, which she made obvious to me by nodding gravely.
I told her I was worried about the upcoming polygraph required for my clearance and she offered
 to practice with me—a goofy kind of foreplay. The philosophy she lived by was the perfect tra
ining: say what you want, say who you are, never be ashamed. If they reject you, it’s their pr
oblem. I’d never been so comfortable around someone, and I’d never been so willing to be call
ed out for my faults. I even let her take my photo.
I had her voice in my head on my drive to the NSA’s oddly named Friendship Annex complex for t
he final interview for my security clearance. I found myself in a windowless room, bound like a
 hostage to a cheap office chair. Around my chest and stomach were pneumographic tubes that mea
sured my breathing. Finger cuffs on my fingertips measured my electrodermal activity, a blood p
ressure cuff around my arm measured my heart rate, and a sensor pad on the chair detected my ev
ery fidget and shift. All of these devices—wrapped, clamped, cuffed, and belted tightly around
 me—were connected to the large black polygraph machine placed on the table in front of me.
Behind the table, in a nicer chair, sat the polygrapher. She reminded me of a teacher I once ha
d—and I spent much of the test trying to remember the teacher’s name, or trying not to. She, 
the polygrapher, began asking questions. The first ones were no-brainers: Was my name Edward Sn
owden? Was 6/21/83 my date of birth? Then: Had I ever committed a serious crime? Had I ever had
 a problem with gambling? Had I ever had a problem with alcohol or taken illegal drugs? Had I e
ver been an agent of a foreign power? Had I ever advocated the violent overthrow of the United 
States government? The only admissible answers were binary: “Yes” and “No.” I answered “No
” a lot, and kept waiting for the questions I’d been dreading. “Have you ever impugned the c
ompetence and character of the medical staff at Fort Benning online?” “What were you searchin
g for on the network of the Los Alamos Nuclear Laboratory?” But those questions never came and
, before I knew it, the test was over.
I’d passed with flying colors.
As required, I had to answer the series of questions three times in total, and all three times 
I passed, which meant that not only had I qualified for the TS/SCI, I’d also cleared the “ful
l scope polygraph”—the highest clearance in the land.
I had a girlfriend I loved and I was on top of the world.
I was twenty-two years old.
PART TWO
11
The System
I’m going to press Pause here, for a moment, to explain something about my politics at age twe
nty-two: I didn’t have any. Instead, like most young people, I had solid convictions that I re
fused to accept weren’t truly mine but rather a contradictory cluster of inherited principles.
 My mind was a mash-up of the values I was raised with and the ideals I encountered online. It 
took me until my late twenties to finally understand that so much of what I believed, or of wha
t I thought I believed, was just youthful imprinting. We learn to speak by imitating the speech
 of the adults around us, and in the process of that learning we wind up also imitating their o
pinions, until we’ve deluded ourselves into thinking that the words we’re using are our own.
My parents were, if not dismissive of politics in general, then certainly dismissive of politic
ians. To be sure, this dismissal had little in common with the disaffection of nonvoters or par
tisan disdain. Rather, it was a certain bemused detachment particular to their class, which nob
ler ages have called the federal civil service or the public sector, but which our own time ten
ds to refer to as the deep state or the shadow government. None of those epithets, however, rea
lly captures what it is: a class of career officials (incidentally, perhaps one of the last fun
ctional middle classes in American life) who—nonelected and non-appointed—serve or work in go
vernment, either at one of the independent agencies (from the CIA and NSA to the IRS, the FCC, 
and so on) or at one of the executive departments (State, Treasury, Defense, Justice, and the l
ike).
These were my parents, these were my people: a nearly three-million-strong professional governm
ent workforce dedicated to assisting the amateurs chosen by the electorate, and appointed by th
e elected, in fulfilling their political duties—or, in the words of the oath, in faithfully ex
ecuting their offices. These civil servants, who stay in their positions even as administration
s come and go, work as diligently under Republicans as under Democrats because they ultimately 
work for the government itself, providing core continuity and stability of rule.
These were also the people who, when their country went to war, answered the call. That’s what
 I had done after 9/11, and I found that the patriotism my parents had taught me was easily con
verted into nationalist fervor. For a time, especially in my run-up to joining the army, my sen
se of the world came to resemble the duality of the least sophisticated video games, where good
 and evil are clearly defined and unquestionable.
However, once I returned from the Army and rededicated myself to computing, I gradually came to
 regret my martial fantasies. The more I developed my abilities, the more I matured and realize
d that the technology of communications had a chance of succeeding where the technology of viol
ence had failed. Democracy could never be imposed at the point of a gun, but perhaps it could b
e sown by the spread of silicon and fiber. In the early 2000s the Internet was still just barel
y out of its formative period, and, to my mind at least, it offered a more authentic and comple
te incarnation of American ideals than even America itself. A place where everyone was equal? C
heck. A place dedicated to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness? Check, check, check. It
 helped that nearly all the major founding documents of Internet culture framed it in terms rem
iniscent of American history: here was this wild, open new frontier that belonged to anyone bol
d enough to settle it, swiftly becoming colonized by governments and corporate interests that w
ere seeking to regulate it for power and profit. The large companies that were charging large f
ees—for hardware, for software, for the long-distance phone calls that you needed back then to
 get online, and for knowledge itself, which was humanity’s common inheritance and so, by all 
rights, should have been freely available—were irresistible contemporary avatars of the Britis
h, whose harsh taxation ignited the fervor for independence.
This revolution wasn’t happening in history textbooks, but now, in my generation, and any of u
s could be part of it solely by dint of our abilities. This was thrilling—to participate in th
e founding of a new society, one based not on where we were born or how we grew up or our popul
arity at school but on our knowledge and technological ability. In school, I’d had to memorize
 the preamble to the U.S. Constitution: now its words were lodged in my memory alongside John P
erry Barlow’s “A Declaration of the Independence of Cyberspace,” which employed the same sel
f-evident, self-elect plural pronoun: “We are creating a world that all may enter without priv
ilege or prejudice accorded by race, economic power, military force, or station of birth. We ar
e creating a world where anyone, anywhere may express his or her beliefs, no matter how singula
r, without fear of being coerced into silence or conformity.”
This technological meritocracy was certainly empowering, but it could also be humbling, as I ca
me to understand when I first went to work in the Intelligence Community. The decentralization 
of the Internet merely emphasized the decentralization of computing expertise. I might have bee
n the top computer person in my family, or in my neighborhood, but to work for the IC meant tes
ting my skills against everyone in the country and the world. The Internet showed me the sheer 
quantity and variety of talent that existed, and made clear that in order to flourish I had to 
specialize.
There were a few different careers available to me as a technologist. I could have become a sof
tware developer, or, as the job is more commonly called, a programmer, writing the code that ma
kes computers work. Alternatively, I could have become a hardware or network specialist, settin
g up the servers in their racks and running the wires, weaving the massive fabric that connects
 every computer, every device, and every file. Computers and computer programs were interesting
 to me, and so were the networks that linked them together. But I was most intrigued by their t
otal functioning at a deeper level of abstraction, not as individual components but as an overa
rching system.
I thought about this a lot while I was driving, to and from Lindsay’s house and to and from AA
CC. Car time has always been thinking time for me, and commutes are long on the crowded Beltway
. To be a software developer was to run the rest stops off the exits and to make sure that all 
the fast-food and gas station franchises accorded with each other and with user expectations; t
o be a hardware specialist was to lay the infrastructure, to grade and pave the roads themselve
s; while to be a network specialist was to be responsible for traffic control, manipulating sig
ns and lights to safely route the time-crunched hordes to their proper destinations. To get int
o systems, however, was to be an urban planner, to take all of the components available and ens
ure their interaction to maximum effect. It was, pure and simple, like getting paid to play God
, or at least a tinpot dictator.
There are two main ways to be a systems guy. One is that you take possession of the whole of an
 existing system and maintain it, gradually making it more efficient and fixing it when it brea
ks. That position is called a systems administrator, or sysadmin. The second is that you analyz
e a problem, such as how to store data or how to search across databases, and solve it by engin
eering a solution from a combination of existing components or by inventing entirely new ones. 
This position is called a systems engineer. I eventually would do both of these jobs, working m
y way into administration and from there into engineering, oblivious throughout about how this 
intense engagement with the deepest levels of integration of computing technology was exerting 
an influence on my political convictions.
I’ll try not to be too abstract here, but I want you to imagine a system. It doesn’t matter w
hat system: it can be a computer system, an ecosystem, a legal system, or even a system of gove
rnment. Remember, a system is just a bunch of parts that function together as a whole, which mo
st people are only reminded of when something breaks. It’s one of the great chastening facts o
f working with systems that the part of a system that malfunctions is almost never the part in 
which you notice the malfunction. In order to find what caused the system to collapse, you have
 to start from the point where you spotted the problem, and trace the problem’s effects logica
lly through all of the system’s components. Because a sysadmin or engineer is responsible for 
such repairs, they have to be equally fluent in software, hardware, and networking. If the malf
unction turns out to be a software issue, the repair might involve scrolling through line after
 line of code in a UN General Assembly’s worth of programming languages. If it’s a hardware i
ssue, it might require going over a circuit board with a flashlight in the mouth and a solderin
g gun in hand, checking each connection. If networking is implicated, it might mean tracing eve
ry twist and turn of the cables that run above the ceiling and under the floor, connecting the 
distant data centers full of servers with an office full of laptops.
Because systems work according to instructions, or rules, such an analysis is ultimately a sear
ch for which rules failed, how, and why—an attempt to identify the specific points where the i
ntention of a rule was not adequately expressed by its formulation or application. Did the syst
em fail because something was not communicated, or because someone abused the system by accessi
ng a resource they weren’t allowed to, or by accessing a resource they were allowed to but usi
ng it exploitatively? Was the job of one component stopped, or impeded, by another? Did one pro
gram, or computer, or group of people take over more than their fair share of the system?
Over the course of my career, it became increasingly difficult for me to ask these questions ab
out the technologies I was responsible for and not about my country. And it became increasingly
 frustrating to me that I was able to repair the former but not the latter. I ended my time in 
Intelligence convinced that my country’s operating system—its government—had decided that it
 functioned best when broken.
12
Homo contractus
I had hoped to serve my country, but instead I went to work for it. This is not a trivial disti
nction. The sort of honorable stability offered to my father and Pop wasn’t quite as available
 to me, or to anyone of my generation. Both my father and Pop entered the service of their coun
try on the first day of their working lives and retired from that service on the last. That was
 the American government that was familiar to me, from earliest childhood—when it had helped t
o feed, clothe, and house me—to the moment when it had cleared me to go into the Intelligence 
Community. That government had treated a citizen’s service like a compact: it would provide fo
r you and your family, in return for your integrity and the prime years of your life.
But I came into the IC during a different age.
By the time I arrived, the sincerity of public service had given way to the greed of the privat
e sector, and the sacred compact of the soldier, officer, and career civil servant was being re
placed by the unholy bargain of Homo contractus, the primary species of US Government 2.0. This
 creature was not a sworn servant but a transient worker, whose patriotism was incentivized by 
a better paycheck and for whom the federal government was less the ultimate authority than the 
ultimate client.
During the American Revolution, it had made sense for the Continental Congress to hire privatee
rs and mercenaries to protect the independence of what was then barely a functioning republic. 
But for third-millennium hyperpower America to rely on privatized forces for the national defen
se struck me as strange and vaguely sinister. Indeed, today contracting is most often associate
d with its major failures, such as the fighting-for-hire work of Blackwater (which changed its 
name to Xe Services after its employees were convicted of killing fourteen Iraqi civilians, and
 then changed its name again to Academi after it was acquired by a group of private investors),
 or the torture-for-hire work of CACI and Titan (both of which supplied personnel who terrorize
d prisoners at Abu Ghraib).
These sensationalist cases can lead the public to believe that the government employs contracto
rs in order to maintain cover and deniability, off-loading the illegal or quasi-legal dirty wor
k to keep its hands clean and conscience clear. But that’s not entirely true, or at least not 
entirely true in the IC, which tends to focus less on deniability and more on never getting cau
ght in the first place. Instead, the primary purpose served by IC contracting is much more mund
ane: it’s a workaround, a loophole, a hack that lets agencies circumvent federal caps on hirin
g. Every agency has a head count, a legislative limit that dictates the number of people it can
 hire to do a certain type of work. But contractors, because they’re not directly employed by 
the federal government, aren’t included in that number. The agencies can hire as many of them 
as they can pay for, and they can pay for as many of them as they want—all they have to do is 
testify to a few select congressional subcommittees that the terrorists are coming for our chil
dren, or the Russians are in our emails, or the Chinese are in our power grid. Congress never s
ays no to this type of begging, which is actually a kind of threat, and reliably capitulates to
 the IC’s demands.
Among the documents that I provided to journalists was the 2013 Black Budget. This is a classif
ied budget in which over 68 percent of its money, $52.6 billion, was dedicated to the IC, inclu
ding funding for 107,035 IC employees—more than a fifth of whom, some 21,800 people, were full
-time contractors. And that number doesn’t even include the tens of thousands more employed by
 companies that have signed contracts (or subcontracts, or sub-subcontracts) with the agencies 
for a specific service or project. Those contractors are never counted by the government, not e
ven in the Black Budget, because to add their ranks to the contracting total would make one dis
turbing fact extraordinarily clear: the work of American Intelligence is done as frequently by 
private employees as it is by government servants.
To be sure, there are many, even in government, who maintain that this trickle-down scheme is a
dvantageous. With contractors, they say, the government can encourage competitive bidding to ke
ep costs down, and isn’t on the hook to pay pensions and benefits. But the real advantage for 
government officials is the conflict of interest inherent in the budgeting process itself. IC d
irectors ask Congress for money to rent contract workers from private companies, congresspeople
 approve that money, and then those IC directors and congresspeople are rewarded, after they re
tire from office, by being given high-paying positions and consultancies with the very companie
s they’ve just enriched. From the vantage of the corporate boardroom, contracting functions as
 governmentally assisted corruption. It’s America’s most legal and convenient method of trans
ferring public money to the private purse.
But however much the work of Intelligence is privatized, the federal government remains the onl
y authority that can grant an individual clearance to access classified information. And becaus
e clearance candidates must be sponsored in order to apply for clearance—meaning they must alr
eady have a job offer for a position that requires clearance—most contractors begin their care
ers in a government position. After all, it’s rarely worth the expense for a private company t
o sponsor your clearance application and then pay you to wait around for a year for the governm
ent’s approval. It makes more financial sense for a company to just hire an already-cleared go
vernment employee. The situation created by this economy is one in which government bears all t
he burdens of background checks but reaps few of the benefits. It must do all of the work and a
ssume all of the expense of clearing a candidate, who, the moment they have their clearance, mo
re often than not bolts for the door, exchanging the blue badge of the government employee for 
the green badge of the contractor. The joke was that the green symbolized “money.”
The government job that had sponsored me for my TS/SCI clearance wasn’t the one I wanted, but 
the one I could find: I was officially an employee of the state of Maryland, working for the Un
iversity of Maryland at College Park. The university was helping the NSA open a new institution
 called CASL, the Center for Advanced Study of Language.
CASL’s ostensible mission was to study how people learned languages and to develop computer-as
sisted methods to help them do so more quickly and better. The hidden corollary of this mission
 was that the NSA also wanted to develop ways to improve computer comprehension of language. If
 the other agencies were having difficulties finding competent Arabic (and Farsi and Dari and P
ashto and Kurdish) speakers who passed their often ridiculous security checks to translate and 
interpret on the ground—I know too many Americans rejected merely because they had an inconven
ient distant cousin they’d never even met—the NSA was having its own tough time ensuring that
 its computers could comprehend and analyze the massive amount of foreign-language communicatio
ns that they were intercepting.
I don’t have a more granular idea of the kinds of things that CASL was supposed to do, for the
 simple reason that when I showed up for work with my bright, shiny clearance, the place wasn’
t even open yet. In fact, its building was still under construction. Until it was finished and 
the tech was installed, my job was essentially that of a night-shift security guard. My respons
ibilities were limited to showing up every day to patrol the empty halls after the construction
 workers—those other contractors—were finished, making sure that nobody burned down the build
ing or broke in and bugged it. I spent hour after hour making rounds through the half-completed
 shell, inspecting the day’s progress: trying out the chairs that had just been installed in t
he state-of-the-art auditorium, casting stones back and forth across the suddenly graveled roof
, admiring the new drywall, and literally watching the paint dry.
This is the life of after-hours security at a top secret facility, and truthfully I didn’t min
d it. I was getting paid to do basically nothing but wander in the dark with my thoughts, and I
 had all the time in the world to use the one functioning computer that I had access to on the 
premises to search for a new position. During the daytime, I caught up on my sleep and went out
 on photography expeditions with Lindsay, who—thanks to my wooing and scheming—had finally du
mped her other boyfriends.
At the time I was still naive enough to think that my position with CASL would be a bridge to a
 full-time federal career. But the more I looked around, the more I was amazed to find that the
re were very few opportunities to serve my country directly, at least in a meaningful technical
 role. I had a better chance of working as a contractor for a private company that served my co
untry for profit; and I had the best chance, it turned out, of working as a subcontractor for a
 private company that contracted with another private company that served my country for profit
. The realization was dizzying.
It was particularly bizarre to me that most of the systems engineering and systems administrati
on jobs that were out there were private, because these positions came with almost universal ac
cess to the employer’s digital existence. It’s unimaginable that a major bank or even a socia
l media outfit would hire outsiders for systems-level work. In the context of the US government
, however, restructuring your intelligence agencies so that your most sensitive systems were be
ing run by somebody who didn’t really work for you was what passed for innovation.
* * *
THE AGENCIES WERE hiring tech companies to hire kids, and then they were giving them the keys t
o the kingdom, because—as Congress and the press were told—the agencies didn’t have a choice
. No one else knew how the keys, or the kingdom, worked. I tried to rationalize all this into a
 pretext for optimism. I swallowed my incredulity, put together a résumé, and went to the job
 fairs, which, at least in the early aughts, were the primary venues where contractors found ne
w work and government employees were poached. These fairs went by the dubious name of “Clearan
ce Jobs”—I think I was the only one who found that double meaning funny.
At the time, these events were held every month at the Ritz-Carlton in Tysons Corner, Virginia,
 just down the road from the CIA’s headquarters, or at one of the grubbier Marriott-type hotel
s near the NSA’s headquarters at Fort Meade. They were pretty much like any other job fair, I
’m told, with one crucial exception: here, it always felt like there were more recruiters than
 there were recruits. That should give you an indication of the industry’s appetite. The recru
iters paid a lot of money to be at these fairs, because these were the only places in the count
ry where everyone who walked through the door wearing their stickum name tag badge had supposed
ly already been prescreened online and cross-checked with the agencies—and so was presumed to 
already have a clearance, and probably also the requisite skills.
Once you left the well-appointed hotel lobby for the all-business ballroom, you entered Planet 
Contractor. Everybody would be there: this wasn’t the University of Maryland anymore—this was
 Lockheed Martin, BAE Systems, Booz Allen Hamilton, DynCorp, Titan, CACI, SAIC, COMSO, as well 
as a hundred other different acronyms I’d never heard of. Some contractors had tables, but the
 larger ones had booths that were fully furnished and equipped with refreshments.
After you handed a prospective employer a copy of your résumé and small-talked a bit, in a so
rt of informal interview, they’d break out their binders, which contained lists of all the gov
ernment billets they were trying to fill. But because this work touched on the clandestine, the
 billets were accompanied not by standardized job titles and traditional job descriptions but w
ith intentionally obscure, coded verbiage that was often particular to each contractor. One com
pany’s Senior Developer 3 might or might not be equivalent to another company’s Principal Ana
lyst 2, for example. Frequently the only way to differentiate among these positions was to note
 that each specified its own requirements of years of experience, level of certifications, and 
type of security clearance.
After the 2013 revelations, the US government would try to disparage me by referring to me as 
“only a contractor” or “a former Dell employee,” with the implication that I didn’t enjoy 
the same kinds of clearance and access as a blue-badged agency staffer. Once that discrediting 
characterization was established, the government proceeded to accuse me of “job-hopping,” hin
ting that I was some sort of disgruntled worker who didn’t get along with superiors or an exce
ptionally ambitious employee dead-set on getting ahead at all costs. The truth is that these we
re both lies of convenience. The IC knows better than anyone that changing jobs is part of the 
career track of every contractor: it’s a mobility situation that the agencies themselves creat
ed, and profit from.
In national security contracting, especially in tech contracting, you often find yourself physi
cally working at an agency facility, but nominally—on paper—working for Dell, or Lockheed Mar
tin, or one of the umpteen smaller firms that frequently get bought by a Dell or a Lockheed Mar
tin. In such an acquisition, of course, the smaller firm’s contracts get bought, too, and sudd
enly there’s a different employer and job title on your business card. Your day-to-day work, t
hough, remains the same: you’re still sitting at the agency facility, doing your tasks. Nothin
g has changed at all. Meanwhile, the dozen coworkers sitting to your left and right—the same c
oworkers you work with on the same projects daily—might technically be employed by a dozen dif
ferent companies, and those companies might still be a few degrees removed from the corporate e
ntities that hold the primary contracts with the agency.
I wish I remembered the exact chronology of my contracting, but I don’t have a copy of my rés
umé anymore—that file, Edward_Snowden_Resume.doc, is locked up in the Documents folder of one
 of my old home computers, since seized by the FBI. I do recall, however, that my first major c
ontracting gig was actually a subcontracting gig: the CIA had hired BAE Systems, which had hire
d COMSO, which hired me.
BAE Systems is a midsize American subdivision of British Aerospace, set up expressly to win con
tracts from the American IC. COMSO was basically its recruiter, a few folks who spent all their
 time driving around the Beltway trying to find the actual contractors (“the asses”) and sign
 them up (“put the asses in chairs”). Of all the companies I talked to at the job fairs, COMS
O was the hungriest, perhaps because it was among the smallest. I never learned what the compan
y’s acronym stood for, or even if it stood for anything. Technically speaking, COMSO would be 
my employer, but I never worked a single day at a COMSO office, or at a BAE Systems office, and
 few contractors ever would. I’d only work at CIA headquarters.
In fact, I only ever visited the COMSO office, which was in Greenbelt, Maryland, maybe two or t
hree times in my life. One of these was when I went down there to negotiate my salary and sign 
some paperwork. At CASL I’d been making around $30K/year, but that job didn’t have anything t
o do with technology, so I felt comfortable asking COMSO for $50K. When I named that figure to 
the guy behind the desk, he said, “What about $60K?”
At the time I was so inexperienced, I didn’t understand why he was trying to overpay me. I kne
w, I guess, that this wasn’t ultimately COMSO’s money, but I only later understood that some 
of the contracts that COMSO and BAE and others handled were of the type that’s called “cost-p
lus.” This meant that the middlemen contractors billed the agencies for whatever an employee g
ot paid, plus a fee of 3 to 5 percent of that every year. Bumping up salaries was in everyone’
s interest—everyone’s, that is, except the taxpayer’s.
The COMSO guy eventually talked me, or himself, up to $62K, as a result of my once again agreei
ng to work the night shift. He held out his hand and, as I shook it, he introduced himself to m
e as my “manager.” He went on to explain that the title was just a formality, and that I’d b
e taking my orders directly from the CIA. “If all goes well,” he said, “we’ll never meet ag
ain.”
In the spy movies and TV shows, when someone tells you something like that, it usually means th
at you’re about to go on a dangerous mission and might die. But in real spy life it just means
, “Congratulations on the job.” By the time I was out the door, I’m sure he’d already forgo
tten my face.
I left that meeting in a buoyant mood, but on the drive back, reality set in: this, I realized,
 was going to be my daily commute. If I was going to still live in Ellicott City, Maryland, in 
proximity to Lindsay, but work at the CIA in Virginia, my commute could be up to an hour and a 
half each way in Beltway gridlock, and that would be the end of me. I knew it wouldn’t take lo
ng before I’d start to lose my mind. There weren’t enough books on tape in the universe.
I couldn’t ask Lindsay to move down to Virginia with me because she was still just in her soph
omore year at MICA, and had class three days a week. We discussed this, and for cover referred 
to my job down there as COMSO—as in, “Why does COMSO have to be so far away?” Finally, we de
cided that I’d find a small place down there, near COMSO—just a small place to crash at durin
g the days while I worked at night, at COMSO—and then I’d come up to Maryland again every wee
kend, or she’d come down to me.
I set off to find that place, something smack in the middle of that Venn diagram overlap of che
ap enough that I could afford it and nice enough that Lindsay could survive it. It turned out t
o be a difficult search: Given the number of people who work at the CIA, and the CIA’s locatio
n in Virginia—where the housing density is, let’s say, semirural—the prices were through the
 roof. The 22100s are some of the most expensive zip codes in America.
Eventually, browsing on Craigslist, I found a room that was surprisingly within my budget, in a
 house surprisingly near—less than fifteen minutes from—CIA headquarters. I went to check it 
out, expecting a cruddy bachelor pad pigsty. Instead, I pulled up in front of a large glass-fro
nted McMansion, immaculately maintained with a topiary lawn that was seasonally decorated. I’m
 being completely serious when I say that as I approached the place, the smell of pumpkin spice
 got stronger.
A guy named Gary answered the door. He was older, which I expected from the “Dear Edward” ton
e of his email, but I hadn’t expected him to be so well dressed. He was very tall, with buzz-c
ut gray hair, and was wearing a suit, and over the suit, an apron. He asked me very politely if
 I didn’t mind waiting a moment. He was just then busy in the kitchen, where he was preparing 
a tray of apples, sticking cloves in them and dousing them with nutmeg, cinnamon, and sugar.
Once those apples were baking in the oven, Gary showed me the room, which was in the basement, 
and told me I could move in immediately. I accepted the offer and put down my security deposit 
and one month’s rent.
Then he told me the house rules, which helpfully rhymed:
No mess.
No pets.
No overnight guests.
I confess that I almost immediately violated the first rule, and that I never had any interest 
in violating the second. As for the third, Gary made an exception for Lindsay.
13
Indoc
You know that one establishing shot that’s in pretty much every spy movie and TV show that’s 
subtitled “CIA Headquarters, Langley, Virginia”? And then the camera moves through the marble
 lobby with the wall of stars and the floor with the agency’s seal? Well, Langley is the site
’s historical name, which the agency prefers Hollywood to use; CIA HQ is officially in McLean,
 Virginia; and nobody really comes through that lobby except VIPs or outsiders on a tour.
That building is the OHB, the Old Headquarters Building. The building where almost everybody wh
o works at the CIA enters is far less ready for its close-up: the NHB, the New Headquarters Bui
lding. My first day was one of the very few I spent there in daylight. That said, I spent most 
of the day underground—in a grimy, cinder-block-walled room with all the charm of a nuclear fa
llout shelter and the acrid smell of government bleach.
“So this is the Deep State,” one guy said, and almost everybody laughed. I think he’d been e
xpecting a circle of Ivy League WASPs chanting in hoods, whereas I’d been expecting a group of
 normie civil service types who resembled younger versions of my parents. Instead, we were all 
computer dudes—and yes, almost uniformly dudes—who were clearly wearing “business casual” f
or the first time in our lives. Some were tattooed and pierced, or bore evidence of having remo
ved their piercings for the big day. One still had punky streaks of dye in his hair. Almost all
 wore contractor badges, as green and crisp as new hundred-dollar bills. We certainly didn’t l
ook like a hermetic power-mad cabal that controlled the actions of America’s elected officials
 from shadowy subterranean cubicles.
This session was the first stage in our transformation. It was called the Indoc, or Indoctrinat
ion, and its entire point was to convince us that we were the elite, that we were special, that
 we had been chosen to be privy to the mysteries of state and to the truths that the rest of th
e country—and, at times, even its Congress and courts—couldn’t handle.
I couldn’t help but think while I sat through this Indoc that the presenters were preaching to
 the choir. You don’t need to tell a bunch of computer whizzes that they possess superior know
ledge and skills that uniquely qualify them to act independently and make decisions on behalf o
f their fellow citizens without any oversight or review. Nothing inspires arrogance like a life
time spent controlling machines that are incapable of criticism.
This, to my thinking, actually represented the great nexus of the Intelligence Community and th
e tech industry: both are entrenched and unelected powers that pride themselves on maintaining 
absolute secrecy about their developments. Both believe that they have the solutions for everyt
hing, which they never hesitate to unilaterally impose. Above all, they both believe that these
 solutions are inherently apolitical, because they’re based on data, whose prerogatives are re
garded as preferable to the chaotic whims of the common citizen.
Being indoctrinated into the IC, like becoming expert at technology, has powerful psychological
 effects. All of a sudden you have access to the story behind the story, the hidden histories o
f well-known, or supposedly well-known, events. That can be intoxicating, at least for a teetot
aler like me. Also, all of a sudden you have not just the license but the obligation to lie, co
nceal, dissemble, and dissimulate. This creates a sense of tribalism, which can lead many to be
lieve that their primary allegiance is to the institution and not to the rule of law.
I wasn’t thinking any of these thoughts at my Indoc session, of course. Instead, I was just tr
ying to keep myself awake as the presenters proceeded to instruct us on basic operational secur
ity practices, part of the wider body of spy techniques the IC collectively describes as “trad
ecraft.” These are often so obvious as to be mind-numbing: Don’t tell anyone who you work for
. Don’t leave sensitive materials unattended. Don’t bring your highly insecure cell phone int
o the highly secure office—or talk on it about work, ever. Don’t wear your “Hi, I work for t
he CIA” badge to the mall.
Finally, the litany ended, the lights came down, the PowerPoint was fired up, and faces appeare
d on the screen that was bolted to the wall. Everyone in the room sat upright. These were the f
aces, we were told, of former agents and contractors who, whether through greed, malice, incomp
etence, or negligence failed to follow the rules. They thought they were above all this mundane
 stuff and their hubris resulted in their imprisonment and ruin. The people on the screen, it w
as implied, were now in basements even worse than this one, and some would be there until they 
died.
All in all, this was an effective presentation.
I’m told that in the years since my career ended, this parade of horribles—of incompetents, m
oles, defectors, and traitors—has been expanded to include an additional category: people of p
rinciple, whistleblowers in the public interest. I can only hope that the twenty-somethings sit
ting there today are struck by the government’s conflation of selling secrets to the enemy and
 disclosing them to journalists when the new faces—when my face—pop up on the screen.
I came to work for the CIA when it was at the nadir of its morale. Following the intelligence f
ailures of 9/11, Congress and the executive had set out on an aggressive reorganization campaig
n. It included stripping the position of director of Central Intelligence of its dual role as b
oth head of the CIA and head of the entire American IC—a dual role that the position had held 
since the founding of the agency in the aftermath of World War II. When George Tenet was forced
 out in 2004, the CIA’s half-century supremacy over all of the other agencies went with him.
The CIA’s rank and file considered Tenet’s departure and the directorship’s demotion as mere
ly the most public symbols of the agency’s betrayal by the political class it had been created
 to serve. The general sense of having been manipulated by the Bush administration and then bla
med for its worst excesses gave rise to a culture of victimization and retrenchment. This was o
nly exacerbated by the appointment of Porter Goss, an undistinguished former CIA officer turned
 Republican congressman from Florida, as the agency’s new director—the first to serve in the 
reduced position. The installation of a politician was taken as a chastisement and as an attemp
t to weaponize the CIA by putting it under partisan supervision. Director Goss immediately bega
n a sweeping campaign of firings, layoffs, and forced retirements that left the agency understa
ffed and more reliant than ever on contractors. Meanwhile, the public at large had never had su
ch a low opinion of the agency, or such insight into its inner workings, thanks to all the leak
s and disclosures about its extraordinary renditions and black site prisons.
At the time, the CIA was broken into five directorates. There was the DO, the Directorate of Op
erations, which was responsible for the actual spying; the DI, the Directorate of Intelligence,
 which was responsible for synthesizing and analyzing the results of that spying; the DST, the 
Directorate of Science and Technology, which built and supplied computers, communications devic
es, and weapons to the spies and showed them how to use them; the DA, the Directorate of Admini
stration, which basically meant lawyers, human resources, and all those who coordinated the dai
ly business of the agency and served as a liaison to the government; and, finally, the DS, the 
Directorate of Support, which was a strange directorate and, back then, the largest. The DS inc
luded everyone who worked for the agency in a support capacity, from the majority of the agency
’s technologists and medical doctors to the personnel in the cafeteria and the gym and the gua
rds at the gate. The primary function of the DS was to manage the CIA’s global communications 
infrastructure, the platform ensuring that the spies’ reports got to the analysts and that the
 analysts’ reports got to the administrators. The DS housed the employees who provided technic
al support throughout the agency, maintained the servers, and kept them secure—the people who 
built, serviced, and protected the entire network of the CIA and connected it with the networks
 of the other agencies and controlled their access.
These were, in short, the people who used technology to link everything together. It should be 
no surprise, then, that the bulk of them were young. It should also be no surprise that most of
 them were contractors.
My team was attached to the Directorate of Support and our task was to manage the CIA’s Washin
gton-Metropolitan server architecture, which is to say the vast majority of the CIA servers in 
the continental United States—the enormous halls of expensive “big iron” computers that comp
rised the agency’s internal networks and databases, all of its systems that transmitted, recei
ved, and stored intelligence. Though the CIA had dotted the country with relay servers, many of
 the agency’s most important servers were situated on-site. Half of them were in the NHB, wher
e my team was located; the other half were in the nearby OHB. They were set up on opposite side
s of their respective buildings, so that if one side was blown up we wouldn’t lose too many ma
chines.
My TS/SCI security clearance reflected my having been “read into” a few different “compartme
nts” of information. Some of these compartments were SIGINT (signals intelligence, or intercep
ted communications), and another was HUMINT (human intelligence, or the work done and reports f
iled by agents and analysts)—the CIA’s work routinely involves both. On top of those, I was r
ead into a COMSEC (communications security) compartment that allowed me to work with cryptograp
hic key material, the codes that have traditionally been considered the most important agency s
ecrets because they’re used to protect all the other agency secrets. This cryptographic materi
al was processed and stored on and around the servers I was responsible for managing. My team w
as one of the few at the agency permitted to actually lay hands on these servers, and likely th
e only team with access to log in to nearly all othem.
In the CIA, secure offices are called “vaults,” and my team’s vault was located a bit past t
he CIA’s help desk section. During the daytime, the help desk was staffed by a busy contingent
 of older people, closer to my parents’ age. They wore blazers and slacks and even blouses and
 skirts; this was one of the few places in the CIA tech world at the time where I recall seeing
 a sizable number of women. Some of them had the blue badges that identified them as government
 employees, or, as contractors called them, “govvies.” They spent their shifts picking up ban
ks of ringing phones and talking people in the building or out in the field through their tech 
issues. It was a sort of IC version of call-center work: resetting passwords, unlocking account
s, and going by rote through the troubleshooting checklists. “Can you log out and back in?” 
“Is the network cable plugged in?” If the govvies, with their minimal tech experience, couldn
’t deal with a particular issue themselves, they’d escalate it to more specialized teams, esp
ecially if the problem was happening in the “Foreign Field,” meaning CIA stations overseas in
 places like Kabul or Baghdad or Bogotá or Paris.
I’m a bit ashamed to admit how proud I felt when I first walked through this gloomy array. I w
as decades younger than the help desk folks and heading past them into a vault to which they di
dn’t have access and never would. At the time it hadn’t yet occurred to me that the extent of
 my access meant that the process itself might be broken, that the government had simply given 
up on meaningfully managing and promoting its talent from within because the new contracting cu
lture meant they no longer had to care. More than any other memory I have of my career, this ro
ute of mine past the CIA help desk has come to symbolize for me the generational and cultural c
hange in the IC of which I was a part—the moment when the old-school prepster clique that trad
itionally staffed the agencies, desperate to keep pace with technologies they could not be both
ered to understand, welcomed a new wave of young hackers into the institutional fold and let th
em develop, have complete access to, and wield complete power over unparalleled technological s
ystems of state control.
In time I came to love the help desk govvies, who were kind and generous to me, and always appr
eciated my willingness to help even when it wasn’t my job. I, in turn, learned much from them,
 in bits and pieces, about how the larger organization functioned beyond the Beltway. Some of t
hem had actually worked out in the foreign field themselves once upon a time, like the agents t
hey now assisted over the phone. After a while, they’d come back home to the States, not alway
s with their families intact, and they’d been relegated to the help desk for the remaining yea
rs of their careers because they lacked the computer skills required to compete in an agency in
creasingly focused on expanding its technological capabilities.
I was proud to have won the govvies’ respect, and I was never quite comfortable with how many 
of my team members condescendingly pitied and even made fun of these bright and committed folks
—men and women who for low pay and little glory had given the agency years of their lives, oft
en in inhospitable and even outright dangerous places abroad, at the end of which their ultimat
e reward was a job picking up phones in a lonely hallway.
* * *
AFTER A FEW weeks familiarizing myself with the systems on the day shift, I moved to nights—6:
00 p.m. to 6:00 a.m.—when the help desk was staffed by a discreetly snoozing skeleton crew and
 the rest of the agency was pretty much dead.
At night, especially between, say, 10:00 p.m. and 4:00 a.m., the CIA was empty and lifeless, a 
vast and haunted complex with a postapocalyptic feel. All the escalators were stopped and you h
ad to walk them like stairs. Only half of the elevators were working, and the pinging sounds th
ey made, only barely audible during the bustle of daytime, now sounded alarmingly loud. Former 
CIA directors glared down from their portraits and the bald eagles seemed less like statues tha
n like living predators waiting patiently to swoop in for the kill. American flags billowed lik
e ghosts—spooks in red, white, and blue. The agency had recently committed to a new eco-friend
ly energy-saving policy and installed motion-sensitive overhead lights: the corridor ahead of y
ou would be swathed in darkness and the lights would switch on when you approached, so that you
 felt followed, and your footsteps would echo endlessly.
For twelve hours each night, three days on and two days off, I sat in the secure office beyond 
the help desk, among the twenty desks each bearing two or three computer terminals reserved for
 the sysadmins who kept the CIA’s global network online. Regardless of how fancy that might so
und, the job itself was relatively banal, and can basically be described as waiting for catastr
ophe to happen. The problems generally weren’t too difficult to solve. The moment something we
nt wrong, I had to log in to try to fix it remotely. If I couldn’t, I had to physically descen
d into the data center hidden a floor below my own in the New Headquarters Building—or walk th
e eerie half mile through the connecting tunnel over to the data center in the Old Headquarters
 Building—and tinker around with the machinery itself.
My partner in this task—the only other person responsible for the nocturnal functioning of the
 CIA’s entire server architecture—was a guy I’m going to call Frank. He was our team’s grea
t outlier and an exceptional personality in every sense. Besides having a political consciousne
ss (libertarian to the point of stockpiling Krugerrands) and an abiding interest in subjects ou
tside of tech (he read vintage mysteries and thrillers in paperback), he was a fifty-something 
been-there-done-that ex-navy radio operator who’d managed to graduate from the call center’s 
ranks thanks to being a contractor.
I have to say, when I first met Frank, I thought: Imagine if my entire life were like the night
s I spent at CASL. Because, to put it frankly, Frank did hardly any work at all. At least, that
 was the impression he liked to project. He enjoyed telling me, and everyone else, that he didn
’t really know anything about computing and didn’t understand why they’d put him on such an 
important team. He used to say that “contracting was the third biggest scam in Washington,” a
fter the income tax and Congress. He claimed he’d advised his boss that he’d be “next to use
less” when they suggested moving him to the server team, but they moved him just the same. By 
his own account, all he’d done at work for the better part of the last decade was sit around a
nd read books, though sometimes he’d also play games of solitaire—with a real deck of cards, 
not on the computer, of course—and reminisce about former wives (“she was a keeper”) and gir
lfriends (“she took my car but it was worth it”). Sometimes he’d just pace all night and rel
oad the Drudge Report.
When the phone rang to signal that something was broken, and bouncing a server didn’t fix it, 
he’d just report it to the day shift. Essentially, his philosophy (if you could call it that) 
was that the night shift had to end sometime and the day shift had a deeper bench. Apparently, 
however, the day shift had gotten tired of coming in to work every morning to find Frank’s fee
t up in front of the digital equivalent of a dumpster fire, and so I’d been hired.
For some reason, the agency had decided that it was preferable to bring me in than to let this 
old guy go. After a couple of weeks of working together, I was convinced that his continued emp
loyment had to be the result of some personal connection or favor. To test this hypothesis I tr
ied to draw Frank out, and asked him which CIA directors or other agency brass he’d been with 
in the navy. But my question only provoked a tirade about how basically none of the navy vets h
igh up at the agency had been enlisted men—they’d all been officers, which explained so much 
about the agency’s dismal record. This lecture went on and on, until suddenly a panicked expre
ssion came over his face and he jumped up and said, “I gotta change the tape!”
I had no idea what he was talking about. But Frank was already heading to the gray door at the 
back of our vault, which opened onto a dingy stairwell that gave direct access to the data cent
er itself—the humming, freezing night-black chamber that we sat directly on top of.
Going down into a server vault—especially the CIA’s—can be a disorienting experience. You de
scend into darkness blinking with green and red LEDs like an evil Christmas, vibrating with the
 whir of the industrial fans cooling the precious rack-mounted machinery to prevent it from mel
ting down. Being there was always a bit dizzying—even without a manic older guy cursing like t
he sailor he was as he dashed down the server hall.
Frank stopped by a shabby corner that housed a makeshift cubicle of reclaimed equipment, marked
 as belonging to the Directorate of Operations. Taking up almost the entirety of the sad, ricke
ty desk was an old computer. On closer inspection, it was something from the early ’90s, or ev
en the late ’80s, older than anything I remembered from my father’s Coast Guard lab—a comput
er so ancient that it shouldn’t even have been called a computer. It was more properly a machi
ne, running a miniature tape format that I didn’t recognize but was pretty sure would have bee
n welcomed by the Smithsonian.
Next to this machine was a massive safe, which Frank unlocked.
He fussed with the tape that was in the machine, pried it free, and put it in the safe. Then he
 took another antique tape out of the safe and inserted it into the machine as a replacement, t
hreading it through by touch alone. He carefully tapped a few times on the old keyboard—down, 
down, down, tab, tab, tab. He couldn’t actually see the effect of those keystrokes, because th
e machine’s monitor no longer worked, but he struck the Enter key with confidence.
I couldn’t figure out what was going on. But the itty-bitty tape began to tick-tick-tick and t
hen spin, and Frank grinned with satisfaction.
“This is the most important machine in the building,” he said. “The agency doesn’t trust th
is digital technology crap. They don’t trust their own servers. You know they’re always break
ing. But when the servers break down they risk losing what they’re storing, so in order not to
 lose anything that comes in during the day, they back everything up on tape at night.”
“So you’re doing a storage backup here?”
“A storage backup to tape. The old way. Reliable as a heart attack. Tape hardly ever crashes.
”
“But what’s on the tape? Like personnel stuff, or like the actual incoming intelligence?”
Frank put a hand to his chin in a thinking pose and pretended to take the question seriously. T
hen he said, “Man, Ed, I didn’t want to have to tell you. But it’s field reports from your g
irlfriend, and we’ve got a lot of agents filing. It’s raw intelligence. Very raw.”
He laughed his way upstairs, leaving me speechless and blushing in the darkness of the vault.
It was only when Frank repeated this same tape-changing ritual the next night, and the night af
ter that, and on every night we worked together thereafter, that I began to understand why the 
agency kept him around—and it wasn’t just for his sense of humor. Frank was the only guy will
ing to stick around between 6:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. who was also old enough to know how to hand
le that proprietary tape system. All the other techs who’d come up in the dark ages when tape 
was the medium now had families and preferred to be home with them at night. But Frank was a ba
chelor and remembered the world before the Enlightenment.
After I found a way to automate most of my own work—writing scripts to automatically update se
rvers and restore lost network connections, mostly—I started having what I came to call a Fran
k amount of time. Meaning, I had all night to do pretty much whatever I wanted. I passed a fair
 number of hours in long talks with Frank, especially about the more political stuff he was rea
ding: books about how the country should return to the gold standard, or about the intricacies 
of the flat tax. But there were always periods of every shift when Frank would disappear. He’d
 either put his head into a whodunit novel and not lift it until morning, or he’d go strolling
 the halls of the agency, hitting the cafeteria for a lukewarm slice of pizza or the gym to lif
t weights. I had my own way of keeping to myself, of course. I went online.
When you go online at the CIA, you have to check a box for a Consent to Monitoring Agreement, w
hich basically says that everything you do is being recorded and that you agree that you have n
o expectation of any privacy whatsoever. You end up checking this box so often that it becomes 
second nature. These agreements become invisible to you when you’re working at the agency, bec
ause they pop up constantly and you’re always trying to just click them down and get back to w
hat you were doing. This, to my mind, is a major reason why most IC workers don’t share civili
an concerns about being tracked online: not because they have any insider information about how
 digital surveillance helps to protect America, but because to those in the IC, being tracked b
y the boss just comes with the job.
Anyway, it’s not like there’s a lot to be found out there on the public Internet that’s more
 interesting than what the agency already has internally. Few realize this, but the CIA has its
 own Internet and Web. It has its own kind of Facebook, which allows agents to interact sociall
y; its own type of Wikipedia, which provides agents with information about agency teams, projec
ts, and missions; and its own internal version of Google—actually provided by Google—which al
lows agents to search this sprawling classified network. Every CIA component has its own websit
e on this network that discusses what it does and posts meeting minutes and presentations. For 
hours and hours every night, this was my education.
According to Frank, the first things everyone looks up on the CIA’s internal networks are alie
ns and 9/11, and that’s why, also according to Frank, you’ll never get any meaningful search 
results for them. I looked them up anyway. The CIA-flavored Google didn’t return anything inte
resting for either, but hey—maybe the truth was out there on another network drive. For the re
cord, as far as I could tell, aliens have never contacted Earth, or at least they haven’t cont
acted US intelligence. But al-Qaeda did maintain unusually close ties with our allies the Saudi
s, a fact that the Bush White House worked suspiciously hard to suppress as we went to war with
 two other countries.
Here is one thing that the disorganized CIA didn’t quite understand at the time, and that no m
ajor American employer outside of Silicon Valley understood, either: the computer guy knows eve
rything, or rather can know everything. The higher up this employee is, and the more systems-le
vel privileges he has, the more access he has to virtually every byte of his employer’s digita
l existence. Of course, not everyone is curious enough to take advantage of this education, and
 not everyone is possessed of a sincere curiosity. My forays through the CIA’s systems were na
tural extensions of my childhood desire to understand how everything works, how the various com
ponents of a mechanism fit together into the whole. And with the official title and privileges 
of a systems administrator, and technical prowess that enabled my clearance to be used to its m
aximum potential, I was able to satisfy my every informational deficiency and then some. In cas
e you were wondering: Yes, man really did land on the moon. Climate change is real. Chemtrails 
are not a thing.
On the CIA’s internal news sites I read top secret dispatches regarding trade talks and coups 
as they were still unfolding. These agency accounts of events were often very similar to the ac
counts that would eventually show up on network news, CNN, or Fox days later. The primary diffe
rences were merely in the sourcing and the level of detail. Whereas a newspaper or magazine acc
ount of an upheaval abroad might be attributed to “a senior official speaking on condition of 
anonymity,” the CIA version would have explicit sourcing—say, “ZBSMACKTALK/1, an employee of
 the interior ministry who regularly responds to specific tasking, claims secondhand knowledge,
 and has proven reliable in the past.” And the true name and complete personal history of ZBSM
ACKTALK/1, called a case file, would be only a few clicks away.
Sometimes an internal news item would never show up in the media at all, and the excitement and
 significance of what I was reading both increased my appreciation of the importance of our wor
k and made me feel like I was missing out by just sitting at a workstation. This may come off a
s naive, but I was surprised to learn how truly international the CIA was—and I don’t mean it
s operations, I mean its workforce. The number of languages I heard in the cafeteria was astoun
ding. I couldn’t help feeling a sense of my own provincialism. Working at CIA Headquarters was
 a thrill, but it was still only a few hours away from where I’d grown up, which in many ways 
was a similar environment. I was in my early twenties and, apart from stints in North Carolina,
 childhood trips to visit my grandfather at Coast Guard bases where he’d held commands, and my
 few weeks in the army at Fort Benning, I’d never really left the Beltway.
As I read about events happening in Ouagadougou, Kinshasa, and other exotic cities I could neve
r have found on a noncomputerized map, I realized that as long as I was still young I had to se
rve my country by doing something truly meaningful abroad. The alternative, I thought, was just
 becoming a more successful Frank: sitting at progressively bigger desks, making progressively 
more money, until eventually I, too, would be obsolesced and kept around only to handle the fut
ure’s equivalent of a janky tape machine.
It was then that I did the unthinkable. I set about going govvy.
I think some of my supervisors were puzzled by this, but they were also flattered, because the 
typical route is the reverse: a public servant at the end of their tenure goes private and cash
es in. No tech contractor just starting out goes public and takes a pay cut. To my mind, howeve
r, becoming a govvy was logical: I’d be getting paid to travel.
I got lucky, and a position opened up. After nine months as a systems administrator, I applied 
for a CIA tech job abroad, and in short order I was accepted.
My last day at CIA Headquarters was just a formality. I’d already done all my paperwork and tr
aded in my green badge for a blue. All that was left to do was to sit through another indoctrin
ation, which now that I was a govvy was held in an elegant conference room next to the cafeteri
a’s Dunkin’ Donuts. It was here that I performed the sacred rite in which contractors never p
articipate. I raised my hand to swear an oath of loyalty—not to the government or agency that 
now employed me directly, but to the US Constitution. I solemnly swore to support and defend th
e Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic.
The next day, I drove my trusty old Honda Civic out into the Virginia countryside. In order to 
get to the foreign station of my dreams, I first had to go back to school—to the first sit-in-
a-classroom schooling I’d ever really finish.
14
The Count of the Hill
My first orders as a freshly minted officer of the government were to head for the Comfort Inn 
in Warrenton, Virginia, a sad, dilapidated motel whose primary client was the “State Departmen
t,” by which I mean the CIA. It was the worst motel in a town of bad motels, which was probabl
y why the CIA chose it. The fewer other guests, the lower the chances that anybody would notice
 that this particular Comfort Inn served as a makeshift dormitory for the Warrenton Training Ce
nter—or, as folks who work there call it, the Hill.
When I checked in, the desk clerk warned me not to use the stairs, which were blocked off by po
lice tape. I was given a room on the second floor of the main building, with a view of the inn
’s auxiliary buildings and parking lot. The room was barely lit, there was mold in the bathroo
m, the carpets were filthy with cigarette burns under the No Smoking sign, and the flimsy mattr
ess was stained dark purple with what I hoped was booze. Nevertheless, I liked it—I was still 
at the age when I could find this seediness romantic—and I spent my first night lying awake in
 bed, watching the bugs swarm the single domed overhead light fixture and counting down the hou
rs to the free continental breakfast I’d been promised.
The next morning, I discovered that on the continent of Warrenton, breakfast meant individual-s
ize boxes of Froot Loops and sour milk. Welcome to the government.
The Comfort Inn was to be my home for the next six months. My fellow Innmates and I, as we call
ed ourselves, were discouraged from telling our loved ones where we were staying and what we we
re doing. I leaned hard into those protocols, rarely heading back to Maryland or even talking t
o Lindsay on the phone. Anyway, we weren’t allowed to take our phones to school, since class w
as classified, and we had classes all the time. Warrenton kept most of us too busy to be lonely
.
If the Farm, down by Camp Peary, is the CIA’s most famous training institution, chiefly becaus
e it’s the only one that the agency’s PR staff is allowed to talk to Hollywood about, the Hil
l is without a doubt the most mysterious. Connected via microwave and fiber optics to the satel
lite relay facility at Brandy Station—part of the Warrenton Training Center’s constellation o
f sister sites—the Hill serves as the heart of the CIA’s field communications network, carefu
lly located just out of nuke range from DC. The salty old techs who worked there liked to say t
hat the CIA could survive losing its headquarters to a catastrophic attack, but it would die if
 it ever lost Warrenton, and now that the top of the Hill holds two enormous top secret data ce
nters—one of which I later helped to construct—I’m inclined to agree.
The Hill earned its name because of its location, which is atop, yes, a massive steepness. When
 I arrived, there was just one road that led in, past a purposely under-marked perimeter fence,
 and then up a grade so severe that whenever the temperature dropped and the road iced over, ve
hicles would lose traction and slide backward downhill.
Just beyond the guarded checkpoint lies the State Department’s decaying diplomatic communicati
ons training facility, whose prominent location was meant to reinforce its role as cover: makin
g the Hill appear as if it’s merely a place where the American foreign service trains technolo
gists. Beyond it, amid the back territory, were the various low, unlabeled buildings I studied 
in, and even farther on was the shooting range that the IC’s trigger pullers used for special 
training. Shots would ring out, in a style of firing I wasn’t familiar with: pop-pop, pop; pop
-pop, pop. A double-tap meant to incapacitate, followed by an aimed shot meant to execute.
I was there as a member of class 6-06 of the BTTP, the Basic Telecommunications Training Progra
m, whose intentionally beige name disguises one of the most classified and unusual curricula in
 existence. The purpose of the program is to train TISOs (Technical Information Security Office
rs)—the CIA’s cadre of elite “communicators,” or, less formally, “commo guys.” A TISO is 
trained to be a jack-of-all-trades, a one-person replacement for previous generations’ special
ized roles of code clerk, radioman, electrician, mechanic, physical and digital security advise
r, and computer technician. The main job of this undercover officer is to manage the technical 
infrastructure for CIA operations, most commonly overseas at stations hidden inside American mi
ssions, consulates, and embassies—hence the State Department connection. The idea is, if you’
re in an American embassy, which is to say if you’re far from home and surrounded by untrustwo
rthy foreigners—whether hostiles or allies, they’re still untrustworthy foreigners to the CIA
—you’re going to have to handle all of your technical needs internally. If you ask a local re
pairman to fix your secret spy base, he’ll definitely do it, even for cheap, but he’s also go
ing to install hard-to-find bugs on behalf of a foreign power.
As a result, TISOs are responsible for knowing how to fix basically every machine in the buildi
ng, from individual computers and computer networks to CCTV and HVAC systems, solar panels, hea
ters and coolers, emergency generators, satellite hookups, military encryption devices, alarms,
 locks, and so on. The rule is that if it plugs in or gets plugged into, it’s the TISO’s prob
lem.
TISOs also have to know how to build some of these systems themselves, just as they have to kno
w how to destroy them—when an embassy is under siege, say, after all the diplomats and most of
 their fellow CIA officers have been evacuated. The TISOs are always the last guys out. It’s t
heir job to send the final “off the air” message to headquarters after they’ve shredded, bur
ned, wiped, degaussed, and disintegrated anything that has the CIA’s fingerprints on it, from 
operational documents in safes to disks with cipher material, to ensure that nothing of value r
emains for an enemy to capture.
Why this was a job for the CIA and not for the State Department—the entity that actually owns 
the embassy building—is more than the sheer difference in competence and trust: the real reaso
n is plausible deniability. The worst-kept secret in modern diplomacy is that the primary funct
ion of an embassy nowadays is to serve as a platform for espionage. The old explanations for wh
y a country might try to maintain a notionally sovereign physical presence on another country’
s soil faded into obsolescence with the rise of electronic communications and jet-powered aircr
aft. Today, the most meaningful diplomacy happens directly between ministries and ministers. Su
re, embassies do still send the occasional démarche and help support their citizens abroad, an
d then there are the consular sections that issue visas and renew passports. But those are ofte
n in a completely different building, and anyway, none of those activities can even remotely ju
stify the expense of maintaining all that infrastructure. Instead, what justifies the expense i
s the ability for a country to use the cover of its foreign service to conduct and legitimize i
ts spying.
TISOs work under diplomatic cover with credentials that hide them among these foreign service o
fficers, usually under the identity of “attachés.” The largest embassies would have maybe fi
ve of these people, the larger embassies would have maybe three, but most just have one. They’
re called “singletons,” and I remember being told that of all the posts the CIA offers, these
 have the highest rates of divorce. To be a singleton is to be the lone technical officer, far 
from home, in a world where everything is always broken.
My class in Warrenton began with around eight members and lost only one before graduation—whic
h I was told was fairly uncommon. And this motley crew was uncommon, too, though pretty well re
presentative of the kind of malcontents who voluntarily sign up for a career track that all but
 guarantees they’ll spend the majority of their service undercover in a foreign country. For t
he first time in my IC career, I wasn’t the youngest in the room. At age twenty-four, I’d say
 I was around the mean, though my experience doing systems work at headquarters certainly gave 
me a boost in terms of familiarity with the agency’s operations. Most of the others were just 
tech-inclined kids straight out of college, or straight off the street, who’d applied online.
In a nod to the paramilitary aspirations of the CIA’s foreign field branches, we called each o
ther by nicknames—quickly assigned based on eccentricities—more often than by our true names.
 Taco Bell was a suburb: wide, likable, and blank. At twenty years old, the only job he’d had 
prior to the CIA was as the night-shift manager at a branch of the eponymous restaurant in Penn
sylvania. Rainman was in his late twenties and spent the term bouncing around the autism spectr
um between catatonic detachment and shivering fury. He wore the name we gave him proudly and cl
aimed it was a Native American honorific. Flute earned his name because his career in the Marin
es was far less interesting to us than his degree in panpipes from a music conservatory. Spo wa
s one of the older guys, at thirty-five or so. He was called what he was called because he’d b
een an SPO—a Special Police Officer—at the CIA’s headquarters, where he got so bored out of 
his mind guarding the gate at McLean that he was determined to escape overseas even if it meant
 cramming his entire family into a single motel room (a situation that lasted until the managem
ent found his kids’ pet snake living in a dresser drawer). Our elder was the Colonel, a midfor
ties former Special Forces commo sergeant who, after numerous tours in the sandbox, was trying 
out for his second act. We called him the Colonel, even though he was just an enlisted guy, not
 an officer, mostly out of his resemblance to that friendly Kentuckian whose fried chicken we p
referred to the regular fare of the Warrenton cafeteria.
My nickname—I guess I can’t avoid it—was the Count. Not because of my aristocratic bearing o
r dandyish fashion sense, but because, like the felt vampire puppet of Sesame Street, I had a t
endency to signal my intention to interrupt class by raising my forefinger, as if to say: “One
, two, three, ah, ha, ha, three things you forgot!”
These were the folks with whom I’d cycle through some twenty different classes, each in its ow
n specialty, but most having to do with how to make the technology available in any given envir
onment serve the government of the United States, whether in an embassy or on the run.
One drill involved lugging the “off-site package,” which was an eighty-pound suitcase of comm
unications equipment that was older than I was, up onto a building’s roof. With just a compass
 and a laminated sheet of coordinates, I’d have to find in all that vast sky of twinkling star
s one of the CIA’s stealth satellites, which would connect me to the agency’s mothership, its
 Crisis Communications Center in McLean—call sign “Central”—and then I’d use the Cold War
–era kit inside the package to establish an encrypted radio channel. This drill was a practica
l reminder of why the commo officer is always the first in and last out: the chief of station c
an steal the deepest secret in the world, but it doesn’t mean squat until somebody gets it hom
e.
That night I stayed on base after dark, and drove my car up to the very top of the Hill, parkin
g outside the converted barn where we studied electrical concepts meant to prevent adversaries 
from monitoring our activities. The methods we learned about at times seemed close to voodoo—s
uch as the ability to reproduce what’s being displayed on any computer monitor by using only t
he tiny electromagnetic emissions caused by the oscillating currents in its internal components
, which can be captured using a special antenna, a method called Van Eck phreaking. If this sou
nds hard to understand, I promise we all felt the same way. The instructor himself readily admi
tted he never fully comprehended the details and couldn’t demonstrate it for us, but he knew t
he threat was real: the CIA was doing it to others, which meant others could do it to us.
I sat on the roof of my car, that same old white Civic, and, as I gazed out over what felt like
 all of Virginia, I called Lindsay for the first time in weeks, or even a month. We talked unti
l my phone’s battery died, my breath becoming visible as the night got colder. There was nothi
ng I wanted more than to share the scene with her—the dark fields, the undulating hills, the h
igh astral shimmer—but describing it to her was the best I could do. I was already breaking th
e rules by using my phone; I would’ve been breaking the law by taking a picture.
One of Warrenton’s major subjects of study involved how to service the terminals and cables, t
he basic—in many ways, the primitive—components of any CIA station’s communications infrastr
ucture. A “terminal,” in this context, is just a computer used to send and receive messages o
ver a single secure network. In the CIA, the word “cables” tends to refer to the messages the
mselves, but technical officers know that “cables” are also far more tangible: they’re the c
ords or wires that for the last half century or so have linked the agency’s terminals—specifi
cally its ancient Post Communications Terminals—all over the world, tunneling underground acro
ss national borders, buried at the bottom of the ocean.
Ours was the last year that TISOs had to be fluent in all of this: the terminal hardware, the m
ultiple software packages, and the cables, too, of course. For some of my classmates, it felt a
 bit crazy to have to deal with issues of insulation and sheathing in what was supposed to be t
he age of wireless. But if any of them voiced doubts about the relevance of any of the seemingl
y antiquated tech that we were being taught, our instructors would remind us that ours was also
 the first year in the history of the Hill that TISOs weren’t required to learn Morse code.
Closing in on graduation, we had to fill out what were called dream sheets. We were given a lis
t of the CIA stations worldwide that needed personnel, and were told to rank them in the order 
of our preferences. These dream sheets then went to the Requirements Division, which promptly c
rumpled them up and tossed them in the trash—at least according to rumor.
My dream sheet started with what was called the SRD, the Special Requirements Division. This wa
s technically a posting not at any embassy but here in Virginia, from which I would be sent out
 on periodic tours of all the uglier spots in the sandbox, places where the agency judged a per
manent posting too harsh or too dangerous—tiny, isolated forward operating bases in Afghanista
n, Iraq, and the border regions of Pakistan, for example. By choosing SRD, I was opting for cha
llenge and variety over being stuck in just one city for the entire duration of what was suppos
ed to be an up-to-three-years stint. My instructors were all pretty confident that SRD would ju
mp at the chance to bring me on, and I was pretty confident in my newly honed abilities. But th
ings didn’t quite go as expected.
As was evident from the condition of the Comfort Inn, the school had been cutting some corners.
 Some of my classmates had begun to suspect that the administration was actually, believe it or
 not, violating federal labor laws. As a work-obsessed recluse, I initially wasn’t bothered by
 this, nor was anyone around my age. For us, this was the sort of low-level exploitation we’d 
experienced so often that we already mistook it for normal. But unpaid overtime, denied leave, 
and refusals to honor family benefits made a difference to the older classmates. The Colonel ha
d alimony payments, and Spo had a family: every dollar counted, every minute mattered.
These grievances came to a head when the decrepit stairs at the Comfort Inn finally collapsed. 
Luckily no one was injured, but everyone was spooked, and my classmates started grumbling that 
if the building had been bankrolled by any entity other than the CIA, it would’ve been condemn
ed for fire-code violations years ago. The discontent spread, and soon enough what was basicall
y a school for saboteurs was close to unionizing. Management, in response, dug in its heels and
 decided to wait us out, since everybody involved eventually had to either graduate or be fired
.
A few of my classmates approached me. They knew that I was well liked by the instructors, since
 my skills put me near the top of my class. They were also aware, because I’d worked at headqu
arters, that I knew my way around the bureaucracy. Plus I could write pretty well—at least by 
tech standards. They wanted me to act as a sort of class representative, or class martyr, by fo
rmally bringing their complaints to the head of the school.
I’d like to say that I was motivated to take on this cause solely by my aggrieved sense of jus
tice. But while that certainly did factor into the decision, I can’t deny that for a young man
 who was suddenly excelling at nearly everything he attempted, challenging the school’s crooke
d administration just sounded like fun. Within an hour I was compiling policies to cite from th
e internal network, and before the day was done my email was sent.
The next morning the head of the school had me come into his office. He admitted the school had
 gone off the rails, but said the problems weren’t anything he could solve. “You’re only her
e for twelve more weeks—do me a favor and just tell your classmates to suck it up. Assignments
 are coming up soon, and then you’ll have better things to worry about. All you’ll remember f
rom your time here is who had the best performance review.”
What he said had been worded in such a way that it might’ve been a threat, and it might’ve be
en a bribe. Either way, it bothered me. By the time I left his office the fun was over, and it 
was justice I was after.
I walked back into a class that had expected to lose. I remember Spo noticing my frown and sayi
ng, “Don’t feel bad, man. At least you tried.”
He’d been at the agency longer than any of my other classmates; he knew how it worked, and how
 ludicrous it was to trust management to fix something that management itself had broken. I was
 a bureaucratic innocent by comparison, disturbed by the loss and by the ease with which Spo an
d the others accepted it. I hated the feeling that the mere fiction of process was enough to di
spel a genuine demand for results. It wasn’t that my classmates didn’t care enough to fight, 
it was that they couldn’t afford to: the system was designed so that the perceived cost of esc
alation exceeded the expected benefit of resolution. At age twenty-four, though, I thought as l
ittle of the costs as I did of the benefits; I just cared about the system. I wasn’t finished.
I rewrote and re-sent the email—not to the head of the school now, but to his boss, the direct
or of Field Service Group. Though he was higher up the totem pole than the head of the school, 
the D/FSG was pretty much equivalent in rank and seniority to a few of the personnel I’d dealt
 with at headquarters. Then I copied the email to his boss, who definitely was not.
A few days later, we were in a class on something like false subtraction as a form of field-exp
edient encryption, when a front-office secretary came in and declared that the old regime had f
allen. Unpaid overtime would no longer be required, and, effective in two weeks, we were all be
ing moved to a much nicer hotel. I remember the giddy pride with which she announced, “A Hampt
on Inn!”
I had only a day or so to revel in my glory before class was interrupted again. This time, the 
head of the school was at the door, summoning me back to his office. Spo immediately leaped fro
m his seat, enveloped me in a hug, mimed wiping away a tear, and declared that he’d never forg
et me. The head of the school rolled his eyes.
There, waiting in the school head’s office was the director of the Field Service Group—the sc
hool head’s boss, the boss of nearly everyone on the TISO career track, the boss whose boss I
’d emailed. He was exceptionally cordial, and didn’t project any of the school head’s clench
ed-jaw irritation. This unnerved me.
I tried to keep a calm exterior, but inside I was sweating. The head of the school began our ch
at by reiterating how the issues the class had brought to light were in the process of being re
solved. His superior cut him off. “But why we’re here is not to talk about that. Why we’re h
ere is to talk about insubordination and the chain of command.”
If he’d slapped me, I would’ve been less shocked.
I had no idea what the director meant by insubordination, but before I had the opportunity to a
sk, he continued. The CIA was quite different from the other civilian agencies, he said, even i
f, on paper, the regulations insisted it wasn’t. And in an agency that did such important work
, there was nothing more important than the chain of command.
Raising a forefinger, automatically but politely, I pointed out that before I emailed above my 
station, I’d tried the chain of command and been failed by it. Which was precisely the last th
ing I should have been explaining to the chain of command itself, personified just across a des
k from me.
The head of the school just stared at his shoes and occasionally glanced out the window.
“Listen,” his boss said. “Ed, I’m not here to file a ‘hurt feelings report.’ Relax. I rec
ognize that you’re a talented guy, and we’ve gone around and talked to all of your instructor
s and they say you’re talented and sharp. Even volunteered for the war zone. That’s something
 we appreciate. We want you here, but we need to know that we can count on you. You’ve got to 
understand that there’s a system here. Sometimes we’ve all got to put up with things we don’
t like, because the mission comes first, and we can’t complete that mission if every guy on th
e team is second-guessing.” He took a pause, swallowed, and said, “Nowhere is this more true 
than in the desert. A lot of things happen out in the desert, and I’m not sure that we’re at 
a stage yet where I’m comfortable you’ll know how to handle them.”
This was their gotcha, their retaliation. And though it was entirely self-defeating, the head o
f the school was now smiling at the parking lot. No one besides me—and I mean no one—had put 
down SRD, or any other active combat situation for that matter, as their first or second or eve
n third choice on their dream sheets. Everyone else had prioritized all the stops on the Europe
an champagne circuit, all the neat sweet vacation-station burgs with windmills and bicycles, wh
ere you rarely hear explosions.
Almost perversely, they now gave me one of these assignments. They gave me Geneva. They punishe
d me by giving me what I’d never asked for, but what everybody else had wanted.
As if he were reading my mind, the director said, “This isn’t a punishment, Ed. It’s an oppo
rtunity—really. Someone with your level of expertise would be wasted in the war zone. You need
 a bigger station, that pilots the newest projects, to really keep you busy and stretch your sk
ills.”
Everybody in class who’d been congratulating me would later turn jealous and think that I’d b
een bought off with a luxury position to avoid further complaints. My reaction, in the moment, 
was the opposite: I thought that the head of the school must have had an informant in the class
, who’d told him exactly the type of station I’d hoped to avoid.
The director got up with a smile, which signaled that the meeting was over. “All right, I thin
k we’ve got a plan. Before I leave, I just want to make sure we’re clear here: I’m not going
 to have another Ed Snowden moment, am I?”
15
Geneva
Mary Shelley’s Frankenstein, written in 1818, is largely set in Geneva, the bustling, neat, cl
ean, clockwork-organized Swiss city where I now made my home. Like many Americans, I’d grown u
p watching the various movie versions and TV cartoons, but I’d never actually read the book. I
n the days before I left the States, however, I’d been searching for what to read about Geneva
, and in nearly all the lists I found online, Frankenstein stood out from among the tourist gui
des and histories. In fact, I think the only PDFs I downloaded for the flight over were Franken
stein and the Geneva Conventions, and I only finished the former. I did my reading at night ove
r the long, lonely months I spent by myself before Lindsay moved over to join me, stretched out
 on a bare mattress in the living room of the comically fancy, comically vast, but still almost
 entirely unfurnished apartment that the embassy was paying for on the Quai du Seujet, in the S
aint-Jean Falaises district, with the Rhône out one window and the Jura Mountains out the other
.
Suffice it to say, the book wasn’t what I expected. Frankenstein is an epistolary novel that r
eads like a thread of overwritten emails, alternating scenes of madness and gory murder with a 
cautionary account of the way technological innovation tends to outpace all moral, ethical, and
 legal restraints. The result is the creation of an uncontrollable monster.
In the Intelligence Community, the “Frankenstein effect” is widely cited, though the more pop
ular military term for it is “blowback”: situations in which policy decisions intended to adv
ance American interests end up harming them irreparably. Prominent examples of the “Frankenste
in effect” cited by after-the-fact civilian, governmental, military, and even IC assessments h
ave included America’s funding and training of the mujahideen to fight the Soviets, which resu
lted in the radicalization of Osama bin Laden and the founding of al-Qaeda, as well as the de-B
aathification of the Saddam Hussein–era Iraqi military, which resulted in the rise of the Isla
mic state. Without a doubt, however, the major instance of the Frankenstein effect over the cou
rse of my brief career can be found in the US government’s clandestine drive to restructure th
e world’s communications. In Geneva, in the same landscape where Mary Shelley’s creature ran 
amok, America was busy creating a network that would eventually take on a life and mission of i
ts own and wreak havoc on the lives of its creators—mine very much included.
The CIA station in the American embassy in Geneva was one of the prime European laboratories of
 this decades-long experiment. This city, the refined Old World capital of family banking and a
n immemorial tradition of financial secrecy, also lay at the intersection of EU and internation
al fiber-optic networks, and happened to fall just within the shadow of key communications sate
llites circling overhead.
The CIA is the primary American intelligence agency dedicated to HUMINT (human intelligence), o
r covert intelligence gathering by means of interpersonal contact—person to person, face-to-fa
ce, unmediated by a screen. The COs (case officers) who specialized in this were terminal cynic
s, charming liars who smoked, drank, and harbored deep resentment toward the rise of SIGINT (si
gnals intelligence), or covert intelligence gathering by means of intercepted communications, w
hich with each passing year reduced their privilege and prestige. But though the COs had a gene
ral distrust of digital technology reminiscent of Frank’s back at headquarters, they certainly
 understood how useful it could be, which produced a productive camaraderie and a healthy rival
ry. Even the most cunning and charismatic CO will, over the course of their career, come across
 at least a few zealous idealists whose loyalties they can’t purchase with envelopes stuffed w
ith cash. That was typically the moment when they’d turn to technical field officers like myse
lf—with questions, compliments, and party invitations.
To serve as a technical field officer among these people was to be as much a cultural ambassado
r as an expert adviser, introducing the case officers to the folkways and customs of a new terr
itory no less foreign to most Americans than Switzerland’s twenty-six cantons and four officia
l languages. On Monday, a CO might ask my advice on how to set up a covert online communication
s channel with a potential turncoat they were afraid to spook. On Tuesday, another CO might int
roduce me to someone they’d say was a “specialist” in from Washington—though this was in fa
ct the same CO from the day before, now testing out a disguise that I’m still embarrassed to s
ay I didn’t suspect in the least, though I suppose that was the point. On Wednesday, I might b
e asked how best to destroy-after-transmitting (the technological version of burn-after-reading
) a disc of customer records that a CO had managed to purchase from a crooked Swisscom employee
. On Thursday, I might have to write up and transmit security violation reports on COs, documen
ting minor infractions like forgetting to lock the door to a vault when they’d gone to the bat
hroom—a duty I’d perform with considerable compassion, since I once had had to write up mysel
f for exactly the same mistake. Come Friday, the chief of operations might call me into his off
ice and ask me if, “hypothetically speaking,” headquarters could send over an infected thumb 
drive that could be used by “someone” to hack the computers used by delegates to the United N
ations, whose main building was just up the street—did I think there was much of a chance of t
his “someone” being caught?
I didn’t and they weren’t.
In sum, during my time in the field, the field was rapidly changing. The agency was increasingl
y adamant that COs enter the new millennium, and technical field officers like myself were task
ed with helping them do that in addition to all of our other duties. We put them online, and th
ey put up with us.
Geneva was regarded as ground zero for this transition because it contained the world’s riches
t environment of sophisticated targets, from the global headquarters of the United Nations to t
he home offices of numerous specialized UN agencies and international nongovernmental organizat
ions. There was the International Atomic Energy Agency, which promotes nuclear technology and s
afety standards worldwide, including those that relate to nuclear weaponry; the International T
elecommunication Union, which—through its influence over technical standards for everything fr
om the radio spectrum to satellite orbits—determines what can be communicated and how; and the
 World Trade Organization, which—through its regulation of the trade of goods, services, and i
ntellectual property among participating nations—determines what can be sold and how. Finally,
 there was Geneva’s role as the capital of private finance, which allowed great fortunes to be
 stashed and spent without much public scrutiny regardless of whether those fortunes were ill-g
otten or well earned.
The notoriously slow and meticulous methods of traditional spycraft certainly had their success
es in manipulating these systems for America’s benefit, but ultimately too few to satisfy the 
ever-increasing appetite of the American policy makers who read the IC’s reports, especially a
s the Swiss banking sector—along with the rest of the world—went digital. With the world’s d
eepest secrets now stored on computers, which were more often than not connected to the open In
ternet, it was only logical that America’s intelligence agencies would want to use those very 
same connections to steal them.
Before the advent of the Internet, if an agency wanted to gain access to a target’s computer i
t had to recruit an asset who had physical access to it. This was obviously a dangerous proposi
tion: the asset might be caught in the act of downloading the secrets, or of implanting the exp
loitative hardware and software that would radio the secrets to their handlers. The global spre
ad of digital technology simplified this process enormously. This new world of “digital networ
k intelligence” or “computer network operations” meant that physical access was almost never
 required, which reduced the level of human risk and permanently realigned the HUMINT/SIGINT ba
lance. An agent now could just send the target a message, such as an email, with attachments or
 links that unleashed malware that would allow the agency to surveil not just the target’s com
puter but its entire network. Given this innovation, the CIA’s HUMINT would be dedicated to th
e identification of targets of interest, and SIGINT would take care of the rest. Instead of a C
O cultivating a target into an asset—through cash-on-the-barrel bribery, or coercion and black
mail if the bribery failed—a few clever computer hacks would provide a similar benefit. What’
s more, with this method the target would remain unwitting, in what would inevitably be a clean
er process.
That, at least, was the hope. But as intelligence increasingly became “cyberintelligence” (a 
term used to distinguish it from the old phone-and-fax forms of off-line SIGINT), old concerns 
also had to be updated to the new medium of the Internet. For example: how to research a target
 while remaining anonymous online.
This issue would typically emerge when a CO would search the name of a person from a country li
ke Iran or China in the agency’s databases and come up empty-handed. For casual searches of pr
ospective targets like these, No Results was actually a fairly common outcome: the CIA’s datab
ases were mostly filled with people already of interest to the agency, or citizens of friendly 
countries whose records were more easily available. When faced with No Results, a CO would have
 to do the same thing you do when you want to look someone up: they’d turn to the public Inter
net. This was risky.
Normally when you go online, your request for any website travels from your computer more or le
ss directly to the server that hosts your final destination—the website you’re trying to visi
t. At every stop along the way, however, your request cheerfully announces exactly where on the
 Internet it came from, and exactly where on the Internet it’s going, thanks to identifiers ca
lled source and destination headers, which you can think of as the address information on a pos
tcard. Because of these headers, your Internet browsing can easily be identified as yours by, a
mong others, webmasters, network administrators, and foreign intelligence services.
It may be hard to believe, but the agency at the time had no good answer for what a case office
r should do in this situation, beyond weakly recommending that they ask CIA headquarters to tak
e over the search on their behalf. Formally, the way this ridiculous procedure was supposed to 
work was that someone back in McLean would go online from a specific computer terminal and use 
what was called a “nonattributable research system.” This was set up to proxy—that is, fake 
the origin of—a query before sending it to Google. If anyone tried to look into who had run th
at particular search, all they would find would be an anodyne business located somewhere in Ame
rica—one of the myriad fake executive-headhunter or personnel-services companies the CIA used 
as cover.
I can’t say that anyone ever definitively explained to me why the agency liked to use “job se
arch” businesses as a front; presumably they were the only companies that might plausibly look
 up a nuclear engineer in Pakistan one day and a retired Polish general the next. I can say wit
h absolute certainty, however, that the process was ineffective, onerous, and expensive. To cre
ate just one of these covers, the agency had to invent the purpose and name of a company, secur
e a credible physical address somewhere in America, register a credible URL, put up a credible 
website, and then rent servers in the company’s name. Furthermore, the agency had to create an
 encrypted connection from those servers that allowed it to communicate with the CIA network wi
thout anyone noticing the connection. Here’s the kicker: After all of that effort and money wa
s expended just to let us anonymously Google a name, whatever front business was being used as 
a proxy would immediately be burned—by which I mean its connection to the CIA would be reveale
d to our adversaries—the moment some analyst decided to take a break from their research to lo
g in to their personal Facebook account on that same computer. Since few of the people at headq
uarters were undercover, that Facebook account would often openly declare, “I work at the CIA,
” or just as tellingly, “I work at the State Department, but in McLean.”
Go ahead and laugh. Back then, it happened all the time.
During my stint in Geneva, whenever a CO would ask me if there was a safer, faster, and all-aro
und more efficient way to do this, I introduced them to Tor.
The Tor Project was a creation of the state that ended up becoming one of the few effective shi
elds against the state’s surveillance. Tor is free and open-source software that, if used care
fully, allows its users to browse online with the closest thing to perfect anonymity that can b
e practically achieved at scale. Its protocols were developed by the US Naval Research Laborato
ry throughout the mid-1990s, and in 2003 it was released to the public—to the worldwide civili
an population on whom its functionality depends. This is because Tor operates on a cooperative 
community model, relying on tech-savvy volunteers all over the globe who run their own Tor serv
ers out of their basements, attics, and garages. By routing its users’ Internet traffic throug
h these servers, Tor does the same job of protecting the origin of that traffic as the CIA’s 
“non-attributable research” system, with the primary difference being that Tor does it better
, or at least more efficiently. I was already convinced of this, but convincing the gruff COs w
as another matter altogether.
With the Tor protocol, your traffic is distributed and bounced around through randomly generate
d pathways from Tor server to Tor server, with the purpose being to replace your identity as th
e source of a communication with that of the last Tor server in the constantly shifting chain. 
Virtually none of the Tor servers, which are called “layers,” know the identity of, or any id
entifying information about, the origin of the traffic. And in a true stroke of genius, the one
 Tor server that does know the origin—the very first server in the chain—does not know where 
that traffic is headed. Put more simply: the first Tor server that connects you to the Tor netw
ork, called a gateway, knows you’re the one sending a request, but because it isn’t allowed t
o read that request, it has no idea whether you’re looking for pet memes or information about 
a protest, and the final Tor server that your request passes through, called an exit, knows exa
ctly what’s being asked for, but has no idea who’s asking for it.
This layering method is called onion routing, which gives Tor its name: it’s The Onion Router.
 The classified joke was that trying to surveil the Tor network makes spies want to cry. Therei
n lies the project’s irony: here was a US military–developed technology that made cyberintell
igence simultaneously harder and easier, applying hacker know-how to protect the anonymity of I
C officers, but only at the price of granting that same anonymity to adversaries and to average
 users across the globe. In this sense, Tor was even more neutral than Switzerland. For me pers
onally, Tor was a life changer, bringing me back to the Internet of my childhood by giving me j
ust the slightest taste of freedom from being observed.
* * *
NONE OF THIS account of the CIA’s pivot to cyberintelligence, or SIGINT on the Internet, is me
ant to imply that the agency wasn’t still doing some significant HUMINT, in the same manner in
 which it had always done so, at least since the advent of the modern IC in the aftermath of Wo
rld War II. Even I got involved, though my most memorable operation was a failure. Geneva was t
he first and only time in my intelligence career in which I made the personal acquaintance of a
 target—the first and only time that I looked directly into the eyes of a human being rather t
han just recording their life from afar. I have to say, I found the whole experience unforgetta
bly visceral and sad.
Sitting around discussing how to hack a faceless UN complex was psychologically easier by a wid
e margin. Direct engagement, which can be harsh and emotionally draining, simply doesn’t happe
n that much on the technical side of intelligence, and almost never in computing. There is a de
personalization of experience fostered by the distance of a screen. Peering at life through a w
indow can ultimately abstract us from our actions and limit any meaningful confrontation with t
heir consequences.
I met the man at an embassy function, a party. The embassy had lots of those, and the COs alway
s went, drawn as much by the opportunities to spot and assess potential candidates for recruitm
ent as by the open bars and cigar salons.
Sometimes the COs would bring me along. I’d lectured them on my specialty long enough, I guess
, that now they were all too happy to lecture me on theirs, cross-training me to help them play
 “spot the sap” in an environment where there were always more people to meet than they could
 possibly handle on their own. My native geekiness meant I could get the young researchers from
 CERN (Conseil Européen pour la Recherche Nucléaire: European Council for Nuclear Research) t
alking about their work with a voluble excitement that the MBAs and political science majors wh
o comprised the ranks of our COs had trouble provoking on their own.
As a technologist, I found it incredibly easy to defend my cover. The moment some bespoke-suite
d cosmopolite asked me what I did, and I responded with the four words “I work in IT” (or, in
 my improving French, je travaille dans l’informatique), their interest in me was over. Not th
at this ever stopped the conversation. When you’re a fresh-faced professional in a conversatio
n outside your field, it’s never that surprising when you ask a lot of questions, and in my ex
perience most people will jump at the chance to explain exactly how much more they know than yo
u do about something they care about deeply.
The party I’m recalling took place on a warm night on the outside terrace of an upscale café 
on one of the side streets alongside Lake Geneva. Some of the COs wouldn’t hesitate to abandon
 me at such a gathering if they had to in order to sit as close as possible to whatever woman h
appened to match their critical intelligence-value indicators of being highly attractive and no
 older than a student, but I wasn’t about to complain. For me, spotting targets was a hobby th
at came with a free dinner.
I took my plate and sat down at a table next to a well-dressed Middle Eastern man in a cuff-lin
ked, demonstratively Swiss pink shirt. He seemed lonely, and totally exasperated that no one se
emed interested in him, so I asked him about himself. That’s the usual technique: just be curi
ous and let them talk. In this case, the man did so much talking that it was like I wasn’t eve
n there. He was Saudi, and told me about how much he loved Geneva, the relative beauties of the
 French and Arabic languages, and the absolute beauty of this one Swiss girl with whom he—yes
—had a regular date playing laser tag. With a touch of a conspiratorial tone, he said that he 
worked in private wealth management. Within moments I was getting a full-on polished presentati
on about what, exactly, makes a private bank private, and the challenge of investing without mo
ving markets when your clients are the size of sovereign wealth funds.
“Your clients?” I asked.
That’s when he said, “Most of my work is on Saudi accounts.”
After a few minutes, I excused myself to go to the bathroom, and on the way there I leaned over
 to tell the CO who worked finance targets what I’d learned. After a necessarily too-long inte
rval “fixing my hair,” or texting Lindsay in front of the bathroom mirror, I returned to find
 the CO sitting in my chair. I waved to my new Saudi friend before sitting down beside the CO’
s discarded, smoky-eyed date. Rather than feeling bad, I felt like I’d really earned the Pavé
s de Genève that were passed around for dessert. My job was done.
The next day, the CO, whom I’ll call Cal, heaped me with praise and thanked me effusively. COs
 are promoted or passed over based primarily on how effective they are at recruiting assets wit
h access to information on matters substantial enough to be formally reported back to headquart
ers, and given Saudi Arabia’s suspected involvement in financing terror, Cal felt under tremen
dous pressure to cultivate a qualifying source. I was sure that in no time at all our fellow pa
rty guest would be getting a second paycheck from the agency.
That was not quite how it worked out, however. Despite Cal’s regular forays with the banker to
 strip clubs and bars, the banker wasn’t warming up to him—at least not to the point where a 
pitch could be made—and Cal was getting impatient.
After a month of failures, Cal was so frustrated that he took the banker out drinking and got h
im absolutely plastered. Then he pressured the guy to drive home drunk instead of taking a cab.
 Before the guy had even left the last bar of the night, Cal was calling the make and plate num
ber of his car to the Geneva police, who not fifteen minutes later arrested him for driving und
er the influence. The banker faced an enormous fine, since in Switzerland fines aren’t flat su
ms but based on a percentage of income, and his driver’s license was suspended for three month
s—a stretch of time that Cal would spend, as a truly wonderful friend with a fake-guilty consc
ience, driving the guy back and forth between his home and work, daily, so that the guy could 
“keep his office from finding out.” When the fine was levied, causing his friend cash-flow pr
oblems, Cal was ready with a loan. The banker had become dependent, the dream of every CO.
There was only one hitch: when Cal finally made the pitch, the banker turned him down. He was f
urious, having figured out the planned crime and the engineered arrest, and felt betrayed that 
Cal’s generosity hadn’t been genuine. He cut off all contact. Cal made a halfhearted attempt 
to follow up and do damage control, but it was too late. The banker who’d loved Switzerland ha
d lost his job and was returning—or being returned—to Saudi Arabia. Cal himself was rotated b
ack to the States.
Too much had been hazarded, too little had been gained. It was a waste, which I myself had put 
in motion and then was powerless to stop. After that experience, the prioritizing of SIGINT ove
r HUMINT made all the more sense to me.
In the summer of 2008, the city celebrated its annual Fêtes de Genève, a giant carnival that 
culminates in fireworks. I remember sitting on the left bank of Lake Geneva with the local pers
onnel of the SCS, or Special Collection Service, a joint CIA-NSA program responsible for instal
ling and operating the special surveillance equipment that allows US embassies to spy on foreig
n signals. These guys worked down the hall from my vault at the embassy, but they were older th
an I was, and their work was not just way above my pay grade but way beyond my abilities—they 
had access to NSA tools that I didn’t even know existed. Still, we were friendly: I looked up 
to them, and they looked out for me.
As the fireworks exploded overhead, I was talking about the banker’s case, lamenting the disas
ter it had been, when one of the guys turned to me and said, “Next time you meet someone, Ed, 
don’t bother with the COs—just give us his email address and we’ll take care of it.” I reme
mber nodding somberly to this, though at the time I barely had a clue of the full implications 
of what that comment meant.
I steered clear of parties for the rest of the year and mostly just hung around the cafés and 
parks of Saint-Jean Falaises with Lindsay, taking occasional vacations with her to Italy, Franc
e, and Spain. Still, something had soured my mood, and it wasn’t just the banker debacle. Come
 to think of it, maybe it was banking in general. Geneva is an expensive city and unabashedly p
osh, but as 2008 drew to a close its elegance seemed to tip over into extravagance, with a mass
ive influx of the superrich—most of them from the Gulf states, many of them Saudi—enjoying th
e profits of peak oil prices on the cusp of the global financial crisis. These royal types were
 booking whole floors of five-star grand hotels and buying out the entire inventories of the lu
xury stores just across the bridge. They were putting on lavish banquets at the Michelin-starre
d restaurants and speeding their chrome-plated Lamborghinis down the cobbled streets. It would 
be hard at any time to miss Geneva’s display of conspicuous consumption, but the profligacy no
w on display was particularly galling—coming as it did during the worst economic disaster, as 
the American media kept telling us, since the Great Depression, and as the European media kept 
telling us, since the interwar period and Versailles.
It wasn’t that Lindsay and I were hurting: after all, our rent was being paid by Uncle Sam. Ra
ther, it’s that every time she or I would talk to our folks back home, the situation seemed gr
immer. Both of our families knew people who’d worked their entire lives, some of them for the 
US government, only to have their homes taken away by banks after an unexpected illness made a 
few mortgage payments impossible.
To live in Geneva was to live in an alternative, even opposite, reality. As the rest of the wor
ld became more and more impoverished, Geneva flourished, and while the Swiss banks didn’t enga
ge in many of the types of risky trades that caused the crash, they gladly hid the money of tho
se who’d profited from the pain and were never held accountable. The 2008 crisis, which laid s
o much of the foundation for the crises of populism that a decade later would sweep across Euro
pe and America, helped me realize that something that is devastating for the public can be, and
 often is, beneficial to the elites. This was a lesson that the US government would confirm for
 me in other contexts, time and again, in the years ahead.
16
Tokyo
The Internet is fundamentally American, but I had to leave America to fully understand what tha
t meant. The World Wide Web might have been invented in Geneva, at the CERN research laboratory
 in 1989, but the ways by which the Web is accessed are as American as baseball, which gives th
e American Intelligence Community the home field advantage. The cables and satellites, the serv
ers and towers—so much of the infrastructure of the Internet is under US control that over 90 
percent of the world’s Internet traffic passes through technologies developed, owned, and/or o
perated by the American government and American businesses, most of which are physically locate
d on American territory. Countries that traditionally worry about such advantages, like China a
nd Russia, have attempted to make alternative systems, such as the Great Firewall, or the state
-sponsored censored search engines, or the nationalized satellite constellations that provide s
elective GPS—but America remains the hegemon, the keeper of the master switches that can turn 
almost anyone on and off at will.
It’s not just the Internet’s infrastructure that I’m defining as fundamentally American—it
’s the computer software (Microsoft, Google, Oracle) and hardware (HP, Apple, Dell), too. It’
s everything from the chips (Intel, Qualcomm), to the routers and modems (Cisco, Juniper), to t
he Web services and platforms that provide email and social networking and cloud storage (Googl
e, Facebook, and the most structurally important but invisible Amazon, which provides cloud ser
vices to the US government along with half the Internet). Though some of these companies might 
manufacture their devices in, say, China, the companies themselves are American and are subject
 to American law. The problem is, they’re also subject to classified American policies that pe
rvert law and permit the US government to surveil virtually every man, woman, and child who has
 ever touched a computer or picked up a phone.
Given the American nature of the planet’s communications infrastructure, it should have been o
bvious that the US government would engage in this type of mass surveillance. It should have be
en especially obvious to me. Yet it wasn’t—mostly because the government kept insisting that 
it did nothing of the sort, and generally disclaimed the practice in courts and in the media in
 a manner so adamant that the few remaining skeptics who accused it of lying were treated like 
wild-haired conspiracy junkies. Their suspicions about secret NSA programs seemed hardly differ
ent from paranoid delusions involving alien messages being beamed to the radios in our teeth. W
e—me, you, all of us—were too trusting. But what makes this all the more personally painful f
or me was that the last time I’d made this mistake, I’d supported the invasion of Iraq and jo
ined the army. When I arrived in the IC, I felt sure that I’d never be fooled again, especiall
y given my top secret clearance. Surely that had to count for some degree of transparency. Afte
r all, why would the government keep secrets from its secret keepers? This is all to say that t
he obvious didn’t even become the thinkable for me until some time after I moved to Japan in 2
009 to work for the NSA, America’s premier signals intelligence agency.
It was a dream job, not only because it was with the most advanced intelligence agency on the p
lanet, but also because it was based in Japan, a place that had always fascinated Lindsay and m
e. It felt like a country from the future. Though mine was officially a contractor position, it
s responsibilities and, especially, its location were more than enough to lure me. It’s ironic
 that only by going private again was I put in a position to understand what my government was 
doing.
On paper, I was an employee of Perot Systems, a company founded by that diminutive hyperactive 
Texan who founded the Reform Party and twice ran for the presidency. But almost immediately aft
er my arrival in Japan, Perot Systems was acquired by Dell, so on paper I became an employee of
 Dell. As in the CIA, this contractor status was all just formality and cover, and I only ever 
worked in an NSA facility.
The NSA’s Pacific Technical Center (PTC) occupied one-half of a building inside the enormous Y
okota Air Base. As the headquarters of US Forces Japan, the base was surrounded by high walls, 
steel gates, and guarded checkpoints. Yokota and the PTC were just a short bike ride from where
 Lindsay and I got an apartment in Fussa, a city at the western edge of Tokyo’s vast metropoli
tan spread.
The PTC handled the NSA’s infrastructure for the entire Pacific, and provided support for the 
agency’s spoke sites in nearby countries. Most of these were focused on managing the secret re
lationships that let the NSA cover the Pacific Rim with spy gear, as long as the agency promise
d to share some of the intelligence it gleaned with regional governments—and so long as their 
citizens didn’t find out what the agency was doing. Communications interception was the major 
part of the mission. The PTC would amass “cuts” from captured signals and push them back acro
ss the ocean to Hawaii, and Hawaii, in turn, would push them back to the continental United Sta
tes.
My official job title was systems analyst, with responsibility for maintaining the local NSA sy
stems, though much of my initial work was that of a systems administrator, helping to connect t
he NSA’s systems architecture with the CIA’s. Because I was the only one in the region who kn
ew the CIA’s architecture, I’d also travel out to US embassies, like the one I’d left in Gen
eva, establishing and maintaining the links that enabled the agencies to share intelligence in 
ways that hadn’t previously been possible. This was the first time in my life that I truly rea
lized the power of being the only one in a room with a sense not just of how one system functio
ned internally, but of how it functioned together with multiple systems—or didn’t. Later, as 
the chiefs of the PTC came to recognize that I had a knack for hacking together solutions to th
eir problems, I was given enough of a leash to propose projects of my own.
Two things about the NSA stunned me right off the bat: how technologically sophisticated it was
 compared with the CIA, and how much less vigilant it was about security in its every iteration
, from the compartmentalization of information to data encryption. In Geneva, we’d had to haul
 the hard drives out of the computer every night and lock them up in a safe—and what’s more, 
those drives were encrypted. The NSA, by contrast, hardly bothered to encrypt anything.
In fact, it was rather disconcerting to find out that the NSA was so far ahead of the game in t
erms of cyberintelligence yet so far behind it in terms of cybersecurity, including the most ba
sic: disaster recovery, or backup. Each of the NSA’s spoke sites collected its own intel, stor
ed the intel on its own local servers, and, because of bandwidth restrictions—limitations on t
he amount of data that could be transmitted at speed—often didn’t send copies back to the mai
n servers at NSA headquarters. This meant that if any data were destroyed at a particular site,
 the intelligence that the agency had worked hard to collect could be lost.
My chiefs at the PTC understood the risks the agency was taking by not keeping copies of many o
f its files, so they tasked me with engineering a solution and pitching it to the decision make
rs at headquarters. The result was a backup and storage system that would act as a shadow NSA: 
a complete, automated, and constantly updating copy of all of the agency’s most important mate
rial, which would allow the agency to reboot and be up and running again, with all its archives
 intact, even if Fort Meade were reduced to smoldering rubble.
The major problem with creating a global disaster-recovery system—or really with creating any 
type of backup system that involves a truly staggering number of computers—is dealing with dup
licated data. In plain terms, you have to handle situations in which, say, one thousand compute
rs all have copies of the same single file: you have to make sure you’re not backing up that s
ame file one thousand times, because that would require one thousand times the amount of bandwi
dth and storage space. It was this wasteful duplication, in particular, that was preventing the
 agency’s spoke sites from transmitting daily backups of their records to Fort Meade: the conn
ection would be clogged with a thousand copies of the same file containing the same intercepted
 phone call, 999 of which the agency did not need.
The way to avoid this was “deduplication”: a method to evaluate the uniqueness of data. The s
ystem that I designed would constantly scan the files at every facility at which the NSA stored
 records, testing each “block” of data down to the slightest fragment of a file to find out w
hether or not it was unique. Only if the agency lacked a copy of it back home would the data be
 automatically queued for transmission—reducing the volume that flowed over the agency’s tran
spacific fiber-optic connection from a waterfall to a trickle.
The combination of deduplication and constant improvements in storage technology allowed the ag
ency to store intelligence data for progressively longer periods of time. Just over the course 
of my career, the agency’s goal went from being able to store intelligence for days, to weeks,
 to months, to five years or more after its collection. By the time of this book’s publication
, the agency might already be able to store it for decades. The NSA’s conventional wisdom was 
that there was no point in collecting anything unless they could store it until it was useful, 
and there was no way to predict when exactly that would be. This rationalization was fuel for t
he agency’s ultimate dream, which is permanency—to store all of the files it has ever collect
ed or produced for perpetuity, and so create a perfect memory. The permanent record.
The NSA has a whole protocol you’re supposed to follow when you give a program a code name. It
’s basically an I Ching–like stochastic procedure that randomly picks words from two columns.
 An internal website throws imaginary dice to pick one name from column A, and throws again to 
pick one name from column B. This is how you end up with names that don’t mean anything, like 
FOXACID and EGOTISTICALGIRAFFE. The point of a code name is that it’s not supposed to refer to
 what the program does. (As has been reported, FOXACID was the code name for NSA servers that h
ost malware versions of familiar websites; EGOTISTICALGIRAFFE was an NSA program intended to ex
ploit a vulnerability in certain Web browsers running Tor, since they couldn’t break Tor itsel
f.) But agents at the NSA were so confident of their power and the agency’s absolute invulnera
bility that they rarely complied with the regulations. In short, they’d cheat and redo their d
ice throws until they got the name combination they wanted, whatever they thought was cool: TRA
FFICTHIEF, the VPN Attack Orchestrator.
I swear I never did that when I went about finding a name for my backup system. I swear that I 
just rolled the bones and came up with EPICSHELTER.
Later, once the agency adopted the system, they renamed it something like the Storage Moderniza
tion Plan or Storage Modernization Program. Within two years of the invention of EPICSHELTER, a
 variant had been implemented and was in standard use under yet another name.
* * *
THE MATERIAL THAT I disseminated to journalists in 2013 documented such an array of abuses by t
he NSA, accomplished through such a diversity of technological capabilities, that no one agent 
in the daily discharge of their responsibilities was ever in the position to know about all of 
them—not even a systems administrator. To find out about even a fraction of the malfeasance, y
ou had to go searching. And to go searching, you had to know that it existed.
It was something as banal as a conference that first clued me in to that existence, sparking my
 initial suspicion about the full scope of what the NSA was perpetrating.
In the midst of my EPICSHELTER work, the PTC hosted a conference on China sponsored by the Join
t Counterintelligence Training Academy (JCITA) for the Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA), an ag
ency connected to the Department of Defense that specializes in spying on foreign militaries an
d foreign military–related matters. This conference featured briefings given by experts from a
ll the intelligence components, the NSA, CIA, FBI, and military, about how the Chinese intellig
ence services were targeting the IC and what the IC could do to cause them trouble. Though Chin
a certainly interested me, this wasn’t the kind of work I would ordinarily have been involved 
in, so I didn’t pay the conference much mind until it was announced that the only technology b
riefer was unable to attend at the last minute. I’m not sure what the reason was for that abse
nce—maybe flu, maybe kismet—but the course chair for the conference asked if there was anyone
 at the PTC who might be able to step in as a replacement, since it was too late to reschedule.
 One of the chiefs mentioned my name, and when I was asked if I wanted to give it a shot, I sai
d yes. I liked my boss, and wanted to help him out. Also, I was curious, and relished the oppor
tunity to do something that wasn’t about data deduplication for a change.
My boss was thrilled. Then he told me the catch: the briefing was the next day.
I called Lindsay and told her I wouldn’t be home. I was going to be up all night preparing the
 presentation, whose nominal topic was the intersection between a very old discipline, counteri
ntelligence, and a very new discipline, cyberintelligence, coming together to try to exploit an
d thwart the adversary’s attempts to use the Internet to gather surveillance. I started pullin
g everything off the NSA network (and off the CIA network, to which I still had access), trying
 to read every top secret report I could find about what the Chinese were doing online. Specifi
cally, I read up on so-called intrusion sets, which are bundles of data about particular types 
of attacks, tools, and targets. IC analysts used these intrusion sets to identify specific Chin
ese military cyberintelligence or hacking groups, in the same way that detectives might try to 
identify a suspect responsible for a string of burglaries by a common set of characteristics or
 modus operandi.
The point of my researching this widely dispersed material was to do more than merely report on
 how China was hacking us, however. My primary task was to provide a summary of the IC’s asses
sment of China’s ability to electronically track American officers and assets operating in the
 region.
Everyone knows (or thinks they know) about the draconian Internet measures of the Chinese gover
nment, and some people know (or think they know) the gravamen of the disclosures I gave to jour
nalists in 2013 about my own government’s capabilities. But listen: It’s one thing to casuall
y say, in a science-fiction dystopic type of way, that a government can theoretically see and h
ear everything that all of its citizens are doing. It’s a very different thing for a governmen
t to actually try to implement such a system. What a science-fiction writer can describe in a s
entence might take the concerted work of thousands of technologists and millions of dollars of 
equipment. To read the technical details of China’s surveillance of private communications—to
 read a complete and accurate accounting of the mechanisms and machinery required for the const
ant collection, storage, and analysis of the billions of daily telephone and Internet communica
tions of over a billion people—was utterly mind-boggling. At first I was so impressed by the s
ystem’s sheer achievement and audacity that I almost forgot to be appalled by its totalitarian
 controls.
After all, China’s government was an explicitly antidemocratic single-party state. NSA agents,
 even more than most Americans, just took it for granted that the place was an authoritarian he
llhole. Chinese civil liberties weren’t my department. There wasn’t anything I could do about
 them. I worked, I was sure of it, for the good guys, and that made me a good guy, too.
But there were certain aspects of what I was reading that disturbed me. I was reminded of what 
is perhaps the fundamental rule of technological progress: if something can be done, it probabl
y will be done, and possibly already has been. There was simply no way for America to have so m
uch information about what the Chinese were doing without having done some of the very same thi
ngs itself, and I had the sneaking sense while I was looking through all this China material th
at I was looking at a mirror and seeing a reflection of America. What China was doing publicly 
to its own citizens, America might be—could be—doing secretly to the world.
And although you should hate me for it, I have to say that at the time I tamped down my unease.
 Indeed, I did my best to ignore it. The distinctions were still fairly clear to me. China’s G
reat Firewall was domestically censorious and repressive, intended to keep its citizens in and 
America out in the most chilling and demonstrative way, while the American systems were invisib
le and purely defensive. As I then understood US surveillance, anyone in the world could come i
n through America’s Internet infrastructure and access whatever content they pleased, unblocke
d and unfiltered—or at least only blocked and filtered by their home countries and American bu
sinesses, which are, presumptively, not under US government control. It was only those who’d b
een expressly targeted for visiting, for example, jihadist bombing sites or malware marketplace
s who would find themselves tracked and scrutinized.
Understood this way, the US surveillance model was perfectly okay with me. It was more than oka
y, actually—I fully supported defensive and targeted surveillance, a “firewall” that didn’t
 keep anybody out, but just burned the guilty.
But in the sleepless days after that sleepless night, some dim suspicion still stirred in my mi
nd. Long after I gave my China briefing, I couldn’t help but keep digging around.
* * *
AT THE START of my employment with the NSA, in 2009, I was only slightly more knowledgeable abo
ut its practices than the rest of the world. From journalists’ reports, I was aware of the age
ncy’s myriad surveillance initiatives authorized by President George W. Bush in the immediate 
aftermath of 9/11. In particular, I knew about its most publicly contested initiative, the warr
antless wiretapping component of the President’s Surveillance Program (PSP), which had been di
sclosed by the New York Times in 2005 thanks to the courage of a few NSA and Department of Just
ice whistleblowers.
Officially speaking, the PSP was an “executive order,” essentially a set of instructions set 
down by the American president that the government has to consider the equal of public law—eve
n if they’re just scribbled secretly on a napkin. The PSP empowered the NSA to collect telepho
ne and Internet communications between the United States and abroad. Notably, the PSP allowed t
he NSA to do this without having to obtain a special warrant from a Foreign Intelligence Survei
llance Court, a secret federal court established in 1978 to oversee IC requests for surveillanc
e warrants after the agencies were caught domestically spying on the anti–Vietnam War and civi
l rights movements.
Following the outcry that attended the Times revelations, and American Civil Liberties Union ch
allenges to the constitutionality of the PSP in non-secret, regular courts, the Bush administra
tion claimed to have let the program expire in 2007. But the expiration turned out to be a farc
e. Congress spent the last two years of the Bush administration passing legislation that retroa
ctively legalized the PSP. It also retroactively immunized from prosecution the telecoms and In
ternet service providers that had participated in it. This legislation—the Protect America Act
 of 2007 and the FISA Amendments Act of 2008—employed intentionally misleading language to rea
ssure US citizens that their communications were not being explicitly targeted, even as it effe
ctively extended the PSP’s remit. In addition to collecting inbound communications coming from
 foreign countries, the NSA now also had policy approval for the warrantless collection of outb
ound telephone and Internet communications originating within American borders.
That, at least, was the picture I got after reading the government’s own summary of the situat
ion, which was issued to the public in an unclassified version in July 2009, the very same summ
er that I spent delving into Chinese cyber-capabilities. This summary, which bore the nondescri
pt title Unclassified Report on the President’s Surveillance Program, was compiled by the Offi
ces of the Inspector Generals of five agencies (Department of Defense, Department of Justice, C
IA, NSA, and the Office of the Director of National Intelligence) and was offered to the public
 in lieu of a full congressional investigation of Bush-era NSA overreach. The fact that Preside
nt Obama, once in office, refused to call for a full congressional investigation was the first 
sign, to me at least, that the new president—for whom Lindsay had enthusiastically campaigned
—intended to move forward without a proper reckoning with the past. As his administration rebr
anded and recertified PSP-related programs, Lindsay’s hope in him, as well as my own, would pr
ove more and more misplaced.
While the unclassified report was mostly just old news, I found it informative in a few respect
s. I remember being immediately struck by its curious, they-do-protest-too-much tone, along wit
h more than a few twists of logic and language that didn’t compute. As the report laid out its
 legal arguments in support of various agency programs—rarely named, and almost never describe
d—I couldn’t help but notice the fact that hardly any of the executive branch officials who h
ad actually authorized these programs had agreed to be interviewed by the inspector generals. F
rom Vice President Dick Cheney and his counsel David Addington to Attorney General John Ashcrof
t and DOJ lawyer John Yoo, nearly every major player had refused to cooperate with the very off
ices responsible for holding the IC accountable, and the IGs couldn’t compel them to cooperate
, because this wasn’t a formal investigation involving testimony. It was hard for me to interp
ret their absence from the record as anything other than an admission of malfeasance.
Another aspect of the report that threw me was its repeated, obscure references to “Other Inte
lligence Activities” (the capitalization is the report’s) for which no “viable legal rationa
le” or no “legal basis” could be found beyond President Bush’s claim of executive powers du
ring wartime—a wartime that had no end in sight. Of course, these references gave no descripti
on whatsoever of what these Activities might actually be, but the process of deduction pointed 
to warrantless domestic surveillance, as it was pretty much the only intelligence activity not 
provided for under the various legal frameworks that appeared subsequent to the PSP.
As I read on, I wasn’t sure that anything disclosed in the report completely justified the leg
al machinations involved, let alone the threats by then deputy attorney general James Comey and
 then FBI director Robert Mueller to resign if certain aspects of the PSP were reauthorized. No
r did I notice anything that fully explained the risks taken by so many fellow agency members—
agents much senior to me, with decades of experience—and DOJ personnel to contact the press an
d express their misgivings about how aspects of the PSP were being abused. If they were putting
 their careers, their families, and their lives on the line, it had to be over something graver
 than the warrantless wiretapping that had already made headlines.
That suspicion sent me searching for the classified version of the report, and it was not in th
e least dispelled by the fact that such a version appeared not to exist. I didn’t understand. 
If the classified version was merely a record of the sins of the past, it should have been easi
ly accessible. But it was nowhere to be found. I wondered whether I was looking in the wrong pl
aces. After a while of ranging fairly widely and still finding nothing, though, I decided to dr
op the issue. Life took over and I had work to do. When you get asked to give recommendations o
n how to keep IC agents and assets from being uncovered and executed by the Chinese Ministry of
 State Security, it’s hard to remember what you were Googling the week before.
It was only later, long after I’d forgotten about the missing IG report, that the classified v
ersion came skimming across my desktop, as if in proof of that old maxim that the best way to f
ind something is to stop looking for it. Once the classified version turned up, I realized why 
I hadn’t had any luck finding it previously: it couldn’t be seen, not even by the heads of ag
encies. It was filed in an Exceptionally Controlled Information (ECI) compartment, an extremely
 rare classification used only to make sure that something would remain hidden even from those 
holding top secret clearance. Because of my position, I was familiar with most of the ECIs at t
he NSA, but not this one. The report’s full classification designation was TOP SECRET//STLW//H
CS/COMINT//ORCON/NOFORN, which translates to: pretty much only a few dozen people in the world 
are allowed to read this.
I was most definitely not one of them. The report came to my attention by mistake: someone in t
he NSA IG’s office had left a draft copy on a system that I, as a sysadmin, had access to. Its
 caveat of STLW, which I didn’t recognize, turned out to be what’s called a “dirty word” on
 my system: a label signifying a document that wasn’t supposed to be stored on lower-security 
drives. These drives were being constantly checked for any newly appearing dirty words, and the
 moment one was found I was alerted so that I could decide how best to scrub the document from 
the system. But before I did, I’d have to examine the offending file myself, just to confirm t
hat the dirty word search hadn’t flagged anything accidentally. Usually I’d take just the bri
efest glance at the thing. But this time, as soon I opened the document and read the title, I k
new I’d be reading it all the way through.
Here was everything that was missing from the unclassified version. Here was everything that th
e journalism I’d read had lacked, and that the court proceedings I’d followed had been denied
: a complete accounting of the NSA’s most secret surveillance programs, and the agency directi
ves and Department of Justice policies that had been used to subvert American law and contraven
e the US Constitution. After reading the thing, I could understand why no IC employee had ever 
leaked it to journalists, and no judge would be able to force the government to produce it in o
pen court. The document was so deeply classified that anybody who had access to it who wasn’t 
a sysadmin would be immediately identifiable. And the activities it outlined were so deeply cri
minal that no government would ever allow it to be released unredacted.
One issue jumped out at me immediately: it was clear that the unclassified version I was alread
y familiar with wasn’t a redaction of the classified version, as would usually be the practice
. Rather, it was a wholly different document, which the classified version immediately exposed 
as an outright and carefully concocted lie. The duplicity was stupefying, especially given that
 I’d just dedicated months of my time to deduplicating files. Most of the time, when you’re d
ealing with two versions of the same document, the differences between them are trivial—a few 
commas here, a few words there. But the only thing these two particular reports had in common w
as their title.
Whereas the unclassified version merely made reference to the NSA being ordered to intensify it
s intelligence-gathering practices following 9/11, the classified version laid out the nature, 
and scale, of that intensification. The NSA’s historic brief had been fundamentally altered fr
om targeted collection of communications to “bulk collection,” which is the agency’s euphemi
sm for mass surveillance. And whereas the unclassified version obfuscated this shift, advocatin
g for expanded surveillance by scaring the public with the specter of terror, the classified ve
rsion made this shift explicit, justifying it as the legitimate corollary of expanded technolog
ical capability.
The NSA IG’s portion of the classified report outlined what it called “a collection gap,” no
ting that existing surveillance legislation (particularly the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance
 Act) dated from 1978, a time when most communications signals traveled via radio or telephone 
lines, rather than fiber-optic cables and satellites. In essence, the agency was arguing that t
he speed and volume of contemporary communication had outpaced, and outgrown, American law—no 
court, not even a secret court, could issue enough individually targeted warrants fast enough t
o keep up—and that a truly global world required a truly global intelligence agency. All of th
is pointed, in the NSA’s logic, to the necessity of the bulk collection of Internet communicat
ions. The code name for this bulk collection initiative was indicated in the very “dirty word
” that got it flagged on my system: STLW, an abbreviation of STELLARWIND. This turned out to b
e the single major component of the PSP that had continued, and even grown, in secret after the
 rest of the program had been made public in the press.
STELLARWIND was the classified report’s deepest secret. It was, in fact, the NSA’s deepest se
cret, and the one that the report’s sensitive status had been designed to protect. The program
’s very existence was an indication that the agency’s mission had been transformed, from usin
g technology to defend America to using technology to control it by redefining citizens’ priva
te Internet communications as potential signals intelligence.
Such fraudulent redefinitions ran throughout the report, but perhaps the most fundamental and t
ransparently desperate involved the government’s vocabulary. STELLARWIND had been collecting c
ommunications since the PSP’s inception in 2001, but in 2004—when Justice Department official
s balked at the continuation of the initiative—the Bush administration attempted to legitimize
 it ex post facto by changing the meanings of basic English words, such as “acquire” and “ob
tain.” According to the report, it was the government’s position that the NSA could collect w
hatever communications records it wanted to, without having to get a warrant, because it could 
only be said to have acquired or obtained them, in the legal sense, if and when the agency “se
arched for and retrieved” them from its database.
This lexical sophistry was particularly galling to me, as I was well aware that the agency’s g
oal was to be able to retain as much data as it could for as long as it could—for perpetuity. 
If communications records would only be considered definitively “obtained” once they were use
d, they could remain “unobtained” but collected in storage forever, raw data awaiting its fut
ure manipulation. By redefining the terms “acquire” and “obtain”—from describing the act o
f data being entered into a database, to describing the act of a person (or, more likely, an al
gorithm) querying that database and getting a “hit” or “return” at any conceivable point in
 the future—the US government was developing the capacity of an eternal law-enforcement agency
. At any time, the government could dig through the past communications of anyone it wanted to 
victimize in search of a crime (and everybody’s communications contain evidence of something).
 At any point, for all perpetuity, any new administration—any future rogue head of the NSA—co
uld just show up to work and, as easily as flicking a switch, instantly track everybody with a 
phone or a computer, know who they were, where they were, what they were doing with whom, and w
hat they had ever done in the past.
* * *
THE TERM “MASS surveillance” is more clear to me, and I think to most people, than the govern
ment’s preferred “bulk collection,” which to my mind threatens to give a falsely fuzzy impre
ssion of the agency’s work. “Bulk collection” makes it sound like a particularly busy post o
ffice or sanitation department, as opposed to a historic effort to achieve total access to—and
 clandestinely take possession of—the records of all digital communications in existence.
But even once a common ground of terminology is established, misperceptions can still abound. M
ost people, even today, tend to think of mass surveillance in terms of content—the actual word
s they use when they make a phone call or write an email. When they find out that the governmen
t actually cares comparatively little about that content, they tend to care comparatively littl
e about government surveillance. This relief is understandable, to a degree, due to what each o
f us must regard as the uniquely revealing and intimate nature of our communications: the sound
 of our voice, almost as personal as a thumbprint; the inimitable facial expression we put on i
n a selfie sent by text. The unfortunate truth, however, is that the content of our communicati
ons is rarely as revealing as its other elements—the unwritten, unspoken information that can 
expose the broader context and patterns of behavior.
The NSA calls this “metadata.” The term’s prefix, “meta,” which traditionally is translate
d as “above” or “beyond,” is here used in the sense of “about”: metadata is data about da
ta. It is, more accurately, data that is made by data—a cluster of tags and markers that allow
 data to be useful. The most direct way of thinking about metadata, however, is as “activity d
ata,” all the records of all the things you do on your devices and all the things your devices
 do on their own. Take a phone call, for example: its metadata might include the date and time 
of the call, the call’s duration, the number from which the call was made, the number being ca
lled, and their locations. An email’s metadata might include information about what type of co
mputer it was generated on, where, and when, who the computer belonged to, who sent the email, 
who received it, where and when it was sent and received, and who if anyone besides the sender 
and recipient accessed it, and where and when. Metadata can tell your surveillant the address y
ou slept at last night and what time you got up this morning. It reveals every place you visite
d during your day and how long you spent there. It shows who you were in touch with and who was
 in touch with you.
It’s this fact that obliterates any government claim that metadata is somehow not a direct win
dow into the substance of a communication. With the dizzying volume of digital communications i
n the world, there is simply no way that every phone call could be listened to or email could b
e read. Even if it were feasible, however, it still wouldn’t be useful, and anyway, metadata m
akes this unnecessary by winnowing the field. This is why it’s best to regard metadata not as 
some benign abstraction, but as the very essence of content: it is precisely the first line of 
information that the party surveilling you requires.
There’s another thing, too: content is usually defined as something that you knowingly produce
. You know what you’re saying during a phone call, or what you’re writing in an email. But yo
u have hardly any control over the metadata you produce, because it is generated automatically.
 Just as it’s collected, stored, and analyzed by machine, it’s made by machine, too, without 
your participation or even consent. Your devices are constantly communicating for you whether y
ou want them to or not. And, unlike the humans you communicate with of your own volition, your 
devices don’t withhold private information or use code words in an attempt to be discreet. The
y merely ping the nearest cell phone towers with signals that never lie.
One major irony here is that law, which always lags behind technological innovation by at least
 a generation, gives substantially more protections to a communication’s content than to its m
etadata—and yet intelligence agencies are far more interested in the metadata—the activity re
cords that allow them both the “big picture” ability to analyze data at scale, and the “litt
le picture” ability to make perfect maps, chronologies, and associative synopses of an individ
ual person’s life, from which they presume to extrapolate predictions of behavior. In sum, met
adata can tell your surveillant virtually everything they’d ever want or need to know about yo
u, except what’s actually going on inside your head.
After reading this classified report, I spent the next weeks, even months, in a daze. I was sad
 and low, trying to deny everything I was thinking and feeling—that’s what was going on in my
 head, toward the end of my stint in Japan.
I felt far from home, but monitored. I felt more adult than ever, but also cursed with the know
ledge that all of us had been reduced to something like children, who’d be forced to live the 
rest of our lives under omniscient parental supervision. I felt like a fraud, making excuses to
 Lindsay to explain my sullenness. I felt like a fool, as someone of supposedly serious technic
al skills who’d somehow helped to build an essential component of this system without realizin
g its purpose. I felt used, as an employee of the IC who only now was realizing that all along 
I’d been protecting not my country but the state. I felt, above all, violated. Being in Japan 
only accentuated the sense of betrayal.
I’ll explain.
The Japanese that I’d managed to pick up through community college and my interests in anime a
nd manga was enough for me to speak and get through basic conversations, but reading was a diff
erent matter. In Japanese, each word can be represented by its own unique character, or a combi
nation of characters, called kanji, so there were tens of thousands of them—far too many for m
e to memorize. Often, I was only able to decode particular kanji if they were written with thei
r phonetic gloss, the furigana, which are most commonly meant for foreigners and young readers 
and so are typically absent from public texts like street signs. The result of all this was tha
t I walked around functionally illiterate. I’d get confused and end up going right when I shou
ld have gone left, or left when I should have gone right. I’d wander down the wrong streets an
d misorder from menus. I was a stranger, is what I’m saying, and often lost, in more ways than
 one. There were times when I’d accompany Lindsay out on one of her photography trips into the
 countryside and I’d suddenly stop and realize, in the midst of a village or in the middle of 
a forest, that I knew nothing whatsoever about my surroundings.
And yet: everything was known about me. I now understood that I was totally transparent to my g
overnment. The phone that gave me directions, and corrected me when I went the wrong way, and h
elped me translate the traffic signs, and told me the times of the buses and trains, was also m
aking sure that all of my doings were legible to my employers. It was telling my bosses where I
 was and when, even if I never touched the thing and just left it in my pocket.
I remember forcing myself to laugh about this once when Lindsay and I got lost on a hike and Li
ndsay—to whom I’d told nothing—just spontaneously said, “Why don’t you text Fort Meade and
 have them find us?” She kept the joke going, and I tried to find it funny but couldn’t. “He
llo,” she mimicked me, “can you help us with directions?”
Later I would live in Hawaii, near Pearl Harbor, where America was attacked and dragged into wh
at might have been its last just war. Here, in Japan, I was closer to Hiroshima and Nagasaki, w
here that war ignominiously ended. Lindsay and I had always hoped to visit those cities, but ev
ery time we planned to go we wound up having to cancel. On one of my first days off, we were al
l set to head down Honshu to Hiroshima, but I was called in to work and told to go in the oppos
ite direction—to Misawa Air Base in the frozen north. On the day of our next scheduled attempt
, Lindsay got sick, and then I got sick, too. Finally, the night before we intended to go to Na
gasaki, Lindsay and I were woken by our first major earthquake, jumped up from our futon, ran d
own seven flights of stairs, and spent the rest of the night out on the street with our neighbo
rs, shivering in our pajamas.
To my true regret, we never went. Those places are holy places, whose memorials honor the two h
undred thousand incinerated and the countless poisoned by fallout while reminding us of technol
ogy’s amorality.
I think often of what’s called the “atomic moment”—a phrase that in physics describes the m
oment when a nucleus coheres the protons and neutrons spinning around it into an atom, but that
’s popularly understood to mean the advent of the nuclear age, whose isotopes enabled advances
 in energy production, agriculture, water potability, and the diagnosis and treatment of deadly
 disease. It also created the atomic bomb.
Technology doesn’t have a Hippocratic oath. So many decisions that have been made by technolog
ists in academia, industry, the military, and government since at least the Industrial Revoluti
on have been made on the basis of “can we,” not “should we.” And the intention driving a te
chnology’s invention rarely, if ever, limits its application and use.
I do not mean, of course, to compare nuclear weapons with cybersurveillance in terms of human c
ost. But there is a commonality when it comes to the concepts of proliferation and disarmament.
The only two countries I knew of that had previously practiced mass surveillance were those two
 other major combatants of World War II—one America’s enemy, the other America’s ally. In bo
th Nazi Germany and Soviet Russia, the earliest public indications of that surveillance took th
e superficially innocuous form of a census, the official enumeration and statistical recording 
of a population. The First All-Union Census of the Soviet Union, in 1926, had a secondary agend
a beyond a simple count: it overtly queried Soviet citizens about their nationality. Its findin
gs convinced the ethnic Russians who comprised the Soviet elite that they were in the minority 
when compared to the aggregated masses of citizens who claimed a Central Asian heritage, such a
s Uzbeks, Kazakhs, Tajiks, Turkmen, Georgians, and Armenians. These findings significantly stre
ngthened Stalin’s resolve to eradicate these cultures, by “reeducating” their populations in
 the deracinating ideology of Marxism-Leninism.
The Nazi German census of 1939 took on a similar statistical project, but with the assistance o
f computer technology. It set out to count the Reich’s population in order to control it and t
o purge it—mainly of Jews and Roma—before exerting its murderous efforts on populations beyon
d its borders. To effect this, the Reich partnered with Dehomag, a German subsidiary of the Ame
rican IBM, which owned the patent to the punch card tabulator, a sort of analog computer that c
ounted holes punched into cards. Each citizen was represented by a card, and certain holes on t
he cards represented certain markers of identity. Column 22 addressed the religion rubric: hole
 1 was Protestant, hole 2 Catholic, and hole 3 Jewish. Shortly thereafter, this census informat
ion was used to identify and deport Europe’s Jewish population to the death camps.
A single current-model smartphone commands more computing power than all of the wartime machine
ry of the Reich and the Soviet Union combined. Recalling this is the surest way to contextualiz
e not just the modern American IC’s technological dominance, but also the threat it poses to d
emocratic governance. In the century or so since those census efforts, technology has made asto
unding progress, but the same could not be said for the law or human scruples that could restra
in it.
The United States has a census, too, of course. The Constitution established the American censu
s and enshrined it as the official federal count of each state’s population in order to determ
ine its proportional delegation to the House of Representatives. That was something of a revisi
onist principle, in that authoritarian governments, including the British monarchy that ruled t
he colonies, had traditionally used the census as a method of assessing taxes and ascertaining 
the number of young men eligible for military conscription. It was the Constitution’s genius t
o repurpose what had been a mechanism of oppression into one of democracy. The census, which is
 officially under the jurisdiction of the Senate, was ordered to be performed every ten years, 
which was roughly the amount of time it took to process the data of most American censuses foll
owing the first census of 1790. This decade-long lag was shortened by the census of 1890, which
 was the world’s first census to make use of computers (the prototypes of the models that IBM 
later sold to Nazi Germany). With computing technology, the processing time was cut in half.
Digital technology didn’t just further streamline such accounting—it is rendering it obsolete
. Mass surveillance is now a never-ending census, substantially more dangerous than any questio
nnaire sent through the mail. All our devices, from our phones to our computers, are basically 
miniature census-takers we carry in our backpacks and in our pockets—census-takers that rememb
er everything and forgive nothing.
Japan was my atomic moment. It was then that I realized where these new technologies were heade
d, and that if my generation didn’t intervene the escalation would only continue. It would be 
a tragedy if, by the time we’d finally resolved to resist, such resistance were futile. The ge
nerations to come would have to get used to a world in which surveillance wasn’t something occ
asional and directed in legally justified circumstances, but a constant and indiscriminate pres
ence: the ear that always hears, the eye that always sees, a memory that is sleepless and perma
nent.
Once the ubiquity of collection was combined with the permanency of storage, all any government
 had to do was select a person or a group to scapegoat and go searching—as I’d gone searching
 through the agency’s files—for evidence of a suitable crime.
17
Home on the Cloud
In 2011, I was back in the States, working for the same nominal employer, Dell, but now attache
d to my old agency, the CIA. One mild spring day, I came home from my first day at the new job 
and was amused to notice: the house I’d moved into had a mailbox. It was nothing fancy, just o
ne of those subdivided rectangles common to town house communities, but still, it made me smile
. I hadn’t had a mailbox in years, and hadn’t ever checked this one. I might not even have re
gistered its existence had it not been overflowing—stuffed to bursting with heaps of junk mail
 addressed to “Mr. Edward J. Snowden or Current Resident.” The envelopes contained coupons an
d ad circulars for household products. Someone knew that I’d just moved in.
A memory surfaced from my childhood, a memory of checking the mail and finding a letter to my s
ister. Although I wanted to open it, my mother wouldn’t let me.
I remember asking why. “Because,” she said, “it’s not addressed to you.” She explained tha
t opening mail intended for someone else, even if it was just a birthday card or a chain letter
, wasn’t a very nice thing to do. In fact, it was a crime.
I wanted to know what kind of crime. “A big one, buddy,” my mother said. “A federal crime.”
I stood in the parking lot, tore the envelopes in half, and carried them to the trash.
I had a new iPhone in the pocket of my new Ralph Lauren suit. I had new Burberry glasses. A new
 haircut. Keys to this new town house in Columbia, Maryland, the largest place I’d ever lived 
in, and the first place that really felt like mine. I was rich, or at least my friends thought 
so. I barely recognized myself.
I’d decided it was best to live in denial and just make some money, make life better for the p
eople I loved—after all, wasn’t that what everybody else did? But it was easier said than don
e. The denial, I mean. The money—that came easy. So easy that I felt guilty.
Counting Geneva, and not counting periodic trips home, I’d been away for nearly four years. Th
e America I returned to felt like a changed country. I won’t go as far as to say that I felt l
ike a foreigner, but I did find myself mired in way too many conversations I didn’t understand
. Every other word was the name of some TV show or movie I didn’t know, or a celebrity scandal
 I didn’t care about, and I couldn’t respond—I had nothing to respond with.
Contradictory thoughts rained down like Tetris blocks, and I struggled to sort them out—to mak
e them disappear. I thought, pity these poor, sweet, innocent people—they’re victims, watched
 by the government, watched by the very screens they worship. Then I thought: Shut up, stop bei
ng so dramatic—they’re happy, they don’t care, and you don’t have to, either. Grow up, do y
our work, pay your bills. That’s life.
A normal life was what Lindsay and I were hoping for. We were ready for the next stage and had 
decided to settle down. We had a nice backyard with a cherry tree that reminded me of a sweeter
 Japan, a spot on the Tama River where Lindsay and I had laughed and rolled around atop the fra
grant carpet of Tokyo blossoms as we watched the sakura fall.
Lindsay was getting certified as a yoga instructor. I, meanwhile, was getting used to my new po
sition—in sales.
One of the external vendors I’d worked with on EPICSHELTER ended up working for Dell, and conv
inced me that I was wasting my time with getting paid by the hour. I should get into the sales 
side of Dell’s business, he said, where I could earn a fortune—for more ideas like EPICSHELTE
R. I’d be making an astronomical leap up the corporate ladder, and he’d be getting a substant
ial referral bonus. I was ready to be convinced, especially since it meant distracting myself f
rom my growing sense of unease, which could only get me into trouble. The official job title wa
s solutions consultant. It meant, in essence, that I had to solve the problems created by my ne
w partner, whom I’m going to call Cliff, the account manager.
Cliff was supposed to be the face, and I was to be the brain. When we sat down with the CIA’s 
technical royalty and purchasing agents, his job was to sell Dell’s equipment and expertise by
 any means necessary. This meant reaching deep into the seat of his pants for unlimited slick p
romises as to how we’d do things for the agency, things that were definitely, definitely not p
ossible for our competitors (and, in reality, not possible for us, either). My job was to lead 
a team of experts in building something that reduced the degree to which Cliff had lied by just
 enough that, when the person who signed the check pressed the Power button, we wouldn’t all b
e sent to jail.
No pressure.
Our main project was to help the CIA catch up with the bleeding edge—or just with the technica
l standards of the NSA—by building it the buzziest of new technologies, a “private cloud.” T
he aim was to unite the agency’s processing and storage while distributing the ways by which d
ata could be accessed. In plain American, we wanted to make it so that someone in a tent in Afg
hanistan could do exactly the same work in exactly the same way as someone at CIA headquarters.
 The agency—and indeed the whole IC’s technical leadership—was constantly complaining about 
“silos”: the problem of having a billion buckets of data spread all over the world that they 
couldn’t keep track of or access. So I was leading a team of some of the smartest people at De
ll to come up with a way that anyone, anywhere, could reach anything.
During the proof of concept stage, the working name of our cloud became “Frankie.” Don’t bla
me me: on the tech side, we just called it “The Private Cloud.” It was Cliff who named it, in
 the middle of a demo with the CIA, saying they were going to love our little Frankenstein “be
cause it’s a real monster.”
The more promises Cliff made, the busier I became, leaving Lindsay and me only the weekends to 
catch up with our parents and old friends. We tried to furnish and equip our new home. The thre
e-story place had come empty, so we had to get everything, or everything that our parents hadn
’t generously handed down to us. This felt very mature, but was at the same time very telling 
about our priorities: we bought dishes, cutlery, a desk, and a chair, but we still slept on a m
attress on the floor. I’d become allergic to credit cards, with all their tracking, so we boug
ht everything outright, with hard currency. When we needed a car, I bought a ’98 Acura Integra
 from a classified ad for $3,000 cash. Earning money was one thing, but neither Lindsay nor I l
iked to spend it, unless it was for computer equipment—or a special occasion. For Valentine’s
 Day, I bought Lindsay the revolver she always wanted.
Our new condo was a twenty-minute drive from nearly a dozen malls, including the Columbia Mall,
 which has nearly 1.5 million square feet of shopping, occupied by some two hundred stores, a f
ourteen-screen AMC multiplex, a P.F. Chang’s, and a Cheesecake Factory. As we drove the famili
ar roads in the beat-up Integra, I was impressed, but also slightly taken aback, by all the dev
elopment that had occurred in my absence. The post-9/11 government spending spree had certainly
 put a lot of money into a lot of local pockets. It was an unsettling and even overwhelming exp
erience to come back to America after having been away for a while and to realize anew just how
 wealthy this part of the country was, and how many consumer options it offered—how many big-b
ox retailers and high-end interior design showrooms. And all of them had sales. For Presidents
’ Day, Memorial Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veterans’ Day. Festive banner
s announced the latest discounts, just below all the flags.
Our mission was pretty much appliance-based on this one afternoon I’m recalling—we were at Be
st Buy. Having settled on a new microwave, we were checking out, on Lindsay’s healthful insist
ence, a display of blenders. She had her phone out and was in the midst of researching which of
 the ten or so devices had the best reviews, when I found myself wandering over to the computer
 department at the far end of the store.
But along the way, I stopped. There, at the edge of the kitchenware section, ensconced atop a b
rightly decorated and lit elevated platform, was a shiny new refrigerator. Rather, it was a “S
martfridge,” which was being advertised as “Internet-equipped.”
This, plain and simple, blew my mind.
A salesperson approached, interpreting my stupefaction as interest—“It’s amazing, isn’t it?
”—and proceeded to demonstrate a few of the features. A screen was embedded in the door of th
e fridge, and next to the screen was a holder for a tiny stylus, which allowed you to scribble 
messages. If you didn’t want to scribble, you could record audio and video memos. You could al
so use the screen as you would your regular computer, because the refrigerator had Wi-Fi. You c
ould check your email, or check your calendar. You could watch YouTube clips, or listen to MP3s
. You could even make phone calls. I had to restrain myself from keying in Lindsay’s number an
d saying, from across the floor, “I’m calling from a fridge.”
Beyond that, the salesperson continued, the fridge’s computer kept track of internal temperatu
re, and, through scanning barcodes, the freshness of your food. It also provided nutritional in
formation and suggested recipes. I think the price was over $9,000. “Delivery included,” the 
salesperson said.
I remember driving home in a confused silence. This wasn’t quite the stunning moonshot tech-fu
ture we’d been promised. I was convinced the only reason that thing was Internet-equipped was 
so that it could report back to its manufacturer about its owner’s usage and about any other h
ousehold data that was obtainable. The manufacturer, in turn, would monetize that data by selli
ng it. And we were supposed to pay for the privilege.
I wondered what the point was of my getting so worked up over government surveillance if my fri
ends, neighbors, and fellow citizens were more than happy to invite corporate surveillance into
 their homes, allowing themselves to be tracked while browsing in their pantries as efficiently
 as if they were browsing the Web. It would still be another half decade before the domotics re
volution, before “virtual assistants” like Amazon Echo and Google Home were welcomed into the
 bedroom and placed proudly on nightstands to record and transmit all activity within range, to
 log all habits and preferences (not to mention fetishes and kinks), which would then be develo
ped into advertising algorithms and converted into cash. The data we generate just by living—o
r just by letting ourselves be surveilled while living—would enrich private enterprise and imp
overish our private existence in equal measure. If government surveillance was having the effec
t of turning the citizen into a subject, at the mercy of state power, then corporate surveillan
ce was turning the consumer into a product, which corporations sold to other corporations, data
 brokers, and advertisers.
Meanwhile, it felt as if every major tech company, including Dell, was rolling out new civilian
 versions of what I was working on for the CIA: a cloud. (In fact, Dell had even tried four yea
rs previously to trademark the term “cloud computing” but was denied.) I was amazed at how wi
llingly people were signing up, so excited at the prospect of their photos and videos and music
 and e-books being universally backed up and available that they never gave much thought as to 
why such an uber-sophisticated and convenient storage solution was being offered to them for “
free” or for “cheap” in the first place.
I don’t think I’d ever seen such a concept be so uniformly bought into, on every side. “The 
cloud” was as effective a sales term for Dell to sell to the CIA as it was for Amazon and Appl
e and Google to sell to their users. I can still close my eyes and hear Cliff schmoozing some C
IA suit about how “with the cloud, you’ll be able to push security updates across agency comp
uters worldwide,” or “when the cloud’s up and running, the agency will be able to track who 
has read what file worldwide.” The cloud was white and fluffy and peaceful, floating high abov
e the fray. Though many clouds make a stormy sky, a single cloud provided a benevolent bit of s
hade. It was protective. I think it made everyone think of heaven.
Dell—along with the largest cloud-based private companies, Amazon, Apple, and Google—regarded
 the rise of the cloud as a new age of computing. But in concept, at least, it was something of
 a regression to the old mainframe architecture of computing’s earliest history, where many us
ers all depended upon a single powerful central core that could only be maintained by an elite 
cadre of professionals. The world had abandoned this “impersonal” mainframe model only a gene
ration before, once businesses like Dell developed “personal” computers cheap enough, and sim
ple enough, to appeal to mortals. The renaissance that followed produced desktops, laptops, tab
lets, and smartphones—all devices that allowed people the freedom to make an immense amount of
 creative work. The only issue was—how to store it?
This was the genesis of “cloud computing.” Now it didn’t really matter what kind of personal
 computer you had, because the real computers that you relied upon were warehoused in the enorm
ous data centers that the cloud companies built throughout the world. These were, in a sense, t
he new mainframes, row after row of racked, identical servers linked together in such a way tha
t each individual machine acted together within a collective computing system. The loss of a si
ngle server or even of an entire data center no longer mattered, because they were mere droplet
s in the larger, global cloud.
From the standpoint of a regular user, a cloud is just a storage mechanism that ensures that yo
ur data is being processed or stored not on your personal device, but on a range of different s
ervers, which can ultimately be owned and operated by different companies. The result is that y
our data is no longer truly yours. It’s controlled by companies, which can use it for virtuall
y any purpose.
Read your terms of service agreements for cloud storage, which get longer and longer by the yea
r—current ones are over six thousand words, twice the average length of one of these book chap
ters. When we choose to store our data online, we’re often ceding our claim to it. Companies c
an decide what type of data they will hold for us, and can willfully delete any data they objec
t to. Unless we’ve kept a separate copy on our own machines or drives, this data will be lost 
to us forever. If any of our data is found to be particularly objectionable or otherwise in vio
lation of the terms of service, the companies can unilaterally delete our accounts, deny us our
 own data, and yet retain a copy for their own records, which they can turn over to the authori
ties without our knowledge or consent. Ultimately, the privacy of our data depends on the owner
ship of our data. There is no property less protected, and yet no property more private.
* * *
THE INTERNET I’D grown up with, the Internet that had raised me, was disappearing. And with it
, so was my youth. The very act of going online, which had once seemed like a marvelous adventu
re, now seemed like a fraught ordeal. Self-expression now required such strong self-protection 
as to obviate its liberties and nullify its pleasures. Every communication was a matter not of 
creativity but of safety. Every transaction was a potential danger.
Meanwhile, the private sector was busy leveraging our reliance on technology into market consol
idation. The majority of American Internet users lived their entire digital lives on email, soc
ial media, and e-commerce platforms owned by an imperial triumvirate of companies (Google, Face
book, and Amazon), and the American IC was seeking to take advantage of that fact by obtaining 
access to their networks—both through direct orders that were kept secret from the public, and
 clandestine subversion efforts that were kept secret from the companies themselves. Our user d
ata was turning vast profits for the companies, and the government pilfered it for free. I don
’t think I’d ever felt so powerless.
Then there was this other emotion that I felt, a curious sense of being adrift and yet, at the 
same time, of having my privacy violated. It was as if I were dispersed—with parts of my life 
scattered across servers all over the globe—and yet intruded or imposed upon. Every morning wh
en I left our town house, I found myself nodding at the security cameras dotted throughout our 
development. Previously I’d never paid them any attention, but now, when a light turned red on
 my commute, I couldn’t help but think of its leering sensor, keeping tabs on me whether I ble
w through the intersection or stopped. License-plate readers were recording my comings and goin
gs, even if I maintained a speed of 35 miles per hour.
America’s fundamental laws exist to make the job of law enforcement not easier but harder. Thi
s isn’t a bug, it’s a core feature of democracy. In the American system, law enforcement is e
xpected to protect citizens from one another. In turn, the courts are expected to restrain that
 power when it’s abused, and to provide redress against the only members of society with the d
omestic authority to detain, arrest, and use force—including lethal force. Among the most impo
rtant of these restraints are the prohibitions against law enforcement surveilling private citi
zens on their property and taking possession of their private recordings without a warrant. The
re are few laws, however, that restrain the surveillance of public property, which includes the
 vast majority of America’s streets and sidewalks.
Law enforcement’s use of surveillance cameras on public property was originally conceived of a
s a crime deterrent and an aid to investigators after a crime had occurred. But as the cost of 
these devices continued to fall, they became ubiquitous, and their role became preemptive—with
 law enforcement using them to track people who had not committed, or were not even suspected o
f, any crime. And the greatest danger still lies ahead, with the refinement of artificial intel
ligence capabilities such as facial and pattern recognition. An AI-equipped surveillance camera
 would be no mere recording device, but could be made into something closer to an automated pol
ice officer—a true robo-cop actively seeking out “suspicious” activity, such as apparent dru
g deals (that is, people embracing or shaking hands) and apparent gang affiliation (such as peo
ple wearing specific colors and brands of clothing). Even in 2011, it was clear to me that this
 was where technology was leading us, without any substantive public debate.
Potential monitoring abuses piled up in my mind to cumulatively produce a vision of an appallin
g future. A world in which all people were totally surveilled would logically become a world in
 which all laws were totally enforced, automatically, by computers. After all, it’s difficult 
to imagine an AI device that’s capable of noticing a person breaking the law not holding that 
person accountable. No policing algorithm would ever be programmed, even if it could be, toward
 leniency or forgiveness.
I wondered whether this would be the final but grotesque fulfillment of the original American p
romise that all citizens would be equal before the law: an equality of oppression through total
 automated law enforcement. I imagined the future SmartFridge stationed in my kitchen, monitori
ng my conduct and habits, and using my tendency to drink straight from the carton or not wash m
y hands to evaluate the probability of my being a felon.
Such a world of total automated law enforcement—of, say, all pet-ownership laws, or all zoning
 laws regulating home businesses—would be intolerable. Extreme justice can turn out to be extr
eme injustice, not just in terms of the severity of punishment for an infraction, but also in t
erms of how consistently and thoroughly the law is applied and prosecuted. Nearly every large a
nd long-lived society is full of unwritten laws that everyone is expected to follow, along with
 vast libraries of written laws that no one is expected to follow, or even know about. Accordin
g to Maryland Criminal Law Section 10-501, adultery is illegal and punishable by a $10 fine. In
 North Carolina, statute 14-309.8 makes it illegal for a bingo game to last more than five hour
s. Both of these laws come from a more prudish past and yet, for one reason or another, were ne
ver repealed. Most of our lives, even if we don’t realize it, occur not in black and white but
 in a gray area, where we jaywalk, put trash in the recycling bin and recyclables in the trash,
 ride our bicycles in the improper lane, and borrow a stranger’s Wi-Fi to download a book that
 we didn’t pay for. Put simply, a world in which every law is always enforced would be a world
 in which everyone was a criminal.
I tried to talk to Lindsay about all this. But though she was generally sympathetic to my conce
rns, she wasn’t so sympathetic that she was ready to go off the grid, or even off Facebook or 
Instagram. “If I did that,” she said, “I’d be giving up my art and abandoning my friends. Y
ou used to like being in touch with other people.”
She was right. And she was right to be worried about me. She thought I was too tense, and under
 too much stress. I was—not because of my work, but because of my desire to tell her a truth t
hat I wasn’t allowed to. I couldn’t tell her that my former coworkers at the NSA could target
 her for surveillance and read the love poems she texted me. I couldn’t tell her that they cou
ld access all the photos she took—not just her public photos, but the intimate ones. I couldn
’t tell her that her information was being collected, that everyone’s information was being c
ollected, which was tantamount to a government threat: If you ever get out of line, we’ll use 
your private life against you.
I tried to explain it to her, obliquely, through an analogy. I told her to imagine opening up h
er laptop one day and finding a spreadsheet on her desktop.
“Why?” she said. “I don’t like spreadsheets.”
I wasn’t prepared for this response, so I just said the first thing that came to mind. “Nobod
y does, but this one’s called The End.”
“Ooh, mysterious.”
“You don’t remember having created this spreadsheet, but once you open it up, you recognize i
ts contents. Because inside it is everything, absolutely everything, that could ruin you. Every
 speck of information that could destroy your life.”
Lindsay smiled. “Can I see the one for you?”
She was joking, but I wasn’t. A spreadsheet containing every scrap of data about you would pos
e a mortal hazard. Imagine it: all the secrets big and small that could end your marriage, end 
your career, poison even your closest relationships, and leave you broke, friendless, and in pr
ison. Maybe the spreadsheet would include the joint you smoked last weekend at a friend’s hous
e, or the one line of cocaine you snorted off the screen of your phone in a bar in college. Or 
the drunken one-night stand you had with your friend’s girlfriend, who’s now your friend’s w
ife, which you both regret and have agreed never to mention to anyone. Or an abortion you got w
hen you were a teenager, which you kept hidden from your parents and that you’d like to keep h
idden from your spouse. Or maybe it’s just information about a petition you signed, or a prote
st you attended. Everyone has something, some compromising information buried among their bytes
—if not in their files then in their email, if not in their email then in their browsing histo
ry. And now this information was being stored by the US government.
Some time after our exchange, Lindsay came up to me and said, “I figured out what would be on 
my Spreadsheet of Total Destruction—the secret that would ruin me.”
“What?”
“I’m not going to tell you.”
I tried to chill, but I kept having strange physical symptoms. I’d become weirdly clumsy, fall
ing off ladders—more than once—or bumping into door frames. Sometimes I’d trip, or drop spoo
ns I was holding, or fail to gauge distances accurately and miss what I was reaching for. I’d 
spill water over myself, or choke on it. Lindsay and I would be in the middle of a conversation
 when I’d miss what she’d said, and she’d ask where I’d gone to—it was like I’d been froz
en in another world.
One day when I went to meet Lindsay after her pole-fitness class, I started feeling dizzy. This
 was the most disturbing of the symptoms I’d had thus far. It scared me, and scared Lindsay, t
oo, especially when it led to a gradual diminishing of my senses. I had too many explanations f
or these incidents: poor diet, lack of exercise, lack of sleep. I had too many rationalizations
: the plate was too close to the edge of the counter, the stairs were slippery. I couldn’t mak
e up my mind whether it was worse if what I was experiencing was psychosomatic or genuine. I de
cided to go to the doctor, but the only appointment wasn’t for weeks.
A day or so later, I was home around noon, trying my best to keep up with work remotely. I was 
on the phone with a security officer at Dell when the dizziness hit me hard. I immediately excu
sed myself from the call, slurring my words, and as I struggled to hang up the phone, I was sur
e: I was going to die.
For those who’ve experienced it, this sense of impending doom needs no description, and for th
ose who haven’t, there is no explanation. It strikes so suddenly and primally that it wipes ou
t all other feeling, all thought besides helpless resignation. My life was over. I slumped in m
y chair, a big black padded Aeron that tilted underneath me as I fell into a void and lost cons
ciousness.
I came to still seated, with the clock on my desk reading just shy of 1:00 p.m. I’d been out l
ess than an hour, but I was exhausted. It was as if I’d been awake since the beginning of time
.
I reached for the phone in a panic, but my hand kept missing it and grabbing the air. Once I ma
naged to grab ahold of it and get a dial tone, I found I couldn’t remember Lindsay’s number, 
or could only remember the digits but not their order.
Somehow I managed to get myself downstairs, taking each step deliberately, palm against the wal
l. I got some juice out of the fridge and chugged it, keeping both hands on the carton and drib
bling a fair amount on my chin. Then I lay down on the floor, pressed my cheek to the cool lino
leum, and fell asleep, which was how Lindsay found me.
I’d just had an epileptic seizure.
My mother had epilepsy, and for a time at least was prone to grand mal seizures: the foaming at
 the mouth, her limbs thrashing, her body rolling around until it stilled into a horrible uncon
scious rigidity. I couldn’t believe I hadn’t previously associated my symptoms with hers, tho
ugh that was the very same denial she herself had been in for decades, attributing her frequent
 falls to “clumsiness” and “lack of coordination.” She hadn’t been diagnosed until her fir
st grand mal in her late thirties, and, after a brief spell on medication, her seizures stopped
. She’d always told me and my sister that epilepsy wasn’t hereditary and to this day I’m sti
ll not sure if that’s what her doctor had told her or if she was just trying to reassure us th
at her fate wouldn’t be ours.
There is no diagnostic test for epilepsy. The clinical diagnosis is just two or more unexplaine
d seizures—that’s it. Very little is known about the condition. Medicine tends to treat epile
psy phenomenologically. Doctors don’t talk about “epilepsy,” they talk about “seizures.” T
hey tend to divide seizures into two types: localized and generalized, the former being an elec
trical misfire in a certain section of your brain that doesn’t spread, the latter being an ele
ctrical misfire that creates a chain reaction. Basically, a wave of misfiring synapses rolls ac
ross your brain, causing you to lose motor function and, ultimately, consciousness.
Epilepsy is such a strange syndrome. Its sufferers feel different things, depending on which pa
rt of their brain has the initial electrical cascade failure. Those who have this failure in th
eir auditory center famously hear bells. Those who have it in their visual center either have t
heir vision go dark or see sparkles. If the failure happens in the deeper core areas of the bra
in—which was where mine occurred—it can cause severe vertigo. In time, I came to know the war
ning signs, so I could prepare for an oncoming seizure. These signs are called “auras,” in th
e popular language of epilepsy, though in scientific fact these auras are the seizure itself. T
hey are the proprioceptive experience of the misfire.
I consulted with as many epilepsy specialists as I could find—the best part of working for Del
l was the insurance: I had CAT scans, MRIs, the works. Meanwhile, Lindsay, who was my stalwart 
angel throughout all this, driving me back and forth from appointments, went about researching 
all the information that was available about the syndrome. She Googled both allopathic and home
opathic treatments so intensely that basically all her Gmail ads were for epilepsy pharmaceutic
als.
I felt defeated. The two great institutions of my life had been betrayed and were betraying me:
 my country and the Internet. And now my body was following suit.
My brain had, quite literally, short-circuited.
18
On the Couch
It was late at night on May 1, 2011, when I noticed the news alert on my phone: Osama bin Laden
 had been tracked down to Abbottabad, Pakistan, and killed by a team of Navy SEALs.
So there it was. The man who’d masterminded the attacks that had propelled me into the army, a
nd from there into the Intelligence Community, was now dead, a dialysis patient shot point-blan
k in the embrace of his multiple wives in their lavish compound just down the road from Pakista
n’s major military academy. Site after site showed maps indicating where the hell Abbottabad w
as, alternating with street scenes from cities throughout America, where people were fist-pumpi
ng, chest-bumping, yelling, getting wasted. Even New York was celebrating, which almost never h
appens.
I turned off the phone. I just didn’t have it in me to join in. Don’t get me wrong: I was gla
d the motherfucker was dead. I was just having a pensive moment and felt a circle closing.
Ten years. That’s how long it had been since those two planes flew into the Twin Towers, and w
hat did we have to show for it? What had the last decade actually accomplished? I sat on the co
uch I’d inherited from my mother’s condo and gazed through the window into the street beyond 
as a neighbor honked the horn of his parked car. I couldn’t shake the idea that I’d wasted th
e last decade of my life.
The previous ten years had been a cavalcade of American-made tragedy: the forever war in Afghan
istan, catastrophic regime change in Iraq, indefinite detentions at Guantánamo Bay, extraordin
ary renditions, torture, targeted killings of civilians—even of American civilians—via drone 
strikes. Domestically, there was the Homeland Securitization of everything, which assigned a th
reat rating to every waking day (Red–Severe, Orange–High, Yellow–Elevated), and, from the Pa
triot Act on, the steady erosion of civil liberties, the very liberties we were allegedly fight
ing to protect. The cumulative damage—the malfeasance in aggregate—was staggering to contempl
ate and felt entirely irreversible, and yet we were still honking our horns and flashing our li
ghts in jubilation.
The biggest terrorist attack on American soil happened concurrently with the development of dig
ital technology, which made much of the earth American soil—whether we liked it or not. Terror
ism, of course, was the stated reason why most of my country’s surveillance programs were impl
emented, at a time of great fear and opportunism. But it turned out that fear was the true terr
orism, perpetrated by a political system that was increasingly willing to use practically any j
ustification to authorize the use of force. American politicians weren’t as afraid of terror a
s they were of seeming weak, or of being disloyal to their party, or of being disloyal to their
 campaign donors, who had ample appetites for government contracts and petroleum products from 
the Middle East. The politics of terror became more powerful than the terror itself, resulting 
in “counterterror”: the panicked actions of a country unmatched in capability, unrestrained b
y policy, and blatantly unconcerned about upholding the rule of law. After 9/11, the IC’s orde
rs had been “never again,” a mission that could never be accomplished. A decade later, it had
 become clear, to me at least, that the repeated evocations of terror by the political class we
re not a response to any specific threat or concern but a cynical attempt to turn terror into a
 permanent danger that required permanent vigilance enforced by unquestionable authority.
After a decade of mass surveillance, the technology had proved itself to be a potent weapon les
s against terror and more against liberty itself. By continuing these programs, by continuing t
hese lies, America was protecting little, winning nothing, and losing much—until there would b
e few distinctions left between those post-9/11 polarities of “Us” and “Them.”
* * *
THE LATTER HALF of 2011 passed in a succession of seizures, and in countless doctors’ offices 
and hospitals. I was imaged, tested, and prescribed medications that stabilized my body but clo
uded my mind, turning me depressed, lethargic, and unable to focus.
I wasn’t sure how I was going to live with what Lindsay was now calling my “condition” witho
ut losing my job. Being the top technologist for Dell’s CIA account meant I had tremendous fle
xibility: my office was my phone, and I could work from home. But meetings were an issue. They 
were always in Virginia, and I lived in Maryland, a state whose laws prevented people diagnosed
 with epilepsy from driving. If I were caught behind the wheel, I could lose my driver’s licen
se, and with it my ability to attend the meetings that were the single nonnegotiable requiremen
t of my position.
I finally gave in to the inevitable, took a short-term disability leave from Dell, and decamped
 to my mother’s secondhand couch. It was as blue as my mood, but comfortable. For weeks and we
eks it was the center of my existence—the place where I slept and ate and read and slept some 
more, the place where I just generally wallowed bleakly as time mocked me.
I don’t remember what books I tried to read, but I do remember never managing much more than a
 page before closing my eyes and sinking back again into the cushions. I couldn’t concentrate 
on anything except my own weakness, the uncooperative lump that used to be me spread across the
 upholstery, motionless but for a lone finger atop the screen of the phone that was the only li
ght in the room.
I’d scroll through the news, then nap, then scroll again, then nap—while protesters in Tunisi
a, Libya, Egypt, Yemen, Algeria, Morocco, Iraq, Lebanon, and Syria were being imprisoned and to
rtured or just shot in the streets by the secret state agents of thuggish regimes, many of whic
h America had helped keep in power. The suffering of that season was immense, spiraling out of 
the regular news cycle. What I was witnessing was desperation, compared with which my own strug
gles seemed cheap. They seemed small—morally and ethically small—and privileged.
Throughout the Middle East, innocent civilians were living under the constant threat of violenc
e, with work and school suspended, no electricity, no sewage. In many regions, they didn’t hav
e access to even the most rudimentary medical care. But if at any moment I doubted that my anxi
eties about surveillance and privacy were relevant, or even appropriate, in the face of such im
mediate danger and privation, I only had to pay a bit more attention to the crowds on the stree
t and the proclamations they were making—in Cairo and Sanaa, in Beirut and Damascus, in Ahvaz,
 Khuzestan, and in every other city of the Arab Spring and Iranian Green Movement. The crowds w
ere calling for an end to oppression, censorship, and precarity. They were declaring that in a 
truly just society the people were not answerable to the government, the government was answera
ble to the people. Although each crowd in each city, even on each day, seemed to have its own s
pecific motivation and its own specific goals, they all had one thing in common: a rejection of
 authoritarianism, a recommitment to the humanitarian principle that an individual’s rights ar
e inborn and inalienable.
In an authoritarian state, rights derive from the state and are granted to the people. In a fre
e state, rights derive from the people and are granted to the state. In the former, people are 
subjects, who are only allowed to own property, pursue an education, work, pray, and speak beca
use their government permits them to. In the latter, people are citizens, who agree to be gover
ned in a covenant of consent that must be periodically renewed and is constitutionally revocabl
e. It’s this clash, between the authoritarian and the liberal democratic, that I believe to be
 the major ideological conflict of my time—not some concocted, prejudiced notion of an East-We
st divide, or of a resurrected crusade against Christendom or Islam.
Authoritarian states are typically not governments of laws, but governments of leaders, who dem
and loyalty from their subjects and are hostile to dissent. Liberal-democratic states, by contr
ast, make no or few such demands, but depend almost solely on each citizen voluntarily assuming
 the responsibility of protecting the freedoms of everyone else around them, regardless of thei
r race, ethnicity, creed, ability, sexuality, or gender. Any collective guarantee, predicated n
ot on blood but on assent, will wind up favoring egalitarianism—and though democracy has often
 fallen far short of its ideal, I still believe it to be the one form of governance that most f
ully enables people of different backgrounds to live together, equal before the law.
This equality consists not only of rights but also of freedoms. In fact, many of the rights mos
t cherished by citizens of democracies aren’t even provided for in law except by implication. 
They exist in that open-ended empty space created through the restriction of government power. 
For example, Americans only have a “right” to free speech because the government is forbidden
 from making any law restricting that freedom, and a “right” to a free press because the gove
rnment is forbidden from making any law to abridge it. They only have a “right” to worship fr
eely because the government is forbidden from making any law respecting an establishment of rel
igion, and a “right” to peaceably assemble and protest because the government is forbidden fr
om making any law that says they can’t.
In contemporary life, we have a single concept that encompasses all this negative or potential 
space that’s off-limits to the government. That concept is “privacy.” It is an empty zone th
at lies beyond the reach of the state, a void into which the law is only permitted to venture w
ith a warrant—and not a warrant “for everybody,” such as the one the US government has arrog
ated to itself in pursuit of mass surveillance, but a warrant for a specific person or purpose 
supported by a specific probable cause.
The word “privacy” itself is somewhat empty, because it is essentially indefinable, or over-d
efinable. Each of us has our own idea of what it is. “Privacy” means something to everyone. T
here is no one to whom it means nothing.
It’s because of this lack of common definition that citizens of pluralistic, technologically s
ophisticated democracies feel that they have to justify their desire for privacy and frame it a
s a right. But citizens of democracies don’t have to justify that desire—the state, instead, 
must justify its violation. To refuse to claim your privacy is actually to cede it, either to a
 state trespassing its constitutional restraints or to a “private” business.
There is, simply, no way to ignore privacy. Because a citizenry’s freedoms are interdependent,
 to surrender your own privacy is really to surrender everyone’s. You might choose to give it 
up out of convenience, or under the popular pretext that privacy is only required by those who 
have something to hide. But saying that you don’t need or want privacy because you have nothin
g to hide is to assume that no one should have, or could have, to hide anything—including thei
r immigration status, unemployment history, financial history, and health records. You’re assu
ming that no one, including yourself, might object to revealing to anyone information about the
ir religious beliefs, political affiliations, and sexual activities, as casually as some choose
 to reveal their movie and music tastes and reading preferences.
Ultimately, saying that you don’t care about privacy because you have nothing to hide is no di
fferent from saying you don’t care about freedom of speech because you have nothing to say. Or
 that you don’t care about freedom of the press because you don’t like to read. Or that you d
on’t care about freedom of religion because you don’t believe in God. Or that you don’t care
 about the freedom to peaceably assemble because you’re a lazy, antisocial agoraphobe. Just be
cause this or that freedom might not have meaning to you today doesn’t mean that it doesn’t o
r won’t have meaning tomorrow, to you, or to your neighbor—or to the crowds of principled dis
sidents I was following on my phone who were protesting halfway across the planet, hoping to ga
in just a fraction of the freedoms that my country was busily dismantling.
I wanted to help, but I didn’t know how. I’d had enough of feeling helpless, of being just an
 asshole in flannel lying around on a shabby couch eating Cool Ranch Doritos and drinking Diet 
Coke while the world went up in flames.
The young people of the Middle East were agitating for higher wages, lower prices, and better p
ensions, but I couldn’t give them any of that, and no one could give them a better shot at sel
f-governance than the one they were taking themselves. They were, however, also agitating for a
 freer Internet. They were decrying Iran’s Ayatollah Khamenei, who had been increasingly censo
ring and blocking threatening Web content, tracking and hacking traffic to offending platforms 
and services, and shutting down certain foreign ISPs entirely. They were protesting Egypt’s pr
esident, Hosni Mubarak, who’d cut off Internet access for his whole country—which had merely 
succeeded in making every young person in the country even more furious and bored, luring them 
out into the streets.
Ever since I’d been introduced to the Tor Project in Geneva, I’d used its browser and run my 
own Tor server, wanting to do my professional work from home and my personal Web browsing unmon
itored. Now, I shook off my despair, propelled myself off the couch, and staggered over to my h
ome office to set up a bridge relay that would bypass the Iranian Internet blockades. I then di
stributed its encrypted configuration identity to the Tor core developers.
This was the least I could do. If there was just the slightest chance that even one young kid f
rom Iran who hadn’t been able to get online could now bypass the imposed filters and restricti
ons and connect to me—connect through me—protected by the Tor system and my server’s anonymi
ty, then it was certainly worth my minimal effort.
I imagined this person reading their email, or checking their social media accounts to make sur
e that their friends and family had not been arrested. I had no way of knowing whether this was
 what they did, or whether anyone at all linked to my server from Iran. And that was the point:
 the aid I offered was private.
The guy who started the Arab Spring was almost exactly my age. He was a produce peddler in Tuni
sia, selling fruits and vegetables out of a cart. In protest against repeated harassment and ex
tortion by the authorities, he stood in the square and set fire to his life, dying a martyr. If
 burning himself to death was the last free act he could manage in defiance of an illegitimate 
regime, I could certainly get up off the couch and press a few buttons.
PART THREE
19
The Tunnel
Imagine you’re entering a tunnel. Imagine the perspective: as you look down the length that st
retches ahead of you, notice how the walls seem to narrow to the tiny dot of light at the other
 end. The light at the end of the tunnel is a symbol of hope, and it’s also what people say th
ey see in near-death experiences. They have to go to it, they say. They’re drawn to it. But th
en where else is there to go in a tunnel, except through it? Hasn’t everything led up to this 
point?
My tunnel was the Tunnel: an enormous Pearl Harbor–era airplane factory turned NSA facility lo
cated under a pineapple field in Kunia, on the island of Oahu, Hawaii. The facility was built o
ut of reinforced concrete, its eponymous tunnel a kilometer-long tube in the side of a hill ope
ning up into three cavernous floors of server vaults and offices. At the time the Tunnel was bu
ilt, the hill was covered over with huge amounts of sand, soil, desiccated pineapple plant leav
es, and patches of sun-parched grass to camouflage it from Japanese bombers. Sixty years later 
it resembled the vast burial mound of a lost civilization, or some gigantic arid pile that a we
ird god had heaped up in the middle of a god-size sandbox. Its official name was the Kunia Regi
onal Security Operations Center.
I went to work there, still on a Dell contract, but now for the NSA again, early in 2012. One d
ay that summer—actually, it was my birthday—as I passed through the security checks and proce
eded down the tunnel, it struck me: this, in front of me, was my future.
I’m not saying that I made any decisions at that instant. The most important decisions in life
 are never made that way. They’re made subconsciously and only express themselves consciously 
once fully formed—once you’re finally strong enough to admit to yourself that this is what yo
ur conscience has already chosen for you, this is the course that your beliefs have decreed. Th
at was my twenty-ninth birthday present to myself: the awareness that I had entered a tunnel th
at would narrow my life down toward a single, still-indistinct act.
Just as Hawaii has always been an important waystation—historically, the US military treated t
he island chain as little more than a mid-Pacific refueling depot for boats and planes—it had 
also become an important switchpoint for American communications. These include the intelligenc
e that flowed between the contiguous forty-eight states and my former place of employment, Japa
n, as well as other sites in Asia.
The job I’d taken was a significant step down the career ladder, with duties I could at this p
oint perform in my sleep. It was supposed to mean less stress, a lighter burden. I was the sole
 employee of the aptly named Office of Information Sharing, where I worked as a SharePoint syst
ems administrator. SharePoint is a Microsoft product, a dopey poky program, or rather a grab-ba
g of programs, focused on internal document management: who can read what, who can edit what, w
ho can send and receive what, and so on. By making me Hawaii’s SharePoint systems administrato
r, the NSA had made me the manager of document management. I was, in effect, the reader in chie
f at one of the agency’s most significant facilities. As was my typical practice in any new te
chnical position, I spent the earliest days automating my tasks—meaning writing scripts to do 
my work for me—so as to free up my time for something more interesting.
Before I go any further, I want to emphasize this: my active searching out of NSA abuses began 
not with the copying of documents, but with the reading of them. My initial intention was just 
to confirm the suspicions that I’d first had back in 2009 in Tokyo. Three years later, I was d
etermined to find out if an American system of mass surveillance existed and, if it did, how it
 functioned. Though I was uncertain about how to conduct this investigation, I was at least sur
e of this: I had to understand exactly how the system worked before I could decide what, if any
thing, to do about it.
* * *
THIS, OF COURSE, was not why Lindsay and I had come to Hawaii. We hadn’t hauled all the way ou
t to paradise just so I could throw our lives away for a principle.
We’d come to start over. To start over yet again.
My doctors told me that the climate and more relaxed lifestyle in Hawaii might be beneficial fo
r my epilepsy, since lack of sleep was thought to be the leading trigger of the seizures. Also,
 the move eliminated the driving problem: the Tunnel was within bicycling distance of a number 
of communities in Kunia, the quiet heart of the island’s dry, red interior. It was a pleasant,
 twenty-minute ride to work, through sugarcane fields in brilliant sunshine. With the mountains
 rising calm and high in the clear blue distance, the gloomy mood of the last few months lifted
 like the morning fog.
Lindsay and I found a decent-size bungalow-type house on Eleu Street in Waipahu’s Royal Kunia,
 which we furnished with our stuff from Columbia, Maryland, since Dell paid relocation expenses
. The furniture didn’t get much use, though, since the sun and heat would often cause us to wa
lk in the door, strip off our clothes, and lie naked on the carpet beneath the overworked air c
onditioner. Eventually, Lindsay turned the garage into a fitness studio, filling it with yoga m
ats and the spinning pole she’d brought from Columbia. I set up a new Tor server. Soon, traffi
c from around the world was reaching the Internet via the laptop sitting in our entertainment c
enter, which had the ancillary benefit of hiding my own Internet activity in the noise.
One night during the summer I turned twenty-nine, Lindsay finally prevailed on me to go out wit
h her to a luau. She’d been after me to go for a while, because a few of her pole-fitness frie
nds had been involved in some hula-girl capacity, but I’d been resistant. It had seemed like s
uch a cheesy touristy thing to do, and had felt, somehow, disrespectful. Hawaiian culture is an
cient, although its traditions are very much alive; the last thing I wanted was to disturb some
one’s sacred ritual.
Finally, however, I capitulated. I’m very glad I did. What impressed me the most was not the l
uau itself—though it was very much a fire-twirling spectacle—but the old man who was holding 
court nearby in a little amphitheater down by the sea. He was a native Hawaiian, an erudite man
 with that soft but nasal island voice, who was telling a group of people gathered around a fir
e the creation stories of the islands’ indigenous peoples.
The one story that stuck with me concerned the twelve sacred islands of the gods. Apparently, t
here had existed a dozen islands in the Pacific that were so beautiful and pure and blessed wit
h freshwater that they had to be kept secret from humanity, who would spoil them. Three of them
 were especially revered: Kane-huna-moku, Kahiki, and Pali-uli. The lucky gods who inhabited th
ese islands decided to keep them hidden, because they believed that a glimpse of their bounty w
ould drive people mad. After considering numerous ingenious schemes by which these islands migh
t be concealed, including dyeing them the color of the sea, or sinking them to the bottom of th
e ocean, they finally decided to make them float in the air.
Once the islands were airborne, they were blown from place to place, staying constantly in moti
on. At sunrise and sunset, especially, you might think that you’d noticed one, hovering far at
 the horizon. But the moment you pointed it out to anyone, it would suddenly drift away or assu
me another form entirely, such as a pumice raft, a hunk of rock ejected by a volcanic eruption
—or a cloud.
I thought about that legend a lot while I went about my search. The revelations I was pursuing 
were exactly like those islands: exotic preserves that a pantheon of self-important, self-appoi
nted rulers were convinced had to be kept secret and hidden from humanity. I wanted to know wha
t the NSA’s surveillance capabilities were exactly; whether and how they extended beyond the a
gency’s actual surveillance activities; who approved them; who knew about them; and, last but 
surely not least, how these systems—both technical and institutional—really operated.
The moment I’d think that I spotted one of these “islands”—some capitalized code name I did
n’t understand, some program referenced in a note buried at the end of a report—I’d go chasi
ng after further mentions of it in other documents, but find none. It was as if the program I w
as searching for had floated away from me and was lost. Then, days later, or weeks later, it mi
ght surface again under a different designation, in a document from a different department.
Sometimes I’d find a program with a recognizable name, but without an explanation of what it d
id. Other times I’d just find a nameless explanation, with no indication as to whether the cap
ability it described was an active program or an aspirational desire. I was running up against 
compartments within compartments, caveats within caveats, suites within suites, programs within
 programs. This was the nature of the NSA—by design, the left hand rarely knew what the right 
hand was doing.
In a way, what I was doing reminded me of a documentary I once watched about map-making—specif
ically, about the way that nautical charts were created in the days before imaging and GPS. Shi
p captains would keep logs and note their coordinates, which landbound mapmakers would then try
 to interpret. It was through the gradual accretion of this data, over hundreds of years, that 
the full extent of the Pacific became known, and all its islands identified.
But I didn’t have hundreds of years or hundreds of ships. I was alone, one man hunched over a 
blank blue ocean, trying to find where this one speck of dry land, this one data point, belonge
d in relation to all the others.
20
Heartbeat
Back in 2009 in Japan, when I went to that fateful China conference as a substitute briefer, I 
guess I’d made some friends, especially at the Joint Counterintelligence Training Academy (JCI
TA) and its parent agency, the Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA). In the three years since, JCI
TA had invited me a half-dozen or so times to give seminars and lectures at DIA facilities. Ess
entially, I was teaching classes in how the American Intelligence Community could protect itsel
f from Chinese hackers and exploit the information gained from analyzing their hacks to hack th
em in return.
I always enjoyed teaching—certainly more than I ever enjoyed being a student—and in the early
 days of my disillusionment, toward the end of Japan and through my time at Dell, I had the sen
se that were I to stay in intelligence work for the rest of my career, the positions in which m
y principles would be least compromised, and my mind most challenged, would almost certainly be
 academic. Teaching with JCITA was a way of keeping that door open. It was also a way of keepin
g up to date—when you’re teaching, you can’t let your students get ahead of you, especially 
in technology.
This put me in the regular habit of perusing what the NSA called “readboards.” These are digi
tal bulletin boards that function something like news blogs, only the “news” here is the prod
uct of classified intelligence activities. Each major NSA site maintains its own, which its loc
al staff updates daily with what they regard as the day’s most important and interesting docum
ents—everything an employee has to read to keep current.
As a holdover from my JCITA lecture preparation, and also, frankly, because I was bored in Hawa
ii, I got into the habit of checking a number of these boards every day: my own site’s readboa
rd in Hawaii, the readboard of my former posting in Tokyo, and various readboards from Fort Mea
de. This new low-pressure position gave me as much time to read as I wanted. The scope of my cu
riosity might have raised a few questions at a prior stage of my career, but now I was the only
 employee of the Office of Information Sharing—I was the Office of Information Sharing—so my 
very job was to know what sharable information was out there. Meanwhile, most of my colleagues 
at the Tunnel spent their breaks streaming Fox News.
In the hopes of organizing all the documents I wanted to read from these various readboards, I 
put together a personal best-of-the-readboards queue. The files quickly began to pile up, until
 the nice lady who managed the digital storage quotas complained to me about the folder size. I
 realized that my personal readboard had become less a daily digest than an archive of sensitiv
e information with relevance far beyond the day’s immediacy. Not wanting to erase it or stop a
dding to it, which would’ve been a waste, I decided instead to share it with others. This was 
the best justification for what I was doing that I could think of, especially because it allowe
d me to more or less legitimately collect material from a wider range of sources. So, with my b
oss’s approval, I set about creating an automated readboard—one that didn’t rely on anybody 
posting things to it, but edited itself.
Like EPICSHELTER, my automated readboard platform was designed to perpetually scan for new and 
unique documents. It did so in a far more comprehensive manner, however, peering beyond NSAnet,
 the NSA’s network, into the networks of the CIA and the FBI as well as into the Joint Worldwi
de Intelligence Communications System (JWICS), the Department of Defense’s top-secret intranet
. The idea was that its findings would be made available to every NSA officer by comparing thei
r digital identity badges—called PKI certificates—to the classification of the documents, gen
erating a personal readboard customized to their clearances, interests, and office affiliations
. Essentially, it would be a readboard of readboards, an individually tailored newsfeed aggrega
tor, bringing each officer all the newest information pertinent to their work, all the document
s they had to read to stay current. It would be run from a server that I alone managed, located
 just down the hall from me. That server would also store a copy of every document it sourced, 
making it easy for me to perform the kind of deep interagency searches that the heads of most a
gencies could only dream of.
I called this system Heartbeat, because it took the pulse of the NSA and of the wider IC. The v
olume of information that crashed through its veins was simply enormous, as it pulled documents
 from internal sites dedicated to every specialty from updates on the latest cryptographic rese
arch projects to minutes of the meetings of the National Security Council. I’d carefully confi
gured it to ingest materials at a slow, constant pace, so as not to monopolize the undersea fib
er-optic cable tying Hawaii to Fort Meade, but it still pulled so many more documents than any 
human ever could that it immediately became the NSAnet’s most comprehensive readboard.
Early on in its operation I got an email that almost stopped Heartbeat forever. A faraway admin
istrator—apparently the only one in the entire IC who actually bothered to look at his access 
logs—wanted to know why a system in Hawaii was copying, one by one, every record in his databa
se. He had immediately blocked me as a precaution, which effectively locked me out, and was dem
anding an explanation. I told him what I was doing and showed him how to use the internal websi
te that would let him read Heartbeat for himself. His response reminded me of an unusual charac
teristic of the technologists’ side of the security state: once I gave him access, his warines
s instantly turned into curiosity. He might have doubted a person, but he’d never doubt a mach
ine. He could now see that Heartbeat was just doing what it’d been meant to do, and was doing 
it perfectly. He was fascinated. He unblocked me from his repository of records, and even offer
ed to help me by circulating information about Heartbeat to his colleagues.
Nearly all of the documents that I later disclosed to journalists came to me through Heartbeat.
 It showed me not just the aims but the abilities of the IC’s mass surveillance system. This i
s something I want to emphasize: in mid-2012, I was just trying to get a handle on how mass sur
veillance actually worked. Almost every journalist who later reported on the disclosures was pr
imarily concerned with the targets of surveillance—the efforts to spy on American citizens, fo
r instance, or on the leaders of America’s allies. That is to say, they were more interested i
n the topics of the surveillance reports than in the system that produced them. I respect that 
interest, of course, having shared it myself, but my own primary curiosity was still technical 
in nature. It’s all well and good to read a document or to click through the slides of a Power
Point presentation to find out what a program is intended to do, but the better you can underst
and a program’s mechanics, the better you can understand its potential for abuse.
This meant that I wasn’t much interested in the briefing materials—like, for example, what ha
s become perhaps the best-known file I disclosed, a slide deck from a 2011 PowerPoint presentat
ion that delineated the NSA’s new surveillance posture as a matter of six protocols: “Sniff I
t All, Know It All, Collect It All, Process It All, Exploit It All, Partner It All.” This was 
just PR speak, marketing jargon. It was intended to impress America’s allies: Australia, Canad
a, New Zealand, and the UK, the primary countries with which the United States shares intellige
nce. (Together with the United States, these countries are known as the Five Eyes.) “Sniff It 
All” meant finding a data source; “Know It All” meant finding out what that data was; “Coll
ect It All” meant capturing that data; “Process It All” meant analyzing that data for usable
 intelligence; “Exploit It All” meant using that intelligence to further the agency’s aims; 
and “Partner It All” meant sharing the new data source with allies. While this six-pronged ta
xonomy was easy to remember, easy to sell, and an accurate measure of the scale of the agency’
s ambition and the degree of its collusion with foreign governments, it gave me no insight into
 how exactly that ambition was realized in technological terms.
Much more revealing was an order I found from the FISA Court, a legal demand for a private comp
any to turn over its customers’ private information to the federal government. Orders such as 
these were notionally issued on the authority of public legislation; however, their contents, e
ven their existence, were classified Top Secret. According to Section 215 of the Patriot Act, a
ka the “business records” provision, the government was authorized to obtain orders from the 
FISA Court that compelled third parties to produce “any tangible thing” that was “relevant”
 to foreign intelligence or terrorism investigations. But as the court order I found made clear
, the NSA had secretly interpreted this authorization as a license to collect all of the “busi
ness records,” or metadata, of telephone communications coming through American telecoms, such
 as Verizon and AT&T, on “an ongoing daily basis.” This included, of course, records of telep
hone communications between American citizens, the practice of which was unconstitutional.
Additionally, Section 702 of the FISA Amendments Act allows the IC to target any foreigner outs
ide the United States deemed likely to communicate “foreign intelligence information”—a broa
d category of potential targets that includes journalists, corporate employees, academics, aid 
workers, and countless others innocent of any wrongdoing whatsoever. This legislation was being
 used by the NSA to justify its two most prominent Internet surveillance methods: the PRISM pro
gram and upstream collection.
PRISM enabled the NSA to routinely collect data from Microsoft, Yahoo!, Google, Facebook, Palta
lk, YouTube, Skype, AOL, and Apple, including email, photos, video and audio chats, Web-browsin
g content, search engine queries, and all other data stored on their clouds, transforming the c
ompanies into witting coconspirators. Upstream collection, meanwhile, was arguably even more in
vasive. It enabled the routine capturing of data directly from private-sector Internet infrastr
ucture—the switches and routers that shunt Internet traffic worldwide, via the satellites in o
rbit and the high-capacity fiber-optic cables that run under the ocean. This collection was man
aged by the NSA’s Special Sources Operations unit, which built secret wiretapping equipment an
d embedded it inside the corporate facilities of obliging Internet service providers around the
 world. Together, PRISM (collection from the servers of service providers) and upstream collect
ion (direct collection from Internet infrastructure) ensured that the world’s information, bot
h stored and in transit, was surveillable.
The next stage of my investigation was to figure out how this collection was actually accomplis
hed—that is to say, to examine the documents that explained which tools supported this program
 and how they selected from among the vast mass of dragneted communications those that were tho
ught worthy of closer inspection. The difficulty was that this information did not exist in any
 presentation, no matter the level of classification, but only in engineering diagrams and raw 
schematics. These were the most important materials for me to find. Unlike the Five Eyes’ pitc
h-deck cant, they would be concrete proof that the capacities I was reading about weren’t mere
ly the fantasies of an overcaffeinated project manager. As a systems guy who was always being p
rodded to build faster and deliver more, I was all too aware that the agencies would sometimes 
announce technologies before they even existed—sometimes because a Cliff-type salesperson had 
made one too many promises, and sometimes just out of unalloyed ambition.
In this case, the technologies behind upstream collection did exist. As I came to realize, thes
e tools are the most invasive elements of the NSA’s mass surveillance system, if only because 
they’re the closest to the user—that is, the closest to the person being surveilled. Imagine 
yourself sitting at a computer, about to visit a website. You open a Web browser, type in a URL
, and hit Enter. The URL is, in effect, a request, and this request goes out in search of its d
estination server. Somewhere in the midst of its travels, however, before your request gets to 
that server, it will have to pass through TURBULENCE, one of the NSA’s most powerful weapons.
Specifically, your request passes through a few black servers stacked on top of one another, to
gether about the size of a four-shelf bookcase. These are installed in special rooms at major p
rivate telecommunications buildings throughout allied countries, as well as in US embassies and
 on US military bases, and contain two critical tools. The first, TURMOIL, handles “passive co
llection,” making a copy of the data coming through. The second, TURBINE, is in charge of “ac
tive collection”—that is, actively tampering with the users.
You can think of TURMOIL as a guard positioned at an invisible firewall through which Internet 
traffic must pass. Seeing your request, it checks its metadata for selectors, or criteria, that
 mark it as deserving of more scrutiny. Those selectors can be whatever the NSA chooses, whatev
er the NSA finds suspicious: a particular email address, credit card, or phone number; the geog
raphic origin or destination of your Internet activity; or just certain keywords such as “anon
ymous Internet proxy” or “protest.”
If TURMOIL flags your traffic as suspicious, it tips it over to TURBINE, which diverts your req
uest to the NSA’s servers. There, algorithms decide which of the agency’s exploits—malware p
rograms—to use against you. This choice is based on the type of website you’re trying to visi
t as much as on your computer’s software and Internet connection. These chosen exploits are se
nt back to TURBINE (by programs of the QUANTUM suite, if you’re wondering), which injects them
 into the traffic channel and delivers them to you along with whatever website you requested. T
he end result: you get all the content you want, along with all the surveillance you don’t, an
d it all happens in less than 686 milliseconds. Completely unbeknownst to you.
Once the exploits are on your computer, the NSA can access not just your metadata, but your dat
a as well. Your entire digital life now belongs to them.
21
Whistleblowing
If any NSA employee who didn’t work with the SharePoint software I managed knew anything at al
l about SharePoint, they knew the calendars. These were pretty much the same as any normal nong
overnment group calendars, just way more expensive, providing the basic when-and-where-do-I-hav
e-to-be-at-a-meeting scheduling interface for NSA personnel in Hawaii. This was about as exciti
ng for me to manage as you might imagine. That’s why I tried to spice it up by making sure the
 calendar always had reminders of all the holidays, and I mean all of them: not just the federa
l holidays, but Rosh Hashanah, Eid al-Fitr, Eid al-Adha, Diwali.
Then there was my favorite, the seventeenth of September. Constitution Day and Citizenship Day,
 which is the holiday’s formal name, commemorates the moment in 1787 when the delegates to the
 Constitutional Convention officially ratified, or signed, the document. Technically, Constitut
ion Day is not a federal holiday, just a federal observance, meaning that Congress didn’t thin
k our country’s founding document and the oldest national constitution still in use in the wor
ld were important enough to justify giving people a paid day off.
The Intelligence Community had always had an uncomfortable relationship with Constitution Day, 
which meant its involvement was typically limited to circulating a bland email drafted by its a
gencies’ press shops and signed by Director So-and-So, and setting up a sad little table in a 
forgotten corner of the cafeteria. On the table would be some free copies of the Constitution p
rinted, bound, and donated to the government by the kind and generous rabble-rousers at places 
like the Cato Institute or the Heritage Foundation, since the IC was rarely interested in spend
ing some of its own billions on promoting civil liberties through stapled paper.
I suppose the staff got the message, or didn’t: over the seven Constitution Days I spent in th
e IC, I don’t think I’d ever known anyone but myself to actually take a copy off the table. B
ecause I love irony almost as much as I love freebies, I’d always take a few—one for myself, 
and the others to salt across my friends’ workstations. I kept my copy propped against the Rub
ik’s Cube on my desk, and for a time made a habit of reading it over lunch, trying not to drip
 grease on “We the People” from one of the cafeteria’s grim slices of elementary-school pizz
a.
I liked reading the Constitution partially because its ideas are great, partially because its p
rose is good, but really because it freaked out my coworkers. In an office where everything you
 printed had to be thrown into a shredder after you were done with it, someone would always be 
intrigued by the presence of hard-copy pages lying on a desk. They’d amble over to ask, “What
 have you got there?”
“The Constitution.”
Then they’d make a face and back away slowly.
On Constitution Day 2012, I picked up the document in earnest. I hadn’t really read the whole 
thing in quite a few years, though I was glad to note that I still knew the preamble by heart. 
Now, however, I read through it in its entirety, from the Articles to the Amendments. I was sur
prised to be reminded that fully 50 percent of the Bill of Rights, the document’s first ten am
endments, were intended to make the job of law enforcement harder. The Fourth, Fifth, Sixth, Se
venth, and Eighth Amendments were all deliberately, carefully designed to create inefficiencies
 and hamper the government’s ability to exercise its power and conduct surveillance.
This is especially true of the Fourth, which protects people and their property from government
 scrutiny: The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effects, 
against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and no Warrants shall issue,
 but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the pla
ce to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.
Translation: If officers of the law want to go rooting through your life, they first have to go
 before a judge and show probable cause under oath. This means they have to explain to a judge 
why they have reason to believe that you might have committed a specific crime or that specific
 evidence of a specific crime might be found on or in a specific part of your property. Then th
ey have to swear that this reason has been given honestly and in good faith. Only if the judge 
approves a warrant will they be allowed to go searching—and even then, only for a limited time
.
The Constitution was written in the eighteenth century, back when the only computers were abacu
ses, gear calculators, and looms, and it could take weeks or months for a communication to cros
s the ocean by ship. It stands to reason that computer files, whatever their contents, are our 
version of the Constitution’s “papers.” We certainly use them like “papers,” particularly 
our word-processing documents and spreadsheets, our messages and histories of inquiry. Data, me
anwhile, is our version of “effects,” a catchall term for all the stuff that we own, produce,
 sell, and buy online. That includes, by default, metadata, which is the record of all the stuf
f that we own, produce, sell, and buy online—a perfect ledger of our private lives.
In the centuries since the original Constitution Day, our clouds, computers, and phones have be
come our homes, just as personal and intimate as our actual houses nowadays. If you don’t agre
e, then answer me this: Would you rather let your coworkers hang out at your home alone for an 
hour, or let them spend even just ten minutes alone with your unlocked phone?
The NSA’s surveillance programs, its domestic surveillance programs in particular, flouted the
 Fourth Amendment completely. The agency was essentially making a claim that the amendment’s p
rotections didn’t apply to modern-day lives. The agency’s internal policies neither regarded 
your data as your legally protected personal property, nor regarded their collection of that da
ta as a “search” or “seizure.” Instead, the NSA maintained that because you had already “s
hared” your phone records with a “third party”—your telephone service provider—you had for
feited any constitutional privacy interest you may once have had. And it insisted that “search
” and “seizure” occurred only when its analysts, not its algorithms, actively queried what h
ad already been automatically collected.
Had constitutional oversight mechanisms been functioning properly, this extremist interpretatio
n of the Fourth Amendment—effectively holding that the very act of using modern technologies i
s tantamount to a surrender of your privacy rights—would have been rejected by Congress and th
e courts. America’s Founders were skilled engineers of political power, particularly attuned t
o the perils posed by legal subterfuge and the temptations of the presidency toward exercising 
monarchical authority. To forestall such eventualities, they designed a system, laid out in the
 Constitution’s first three articles, that established the US government in three coequal bran
ches, each supposed to provide checks and balances to the others. But when it came to protectin
g the privacy of American citizens in the digital age, each of these branches failed in its own
 way, causing the entire system to halt and catch fire.
The legislative branch, the two houses of Congress, willingly abandoned its supervisory role: e
ven as the number of IC government employees and private contractors was exploding, the number 
of congresspeople who were kept informed about the IC’s capabilities and activities kept dwind
ling, until only a few special committee members were apprised in closed-door hearings. Even th
en they were only informed of some, but not all, of the IC’s activities. When rare public hear
ings on the IC were held, the NSA’s position was made strikingly clear: The agency would not c
ooperate, it would not be honest, and, what was worse, through classification and claims of sec
recy it would force America’s federal legislatures to collaborate in its deception. In early 2
013, for instance, James Clapper, then the director of National Intelligence, testified under o
ath to the US Senate Select Committee on Intelligence that the NSA did not engage in bulk colle
ction of the communications of American citizens. To the question, “Does the NSA collect any t
ype of data at all on millions or hundreds of millions of Americans?” Clapper replied, “No, s
ir,” and then added, “There are cases where they could inadvertently perhaps collect, but not
 wittingly.” That was a witting, bald-faced lie, of course, not just to Congress but to the Am
erican people. More than a few of the congresspeople to whom Clapper was testifying knew very w
ell that what he was saying was untrue, yet they refused, or felt legally powerless, to call hi
m out on it.
The failure of the judiciary was, if anything, even more disappointing. The Foreign Intelligenc
e Surveillance Court (FISC), which oversees intelligence surveillance within the United States,
 is a specialized body that meets in secret and hears only from the government. It was designed
 to grant individual warrants for foreign intelligence collection, and has always been especial
ly accommodating to the NSA, approving well over 99 percent of the agency’s requests—a rate m
ore suggestive of a ministerial rubber stamp than a deliberative judicial process. After 9/11, 
the court expanded its role from authorizing the surveillance of specific individuals to ruling
 on the legality and constitutionality of broad programmatic surveillance, without any adversar
ial scrutiny. A body that previously had been tasked with approving the surveillance of Foreign
 Terrorist #1 or Foreign Spy #2 was now being used to legitimize the whole combined infrastruct
ure of PRISM and upstream collection. Judicial review of that infrastructure was reduced, in th
e words of the ACLU to a secret court upholding secret programs by secretly reinterpreting fede
ral law.
When civil society groups like the ACLU tried to challenge the NSA’s activities in ordinary, o
pen federal courts, a curious thing happened. The government didn’t defend itself on the groun
d that the surveillance activities were legal or constitutional. It declared, instead, that the
 ACLU and its clients had no right to be in court at all, because the ACLU could not prove that
 its clients had in fact been surveilled. Moreover, the ACLU could not use the litigation to se
ek evidence of surveillance, because the existence (or nonexistence) of that evidence was “a s
tate secret,” and leaks to journalists didn’t count. In other words, the court couldn’t reco
gnize the information that was publicly known from having been published in the media; it could
 only recognize the information that the government officially confirmed as being publicly know
n. This invocation of classification meant that neither the ACLU, nor anyone else, could ever e
stablish standing to raise a legal challenge in open court. To my disgust, in February 2013 the
 US Supreme Court decided 5 to 4 to accept the government’s reasoning and dismissed an ACLU an
d Amnesty International lawsuit challenging mass surveillance without even considering the lega
lity of the NSA’s activities.
Finally, there was the executive branch, the primary cause of this constitutional breach. The p
resident’s office, through the Justice Department, had committed the original sin of secretly 
issuing directives that authorized mass surveillance in the wake of 9/11. Executive overreach h
as only continued in the decades since, with administrations of both parties seeking to act uni
laterally and establish policy directives that circumvent law—policy directives that cannot be
 challenged, since their classification keeps them from being publicly known.
The constitutional system only functions as a whole if and when each of its three branches work
s as intended. When all three don’t just fail, but fail deliberately and with coordination, th
e result is a culture of impunity. I realized that I was crazy to have imagined that the Suprem
e Court, or Congress, or President Obama, seeking to distance his administration from President
 George W. Bush’s, would ever hold the IC legally responsible—for anything. It was time to fa
ce the fact that the IC believed themselves above the law, and given how broken the process was
, they were right. The IC had come to understand the rules of our system better than the people
 who had created it, and they used that knowledge to their advantage.
They’d hacked the Constitution.
* * *
AMERICA WAS BORN from an act of treason. The Declaration of Independence was an outrageous viol
ation of the laws of England and yet the fullest expression of what the Founders called the “L
aws of Nature,” among which was the right to defy the powers of the day and rebel on point of 
principle, according to the dictates of one’s conscience. The first Americans to exercise this
 right, the first “whistleblowers” in American history, appeared one year later—in 1777.
These men, like so many of the men in my family, were sailors, officers of the Continental Navy
 who, in defense of their new land, had taken to the sea. During the Revolution, they served on
 the USS Warren, a thirty-two-gun frigate under the command of Commodore Esek Hopkins, the comm
ander in chief of the Continental Navy. Hopkins was a lazy and intractable leader who refused t
o bring his vessel into combat. His officers also claimed to have witnessed him beating and sta
rving British prisoners of war. Ten of the Warren’s officers—after consulting their conscienc
es, and with barely a thought for their careers—reported all of this up the chain of command, 
writing to the Marine Committee:
Much Respected Gentlemen,
We who present this petition are engaged on board the ship Warren with an earnest desire and fi
xed expectation of doing our country some service. We are still anxious for the Weal of America
 & wish nothing more earnestly than to see her in peace & prosperity. We are ready to hazard ev
ery thing that is dear & if necessary sacrifice our lives for the welfare of our country. We ar
e desirous of being active in the defence of our constitutional liberties and privileges agains
t the unjust cruel claims of tyranny & oppression; but as things are now circumstanced on board
 this frigate, there seems to be no prospect of our being serviceable in our present station. W
e have been in this situation for a considerable space of time. We are personally well acquaint
ed with the real character & conduct of our commander, Commodore Hopkins, & we take this method
 not having a more convenient opportunity of sincerely & humbly petitioning the honorable Marin
e Committee that they would inquire into his character & conduct, for we suppose that his chara
cter is such & that he has been guilty of such crimes as render him quite unfit for the public 
department he now occupies, which crimes, we the subscribers can sufficiently attest.
After receiving this letter, the Marine Committee investigated Commodore Hopkins. He reacted by
 dismissing his officers and crew, and in a fit of rage filed a criminal libel suit against Mid
shipman Samuel Shaw and Third Lieutenant Richard Marven, the two officers who admitted to havin
g authored the petition. The suit was filed in the courts of Rhode Island, whose last colonial 
governor had been Stephen Hopkins, a signatory to the Declaration of Independence and the commo
dore’s brother.
The case was assigned to a judge appointed by Governor Hopkins, but before the trial commenced 
Shaw and Marven were saved by a fellow naval officer, John Grannis, who broke ranks and present
ed their case directly to the Continental Congress. The Continental Congress was so alarmed by 
the precedent being set by allowing military complaints regarding dereliction of duty to be sub
ject to the criminal charge of libel that it intervened. On July 30, 1778, it terminated the co
mmand of Commodore Hopkins, ordered the Treasury Office to pay Shaw and Marven’s legal fees, a
nd by unanimous consent enacted America’s first whistleblower protection law. This law declare
d it “the duty of all persons in the service of the United States, as well as all other inhabi
tants thereof, to give the earliest information to Congress or any other proper authority of an
y misconduct, frauds, or misdemeanors committed by any officers or persons in the service of th
ese states, which may come to their knowledge.”
The law gave me hope—and it still does. Even at the darkest hour of the Revolution, with the v
ery existence of the country at stake, Congress didn’t just welcome an act of principled disse
nt, it enshrined such acts as duties. By the latter half of 2012, I was resolved to perform thi
s duty myself, though I knew I’d be making my disclosures at a very different time—a time bot
h more comfortable and more cynical. Few if any of my IC superiors would have sacrificed their 
careers for the same American principles for which military personnel regularly sacrifice their
 lives. And in my case, going up “the chain of command,” which the IC prefers to call “the p
roper channels,” wasn’t an option as it was for the ten men who crewed on the Warren. My supe
riors were not only aware of what the agency was doing, they were actively directing it—they w
ere complicit.
In organizations like the NSA—in which malfeasance has become so structural as to be a matter 
not of any particular initiative, but of an ideology—proper channels can only become a trap, t
o catch the heretics and disfavorables. I’d already experienced the failure of command back in
 Warrenton, and then again in Geneva, where in the regular course of my duties I had discovered
 a security vulnerability in a critical program. I’d reported the vulnerability, and when noth
ing was done about it I reported that, too. My supervisors weren’t happy that I’d done so, be
cause their supervisors weren’t happy, either. The chain of command is truly a chain that bind
s, and the lower links can only be lifted by the higher.
Coming from a Coast Guard family, I’ve always been fascinated by how much of the English langu
age vocabulary of disclosure has a nautical undercurrent. Even before the days of the USS Warre
n, organizations, like ships, sprang leaks. When steam replaced wind for propulsion, whistles w
ere blown at sea to signal intentions and emergencies: one whistle to pass by port, two whistle
s to pass by starboard, five for a warning.
The same terms in European languages, meanwhile, often have fraught political valences conditio
ned by historical context. French used dénonciateur throughout much of the twentieth century, 
until the word’s WWII-era association with being a “denouncer” or “informant” for the Germ
ans led to a preference for lanceur d’alerte (“one who launches a warning”). German, a langu
age that has struggled with its culture’s Nazi and Stasi past, evolved beyond its own Denunzia
nt and Informant to settle on the unsatisfactory Hinweisgeber (a “hint- or tip-giver”), Enthu
eller (“revealer”), Skandalaufdecker (“scandal-uncoverer”), and even the pointedly politica
l ethische Dissidenten (“ethical dissident”). German uses few of these words online, however;
 with respect to today’s Internet-based disclosures, it has simply borrowed the noun Whistlebl
ower and the verb leaken. The languages of regimes like Russia and China, for their part, emplo
y terms that bear the pejorative sense of “snitch” and “traitor.” It would take the existen
ce of a strong free press in those societies to imbue those words with a more positive colorati
on, or to coin new ones that would frame disclosure not as a betrayal but as an honorable duty.
Ultimately, every language, including English, demonstrates its culture’s relationship to powe
r by how it chooses to define the act of disclosure. Even the nautically derived English words 
that seem neutral and benign frame the act from the perspective of the institution that perceiv
es itself wronged, not of the public that the institution has failed. When an institution decri
es “a leak,” it is implying that the “leaker” damaged or sabotaged something.
Today, “leaking” and “whistleblowing” are often treated as interchangeable. But to my mind,
 the term “leaking” should be used differently than it commonly is. It should be used to desc
ribe acts of disclosure done not out of public interest but out of self-interest, or in pursuit
 of institutional or political aims. To be more precise, I understand a leak as something close
r to a “plant,” or an incidence of “propaganda-seeding”: the selective release of protected
 information in order to sway popular opinion or affect the course of decision making. It is ra
re for even a day to go by in which some “unnamed” or “anonymous” senior government officia
l does not leak, by way of a hint or tip to a journalist, some classified item that advances th
eir own agenda or the efforts of their agency or party.
This dynamic is perhaps most brazenly exemplified by a 2013 incident in which IC officials, lik
ely seeking to inflate the threat of terrorism and deflect criticism of mass surveillance, leak
ed to a few news websites extraordinarily detailed accounts of a conference call between al-Qae
da leader Ayman al-Zawahiri and his global affiliates. In this so-called conference call of doo
m, al-Zawahiri purportedly discussed organizational cooperation with Nasser al-Wuhayshi, the le
ader of al-Qaeda in Yemen, and representatives of the Taliban and Boko Haram. By disclosing the
 ability to intercept this conference call—that is, if we’re to believe this leak, which cons
isted of a description of the call, not a recording—the IC irrevocably burned an extraordinary
 means of apprising itself of the plans and intentions of the highest ranks of terrorist leader
ship, purely for the sake of a momentary political advantage in the news cycle. Not a single pe
rson was prosecuted as a result of this stunt, though it was most certainly illegal, and cost A
merica the ability to keep wiretapping the alleged al-Qaeda hotline.
Time and again, America’s political class has proven itself willing to tolerate, even generate
 leaks that serve its own ends. The IC often announces its “successes,” regardless of their c
lassification and regardless of the consequences. Nowhere in recent memory has that been more a
pparent than in the leaks relating to the extrajudicial killing of the American-born extremist 
cleric Anwar al-Aulaqi in Yemen. By breathlessly publicizing its drone attack on al-Aulaqi to t
he Washington Post and the New York Times, the Obama administration was tacitly admitting the e
xistence of the CIA’s drone program and its “disposition matrix,” or kill list, both of whic
h are officially top secret. Additionally, the government was implicitly confirming that it eng
aged not just in targeted assassinations, but in targeted assassinations of American citizens. 
These leaks, accomplished in the coordinated fashion of a media campaign, were shocking demonst
rations of the state’s situational approach to secrecy: a seal that must be maintained for the
 government to act with impunity, but that can be broken whenever the government seeks to claim
 credit.
It’s only in this context that the US government’s latitudinal relationship to leaking can be
 fully understood. It has forgiven “unauthorized” leaks when they’ve resulted in unexpected 
benefits, and forgotten “authorized” leaks when they’ve caused harm. But if a leak’s harmfu
lness and lack of authorization, not to mention its essential illegality, make scant difference
 to the government’s reaction, what does? What makes one disclosure permissible, and another n
ot?
The answer is power. The answer is control. A disclosure is deemed acceptable only if it doesn
’t challenge the fundamental prerogatives of an institution. If all the disparate components o
f an organization, from its mailroom to its executive suite, can be assumed to have the same po
wer to discuss internal matters, then its executives have surrendered their information control
, and the organization’s continued functioning is put in jeopardy. Seizing this equality of vo
ice, independent of an organization’s managerial or decision-making hierarchy, is what is prop
erly meant by the term “whistleblowing”—an act that’s particularly threatening to the IC, w
hich operates by strict compartmentalization under a legally codified veil of secrecy.
A “whistleblower,” in my definition, is a person who through hard experience has concluded th
at their life inside an institution has become incompatible with the principles developed in—a
nd the loyalty owed to—the greater society outside it, to which that institution should be acc
ountable. This person knows that they can’t remain inside the institution, and knows that the 
institution can’t or won’t be dismantled. Reforming the institution might be possible, howeve
r, so they blow the whistle and disclose the information to bring public pressure to bear.
This is an adequate description of my situation, with one crucial addition: all the information
 I intended to disclose was classified top secret. To blow the whistle on secret programs, I’d
 also have to blow the whistle on the larger system of secrecy, to expose it not as the absolut
e prerogative of state that the IC claimed it was but rather as an occasional privilege that th
e IC abused to subvert democratic oversight. Without bringing to light the full scope of this s
ystemic secrecy, there would be no hope of restoring a balance of power between citizens and th
eir governance. This motive of restoration I take to be essential to whistleblowing: it marks t
he disclosure not as a radical act of dissent or resistance, but a conventional act of return—
signaling the ship to return back to port, where it’ll be stripped, refitted, and patched of i
ts leaks before being given the chance to start over.
A total exposure of the total apparatus of mass surveillance—not by me, but by the media, the 
de facto fourth branch of the US government, protected by the Bill of Rights: that was the only
 response appropriate to the scale of the crime. It wouldn’t be enough, after all, to merely r
eveal a particular abuse or set of abuses, which the agency could stop (or pretend to stop) whi
le preserving the rest of the shadowy apparatus intact. Instead, I was resolved to bring to lig
ht a single, all-encompassing fact: that my government had developed and deployed a global syst
em of mass surveillance without the knowledge or consent of its citizenry.
Whistleblowers can be elected by circumstance at any working level of an institution. But digit
al technology has brought us to an age in which, for the first time in recorded history, the mo
st effective will come up from the bottom, from the ranks traditionally least incentivized to m
aintain the status quo. In the IC, as in virtually every other outsize decentralized institutio
n that relies on computers, these lower ranks are rife with technologists like myself, whose le
gitimate access to vital infrastructure is grossly out of proportion to their formal authority 
to influence institutional decisions. In other words, there is usually an imbalance that obtain
s between what people like me are intended to know and what we are able to know, and between th
e slight power we have to change the institutional culture and the vast power we have to addres
s our concerns to the culture at large. Though such technological privileges can certainly be a
bused—after all, most systems-level technologists have access to everything—the highest exerc
ise of that privilege is in cases involving the technology itself. Specialist abilities incur w
eightier responsibilities. Technologists seeking to report on the systemic misuse of technology
 must do more than just bring their findings to the public, if the significance of those findin
gs is to be understood. They have a duty to contextualize and explain—to demystify.
A few dozen or so of the people best positioned to do this in the whole entire world were here
—they were sitting all around me in the Tunnel. My fellow technologists came in every day and 
sat at their terminals and furthered the work of the state. They weren’t merely oblivious to i
ts abuses, but incurious about them, and that lack of curiosity made them not evil but tragic. 
It didn’t matter whether they’d come to the IC out of patriotism or opportunism: once they’d
 gotten inside the machine, they became machines themselves.
22
Fourth Estate
Nothing is harder than living with a secret that can’t be spoken. Lying to strangers about a c
over identity or concealing the fact that your office is under the world’s most top-secret pin
eapple field might sound like it qualifies, but at least you’re part of a team: though your wo
rk may be secret, it’s a shared secret, and therefore a shared burden. There is misery but als
o laughter.
When you have a real secret, though, that you can’t share with anyone, even the laughter is a 
lie. I could talk about my concerns, but never about where they were leading me. To the day I d
ie I’ll remember explaining to my colleagues how our work was being applied to violate the oat
hs we had sworn to uphold and their verbal shrug in response: “What can you do about it?” I h
ated that question, its sense of resignation, its sense of defeat, but it still felt valid enou
gh that I had to ask myself, “Well, what?”
When the answer presented itself, I decided to become a whistleblower. Yet to breathe to Lindsa
y, the love of my life, even a word about that decision would have put our relationship to an e
ven crueler test than saying nothing. Not wishing to cause her any more harm than I was already
 resigned to causing, I kept silent, and in my silence I was alone.
I thought that solitude and isolation would be easy for me, or at least easier than it had been
 for my predecessors in the whistleblowing world. Hadn’t each step of my life served as a kind
 of preparation? Hadn’t I gotten used to being alone, after all those years spent hushed and s
pellbound in front of a screen? I’d been the solo hacker, the night-shift harbormaster, the ke
eper of the keys in an empty office. But I was human, too, and the lack of companionship was ha
rd. Each day was haunted by struggle, as I tried and failed to reconcile the moral and the lega
l, my duties and my desires. I had everything I’d ever wanted—love, family, and success far b
eyond what I ever deserved—and I lived in Eden amid plentiful trees, only one of which was for
bidden to me. The easiest thing should have been to follow the rules.
And even if I was already reconciled to the dangers of my decision, I wasn’t yet adjusted to t
he role. After all, who was I to put this information in front of the American public? Who’d e
lected me the president of secrets?
The information I intended to disclose about my country’s secret regime of mass surveillance w
as so explosive, and yet so technical, that I was as scared of being doubted as I was of being 
misunderstood. That was why my first decision, after resolving to go public, was to go public w
ith documentation. The way to reveal a secret program might have been merely to describe its ex
istence, but the way to reveal programmatic secrecy was to describe its workings. This required
 documents, the agency’s actual files—as many as necessary to expose the scope of the abuse t
hough I knew that disclosing even one PDF would be enough to earn me prison.
The threat of government retribution against any entity or platform to which I made the disclos
ure led me to briefly consider self-publishing. That would’ve been the most convenient and saf
est method: just collecting the documents that best communicated my concerns and posting them o
nline, as they were, then circulating a link. Ultimately, one of my reasons for not pursuing th
is course had to do with authentication. Scores of people post “classified secrets” to the In
ternet every day—many of them about time-travel technologies and aliens. I didn’t want my own
 revelations, which were fairly incredible already, to get lumped in with the outlandish and lo
st among the crazy.
It was clear to me then, from the earliest stage of the process, that I required, and that the 
public deserved, some person or institution to vouch for the veracity of the documents. I also 
wanted a partner to vet the potential hazards posed by the revelation of classified information
, and to help explain that information by putting it in technological and legal context. I trus
ted myself to present the problems with surveillance, and even to analyze them, but I’d have t
o trust others to solve them. Regardless of how wary of institutions I might have been by this 
point, I was far warier of trying to act like one myself. Cooperating with some type of media o
rganization would defend me against the worst accusations of rogue activity, and correct for wh
atever biases I had, whether they were conscious or unconscious, personal or professional. I di
dn’t want any political opinion of mine to prejudice anything with regard to the presentation,
 or reception, of the disclosures. After all, in a country in which everyone was being surveill
ed, no issue was less partisan than surveillance.
In retrospect, I have to credit at least some of my desire to find ideological filters to Linds
ay’s improving influence. Lindsay had spent years patiently instilling in me the lesson that m
y interests and concerns weren’t always hers, and certainly weren’t always the world’s, and 
that just because I shared my knowledge didn’t mean that anyone had to share my opinion. Not e
verybody who was opposed to invasions of privacy might be ready to adopt 256-bit encryption sta
ndards or drop off the Internet entirely. An illegal act that disturbed one person as a violati
on of the Constitution might upset another person as a violation of their privacy, or of that o
f their spouse or children. Lindsay was my key to unlocking this truth—that diverse motives an
d approaches can only improve the chances of achieving common goals. She, without even knowing 
it, gave me the confidence to conquer my qualms and reach out to other people.
But which people? Who? It might be hard to remember, or even to imagine, but at the time when I
 first considered coming forward, the whistleblower’s forum of choice was WikiLeaks. Back then
, it operated in many respects like a traditional publisher, albeit one that was radically skep
tical of state power. WikiLeaks regularly joined up with leading international publications lik
e the Guardian, the New York Times, Der Spiegel, Le Monde, and El País to publish the document
s provided by its sources. The work that these partner news organizations accomplished over the
 course of 2010 and 2011 suggested to me that WikiLeaks was most valuable as a go-between that 
connected sources with journalists, and as a firewall that preserved sources’ anonymity.
WikiLeaks’ practices changed following its publication of disclosures by US Army private Chels
ea Manning—huge caches of US military field logs pertaining to the Iraq and Afghan wars, infor
mation about detainees at Guantanamo Bay, along with US diplomatic cables. Due to the governmen
tal backlash and media controversy surrounding the site’s redaction of the Manning materials, 
WikiLeaks decided to change course and publish future leaks as they received them: pristine and
 unredacted. This switch to a policy of total transparency meant that publishing with WikiLeaks
 would not meet my needs. Effectually, it would have been the same for me as self-publishing, a
 route I’d already rejected as insufficient. I knew that the story the NSA documents told abou
t a global system of mass surveillance deployed in the deepest secrecy was a difficult one to u
nderstand—a story so tangled and technical that I was increasingly convinced it could not be p
resented all at once in a “document dump,” but only by the patient and careful work of journa
lists, undertaken, in the best scenario I could conceive of, with the support of multiple indep
endent press institutions.
Though I felt some relief once I’d resolved to disclose directly to journalists, I still had s
ome lingering reservations. Most of them involved my country’s most prestigious publications—
particularly America’s newspaper of record, the New York Times. Whenever I thought about conta
cting the Times, I found myself hesitating. While the paper had shown some willingness to displ
ease the US government with its WikiLeaks reporting, I couldn’t stop reminding myself of its e
arlier conduct involving an important article on the government’s warrantless wiretapping prog
ram by Eric Lichtblau and James Risen.
Those two journalists, by combining information from Justice Department whistleblowers with the
ir own reporting, had managed to uncover one aspect of STELLARWIND—the NSA’s original-recipe 
post-9/11 surveillance initiative—and had produced a fully written, edited, and fact-checked a
rticle about it, ready to go to press by mid-2004. It was at this point that the paper’s edito
r in chief, Bill Keller, ran the article past the government, as part of a courtesy process who
se typical purpose is for a publication’s editorial staff to have a chance to assess the gover
nment’s arguments as to why the publication of certain information might endanger national sec
urity. In this case, as in most cases, the government refused to provide a specific reason, but
 implied that one existed and that it was classified, too. The Bush administration told Keller 
and the paper’s publisher, Arthur Sulzberger, without providing any evidence, that the Times w
ould be emboldening America’s enemies and enabling terror if it went public with the informati
on that the government was wiretapping American citizens without a warrant. Unfortunately, the 
paper allowed itself to be convinced and spiked the article. Lichtblau and Risen’s reporting f
inally ran, but over a year later, in December 2005, and only after Risen pressured the paper b
y announcing that the material was included in a book of his that was about to be released. Had
 that article run when it was originally written, it might well have changed the course of the 
2004 election.
If the Times, or any paper, did something similar to me—if it took my revelations, reported on
 them, submitted the reporting for review, and then suppressed its publication—I’d be sunk. G
iven the likelihood of my identification as the source, it would be tantamount to turning me in
 before any revelations were brought to the public.
If I couldn’t trust a legacy newspaper, could I trust any institution? Why even bother? I hadn
’t signed up for any of this. I had just wanted to screw around with computers and maybe do so
me good for my country along the way. I had a lease and a lover and my health was improved. Eve
ry STOP sign on my commute I took as advice to stop this voluntary madness. My head and heart w
ere in conflict, with the only constant being the desperate hope that somebody else, somewhere 
else, would figure it out on their own. After all, wasn’t journalism about following the bread
 crumbs and connecting the dots? What else did reporters do all day, besides tweet?
I knew at least two things about the denizens of the Fourth Estate: they competed for scoops, a
nd they knew very little about technology. It was this lack of expertise or even interest in te
ch that largely caused journalists to miss two events that stunned me during the course of my f
act-gathering about mass surveillance.
The first was the NSA’s announcement of the construction of a vast new data facility in Bluffd
ale, Utah. The agency called it the Massive Data Repository, until somebody with a knack for PR
 realized the name might be tough to explain if it ever got out, so it was renamed the Mission 
Data Repository—because as long as you don’t change the acronym, you don’t have to change al
l the briefing slides. The MDR was projected to contain a total of four twenty-five-thousand-sq
uare-foot halls, filled with servers. It could hold an immense amount of data, basically a roll
ing history of the entire planet’s pattern of life, insofar as life can be understood through 
the connection of payments to people, people to phones, phones to calls, calls to networks, and
 the synoptic array of Internet activity moving along those networks’ lines.
The only prominent journalist who seemed to notice the announcement was James Bamford, who wrot
e about it for Wired in March 2012. There were a few follow-ups in the nontech press, but none 
of them furthered the reporting. No one asked what, to me at least, were the most basic questio
ns: Why does any government agency, let alone an intelligence agency, need that much space? Wha
t data, and how much of it, do they really intend to store there, and for how long? Because the
re was simply no reason to build something to those specs unless you were planning on storing a
bsolutely everything, forever. Here was, to my mind, the corpus delicti—the plain-as-day corro
boration of a crime, in a gigantic concrete bunker surrounded by barbed wire and guard towers, 
sucking up a city’s worth of electricity from its own power grid in the middle of the Utah des
ert. And no one was paying attention.
The second event happened one year later, in March 2013—one week after Clapper lied to Congres
s and Congress gave him a pass. A few periodicals had covered that testimony, though they merel
y regurgitated Clapper’s denial that the NSA collected bulk data on Americans. But no so-calle
d mainstream publication at all covered a rare public appearance by Ira “Gus” Hunt, the chief
 technology officer of the CIA.
I’d known Gus slightly from my Dell stint with the CIA. He was one of our top customers, and e
very vendor loved his apparent inability to be discreet: he’d always tell you more than he was
 supposed to. For sales guys, he was like a bag of money with a mouth. Now he was appearing as 
a special guest speaker at a civilian tech event in New York called the GigaOM Structure: Data 
conference. Anyone with $40 could go to it. The major talks, such as Gus’s, were streamed for 
free live online.
The reason I’d made sure to catch his talk was that I’d just read, through internal NSA chann
els, that the CIA had finally decided on the disposition of its cloud contract. It had refused 
my old team at Dell, and turned down HP, too, instead signing a ten-year, $600 million cloud de
velopment and management deal with Amazon. I had no negative feelings about this—actually, at 
this juncture, I was pleased that my work wasn’t going to be used by the agency. I was just cu
rious, from a professional standpoint, whether Gus might obliquely address this announcement an
d offer any insight into why Amazon had been chosen, since rumors were going around that the pr
oposal process had been rigged in Amazon’s favor.
I got insight, certainly, but of an unexpected kind. I had the opportunity of witnessing the hi
ghest-ranking technical officer at the CIA stand onstage in a rumpled suit and brief a crowd of
 uncleared normies—and, via the Internet, the uncleared world—about the agency’s ambitions a
nd capacities. As his presentation unfolded, and he alternated bad jokes with an even worse com
mand of PowerPoint, I grew more and more incredulous.
“At the CIA,” he said, “we fundamentally try to collect everything and hang on to it forever
.” As if that wasn’t clear enough, he went on: “It is nearly within our grasp to compute on 
all human generated information.” The underline was Gus’s own. He was reading from his slide 
deck, ugly words in an ugly font illustrated with the government’s signature four-color clip a
rt.
There were a few journalists in the crowd, apparently, though it seemed as if almost all of the
m were from specialty tech-government publications like Federal Computer Week. It was telling t
hat Gus stuck around for a Q & A toward the conclusion of his presentation. Rather, it wasn’t 
quite a Q & A, but more like an auxiliary presentation, offered directly to the journalists. He
 must have been trying to get something off his chest, and it wasn’t just his clown tie.
Gus told the journalists that the agency could track their smartphones, even when they were tur
ned off—that the agency could surveil every single one of their communications. Remember: this
 was a crowd of domestic journalists. American journalists. And the way that Gus said “could”
 came off as “has,” “does,” and “will.” He perorated in a distinctly disturbed, and distu
rbing, manner, at least for a CIA high priest: “Technology is moving faster than government or
 law can keep up. It’s moving faster … than you can keep up: you should be asking the questio
n of what are your rights and who owns your data.” I was floored—anybody more junior than Gus
 who had given a presentation like this would’ve been wearing orange by the end of the day.
Coverage of Gus’s confession ran only in the Huffington Post. But the performance itself lived
 on at YouTube, where it still remains, at least at the time of this writing six years later. T
he last time I checked, it had 313 views—a dozen of them mine.
The lesson I took from this was that for my disclosures to be effective, I had to do more than 
just hand some journalists some documents—more, even, than help them interpret the documents. 
I had to become their partner, to provide the technological training and tools to help them do 
their reporting accurately and safely. Taking this course of action would mean giving myself ov
er totally to one of the capital crimes of intelligence work: whereas other spies have committe
d espionage, sedition, and treason, I would be aiding and abetting an act of journalism. The pe
rverse fact is that legally, those crimes are virtually synonymous. American law makes no disti
nction between providing classified information to the press in the public interest and providi
ng it, even selling it, to the enemy. The only opinion I’ve ever found to contradict this came
 from my first indoctrination into the IC: there, I was told that it was in fact slightly bette
r to offer secrets for sale to the enemy than to offer them for free to a domestic reporter. A 
reporter will tell the public, whereas an enemy is unlikely to share its prize even with its al
lies.
Given the risks I was taking, I needed to identify people I could trust who were also trusted b
y the public. I needed reporters who were diligent yet discreet, independent yet reliable. They
 would need to be strong enough to challenge me on the distinctions between what I suspected an
d what the evidence proved, and to challenge the government when it falsely accused their work 
of endangering lives. Above all, I had to be sure that whoever I picked wouldn’t ultimately ca
ve to power when put under pressure that was certain to be like nothing they, or I, had ever ex
perienced before.
I cast my net not so widely as to imperil the mission, but widely enough to avoid a single poin
t of failure—the New York Times problem. One journalist, one publication, even one country of 
publication wouldn’t be enough, because the US government had already demonstrated its willing
ness to stifle such reporting. Ideally, I’d give each journalist their own set of documents si
multaneously, leaving me with none. This would shift the focus of scrutiny to them, and ensure 
that even if I were arrested the truth would still get out.
As I narrowed down my list of potential partners, I realized I’d been going about this all wro
ng, or just wastefully. Instead of trying to select the journalists on my own, I should have be
en letting the system that I was trying to expose select them for me. My best partners, I decid
ed, would be journalists whom the national security state had already targeted.
Laura Poitras I knew as a documentarian, primarily concerned with America’s post-9/11 foreign 
policy. Her film My Country, My Country depicted the 2005 Iraqi national elections that were co
nducted under (and frustrated by) the US occupation. She had also made The Program, about the N
SA cryptanalyst William Binney—who had raised objections through proper channels about TRAILBL
AZER, the predecessor of STELLARWIND, only to be accused of leaking classified information, sub
jected to repeated harassment, and arrested at gunpoint in his home, though never charged. Laur
a herself had been frequently harassed by the government because of her work, repeatedly detain
ed and interrogated by border agents whenever she traveled in or out of the country.
Glenn Greenwald I knew as a civil liberties lawyer turned columnist, initially for Salon—where
 he was one of the few who wrote about the unclassified version of the NSA IG’s Report back in
 2009—and later for the US edition of the Guardian. I liked him because he was skeptical and a
rgumentative, the kind of man who’d fight with the devil, and when the devil wasn’t around fi
ght with himself. Though Ewen MacAskill, of the British edition of the Guardian, and Bart Gellm
an of the Washington Post would later prove stalwart partners (and patient guides to the journa
listic wilderness), I found my earliest affinity with Laura and Glenn, perhaps because they wer
en’t merely interested in reporting on the IC but had personal stakes in understanding the ins
titution.
The only hitch was getting in touch.
Unable to reveal my true name, I contacted the journalists under a variety of identities, dispo
sable masks worn for a time and then discarded. The first of these was “Cincinnatus,” after t
he legendary farmer who became a Roman consul and then voluntarily relinquished his power. That
 was followed by “Citizenfour,” a handle that some journalists took to mean that I considered
 myself the fourth dissident-employee in the NSA’s recent history, after Binney and his fellow
 TRAILBLAZER whistleblowers J. Kirk Wiebe and Ed Loomis—though the triumvirate I actually had 
in mind consisted of Thomas Drake, who disclosed the existence of TRAILBLAZER to journalists, a
nd Daniel Ellsberg and Anthony Russo, whose disclosure of The Pentagon Papers helped expose the
 deceptions of the Vietnam War and bring it to an end. The final name I chose for my correspond
ence was “Verax,” Latin for “speaker of truth,” in the hopes of proposing an alternative to
 the model of a hacker called “Mendax” (“speaker of lies”)—the pseudonym of the young man 
who’d grow up to become WikiLeaks’ Julian Assange.
You can’t really appreciate how hard it is to stay anonymous online until you’ve tried to ope
rate as if your life depended on it. Most of the communications systems set up in the IC have a
 single basic aim: the observer of a communication must not be able to discern the identities o
f those involved, or in any way attribute them to an agency. This is why the IC calls these exc
hanges “non-attributable.” The pre-Internet spycraft of anonymity is famous, mostly from TV a
nd the movies: a safe-house address coded in bathroom-stall graffiti, for instance, or scramble
d into the abbreviations of a classified ad. Or think of the Cold War’s “dead drops,” the ch
alk marks on mailboxes signaling that a secret package was waiting inside a particular hollowed
-out tree in a public park. The modern version might be fake profiles trading fake chats on a d
ating site, or, more commonly, just a superficially innocuous app that leaves superficially inn
ocuous messages on a superficially innocuous Amazon server secretly controlled by the CIA. What
 I wanted, however, was something even better than that—something that required none of that e
xposure, and none of that budget.
I decided to use somebody else’s Internet connection. I wish that were simply a matter of goin
g to a McDonald’s or Starbucks and signing on to their Wi-Fi. But those places have CCTV, and 
receipts, and other people—memories with legs. Moreover, every wireless device, from a phone t
o a laptop, has a globally unique identifier called a MAC (Machine Address Code), which it leav
es on record with every access point it connects to—a forensic marker of its user’s movements
.
So I didn’t go to McDonald’s or Starbucks—I went driving. Specifically, I went war-driving, 
which is when you convert your car into a roving Wi-Fi sensor. For this you need a laptop, a hi
gh-powered antenna, and a magnetic GPS sensor, which can be slapped atop the roof. Power is pro
vided by the car or by a portable battery, or else by the laptop itself. Everything you need ca
n fit into a backpack.
I took along a cheap laptop running TAILS, which is a Linux-based “amnesiac” operating system
—meaning it forgets everything when you turn it off, and starts fresh when you boot it up agai
n, with no logs or memory traces of anything ever done on it. TAILS allowed me to easily “spoo
f,” or disguise, the laptop’s MAC: whenever it connected to a network it left behind the reco
rd of some other machine, in no way associable with mine. Usefully enough, TAILS also had built
-in support for connecting to the anonymizing Tor network.
At nights and on weekends, I drove around what seemed like the entire island of Oahu, letting m
y antenna pick up the pulses of each Wi-Fi network. My GPS sensor tagged each access point with
 the location at which it was noticed, thanks to a mapping program I used called Kismet. What r
esulted was a map of the invisible networks we pass by every day without even noticing, a scand
alously high percentage of which had either no security at all or security I could trivially by
pass. Some of the networks required more sophisticated hacking. I’d briefly jam a network, cau
sing its legitimate users to be booted off-line; in their attempt to reconnect, they’d automat
ically rebroadcast their “authentication packets,” which I could intercept and effectively de
cipher into passwords that would let me log on just like any other “authorized” user.
With this network map in hand, I’d drive around Oahu like a madman, trying to check my email t
o see which of the journalists had replied to me. Having made contact with Laura Poitras, I’d 
spend much of the evening writing to her—sitting behind the wheel of my car at the beach, filc
hing the Wi-Fi from a nearby resort. Some of the journalists I’d chosen needed convincing to u
se encrypted email, which back in 2012 was a pain. In some cases, I had to show them how, so I
’d upload tutorials—sitting in my idling car in a parking lot, availing myself of the network
 of a library. Or of a school. Or of a gas station. Or of a bank—which had horrifyingly poor p
rotections. The point was to not create any patterns.
Atop the parking garage of a mall, secure in the knowledge that the moment I closed the lid of 
my laptop, my secret was safe, I’d draft manifestos explaining why I’d gone public, but then 
delete them. And then I’d try writing emails to Lindsay, only to delete them, too. I just coul
dn’t find the words.
23
Read, Write, Execute
Read, Write, Execute: in computing, these are called permissions. Functionally speaking, they d
etermine the extent of your authority within a computer or computer network, defining what exac
tly you can and cannot do. The right to read a file allows you to access its contents, while th
e right to write a file allows you to modify it. Execution, meanwhile, means that you have the 
ability to run a file or program, to carry out the actions it was designed to do.
Read, Write, Execute: this was my simple three-step plan. I wanted to burrow into the heart of 
the world’s most secure network to find the truth, make a copy of it, and get it out into the 
world. And I had to do all this without getting caught—without being read, written, and execut
ed myself.
Almost everything you do on a computer, on any device, leaves a record. Nowhere is this more tr
ue than at the NSA. Each log-in and log-out creates a log entry. Each permission I used left it
s own forensic trace. Every time I opened a file, every time I copied a file, that action was r
ecorded. Every time I downloaded, moved, or deleted a file, that was recorded, too, and securit
y logs were updated to reflect the event. There were network flow records, public key infrastru
cture records—people even joked about cameras hidden in the bathrooms, in the bathroom stalls.
 The agency had a not inconsiderable number of counterintelligence programs spying on the peopl
e who were spying on people, and if even one caught me doing something I wasn’t supposed to be
 doing, it wouldn’t be a file that was getting deleted.
Luckily, the strength of these systems was also their weakness: their complexity meant that not
 even the people running them necessarily knew how they worked. Nobody actually understood wher
e they overlapped and where their gaps were. Nobody, that is, except the systems administrators
. After all, those sophisticated monitoring systems you’re imagining, the ones with scary name
s like MIDNIGHTRIDER—somebody’s got to install them in the first place. The NSA may have paid
 for the network, but sysadmins like myself were the ones who really owned it.
The Read phase would involve dancing through the digital grid of tripwires laid across the rout
es connecting the NSA to every other intelligence agency, domestic and foreign. (Among these wa
s the NSA’s UK partner, the Government Communications Headquarters, or GCHQ, which was setting
 up dragnets like OPTICNERVE, a program that saved a snapshot every five minutes from the camer
as of people video-chatting on platforms like Yahoo Messenger, and PHOTONTORPEDO, which grabbed
 the IP addresses of MSN Messenger users.) By using Heartbeat to bring in the documents I wante
d, I could turn “bulk collection” against those who’d turned it against the public, effectiv
ely Frankensteining the IC. The agency’s security tools kept track of who read what, but it di
dn’t matter: anyone who bothered to check their logs was used to seeing Heartbeat by now. It w
ould sound no alarms. It was the perfect cover.
But while Heartbeat would work as a way of collecting the files—far too many files—it only br
ought them to the server in Hawaii, a server that kept logs even I couldn’t get around. I need
ed a way to work with the files, search them, and discard the irrelevant and uninteresting, alo
ng with those containing legitimate secrets that I wouldn’t be giving to journalists. At this 
point, still in my Read phase, the hazards were manifold, due mainly to the fact that the proto
cols I was up against were no longer geared to monitoring but to prevention. If I ran my search
es on the Heartbeat server, it would light a massive electronic sign blinking ARREST ME.
I thought about this for a while. I couldn’t just copy the files directly from the Heartbeat s
erver onto a personal storage device and waltz out of the Tunnel without being caught. What I c
ould do, though, was bring the files closer, directing them to an intermediate way station.
I couldn’t send them to one of our regular computers, because by 2012 all of the Tunnel had be
en upgraded to new “thin client” machines: small helpless computers with crippled drives and 
CPUs that couldn’t store or process data on their own, but did all of their storage and proces
sing on the cloud. In a forgotten corner of the office, however, there was a pyramid of disused
 desktop computers—old, moldering legacy machines the agency had wiped clean and discarded. Wh
en I say old here, I mean young by the standards of anyone who doesn’t live on a budget the si
ze of the NSA’s. They were Dell PCs from as recently as 2009 or 2010, large gray rectangles of
 comforting weight, which could store and process data on their own without being connected to 
the cloud. What I liked about them was that though they were still in the NSA system, they coul
dn’t really be closely tracked as long as I kept them off the central networks.
I could easily justify needing to use these stolid, reliable boxes by claiming that I was tryin
g to make sure Heartbeat worked with older operating systems. After all, not everybody at every
 NSA site had one of the new “thin clients” just yet. And what if Dell wanted to implement a 
civilian version of Heartbeat? Or what if the CIA, or FBI, or some similarly backward organizat
ion wanted to use it? Under the guise of compatibility testing, I could transfer the files to t
hese old computers, where I could search, filter, and organize them as much as I wanted, as lon
g as I was careful. I was carrying one of the big old hulks back to my desk when I passed one o
f the IT directors, who stopped me and asked me what I needed it for—he’d been a major propon
ent of getting rid of them. “Stealing secrets,” I answered, and we laughed.
The Read phase ended with the files I wanted all neatly organized into folders. But they were s
till on a computer that wasn’t mine, which was still in the Tunnel underground. Enter, then, t
he Write phase, which for my purposes meant the agonizingly slow, boring-but-also-cripplingly-s
cary process of copying the files from the legacy Dells something that I could spirit out of th
e building.
The easiest and safest way to copy a file off any IC workstation is also the oldest: a camera. 
Smartphones, of course, are banned in NSA buildings, but workers accidentally bring them in all
 the time without anyone noticing. They leave them in their gym bags or in the pockets of their
 windbreakers. If they’re caught with one in a random search and they act goofily abashed inst
ead of screaming panicked Mandarin into their wristwatch, they’re often merely warned, especia
lly if it’s their first offense. But getting a smartphone loaded with NSA secrets out of the T
unnel is a riskier gambit. Odds are that nobody would’ve noticed—or cared—if I walked out wi
th a smartphone, and it might have been an adequate tool for a staffer trying to copy a single 
torture report, but I wasn’t wild about the idea of taking thousands of pictures of my compute
r screen in the middle of a top secret facility. Also, the phone would have had to be configure
d in such a way that even the world’s foremost forensic experts could seize and search it with
out finding anything on it that they shouldn’t.
I’m going to refrain from publishing how exactly I went about my own writing—my own copying a
nd encryption—so that the NSA will still be standing tomorrow. I will mention, however, what s
torage technology I used for the copied files. Forget thumbdrives; they’re too bulky for the r
elatively small amount they store. I went, instead, for SD cards—the acronym stands for Secure
 Digital. Actually, I went for the mini- and micro-SD cards.
You’ll recognize SD cards if you’ve ever used a digital camera or video camera, or needed mor
e storage on a tablet. They’re tiny little buggers, miracles of nonvolatile flash storage, and
—at 20 x 21.5 mm for the mini, 15 x 11 mm for the micro, basically the size of your pinkie fin
gernail—eminently concealable. You can fit one inside the pried-off square of a Rubik’s Cube,
 then stick the square back on, and nobody will notice. In other attempts I carried a card in m
y sock, or, at my most paranoid, in my cheek, so I could swallow it if I had to. Eventually, as
 I gained confidence, and certainty in my methods of encryption, I’d just keep a card at the b
ottom of my pocket. They hardly ever triggered metal detectors, and who wouldn’t believe I’d 
simply forgotten something so small?
The size of SD cards, however, has one downside: they’re extremely slow to write. Copying time
s for massive volumes of data are always long—at least always longer than you want—but the du
ration tends to stretch even more when you’re copying not to a speedy hard drive but to a minu
scule silicon wafer embedded in plastic. Also, I wasn’t just copying. I was deduplicating, com
pressing, encrypting, none of which processes could be accomplished simultaneously with any oth
er. I was using all the skills I’d ever acquired in my storage work, because that’s what I wa
s doing, essentially. I was storing the NSA’s storage, making an off-site backup of evidence o
f the IC’s abuses.
It could take eight hours or more—entire shifts—to fill a card. And though I switched to work
ing nights again, those hours were terrifying. There was the old computer chugging, monitor off
, with all but one fluorescent ceiling panel dimmed to save energy in the after-hours. And ther
e I was, turning the monitor back on every once in a while to check the rate of progress and cr
inging. You know the feeling—the sheer hell of following the completion bar as it indicates 84
 percent completed, 85 percent completed … 1:58:53 left … As it filled toward the sweet relie
f of 100 percent, all files copied, I’d be sweating, seeing shadows and hearing footsteps arou
nd every corner.
* * *
EXECUTE: THAT WAS the final step. As each card filled, I had to run my getaway routine. I had t
o get that vital archive out of the building, past the bosses and military uniforms, down the s
tairs and out the empty hall, past the badge scans and armed guards and mantraps—those two-doo
red security zones in which the next door doesn’t open until the previous door shuts and your 
badge scan is approved, and if it isn’t, or if anything else goes awry, the guards draw their 
weapons and the doors lock you in and you say, “Well, isn’t this embarrassing?” This—per al
l the reports I’d been studying, and all the nightmares I’d been having—was where they’d ca
tch me, I was sure of it. Each time I left, I was petrified. I’d have to force myself not to t
hink about the SD card. When you think about it, you act differently, suspiciously.
One unexpected upshot of gaining a better understanding of NSA surveillance was that I’d also 
gained a better understanding of the dangers I faced. In other words, learning about the agency
’s systems had taught me how not to get caught by them. My guides in this regard were the indi
ctments that the government had brought against former agents—mostly real bastards who, in IC 
jargon, had “exfiltrated” classified information for profit. I compiled, and studied, as many
 of these indictments as I could. The FBI—the agency that investigates all crime within the IC
—took great pride in explaining exactly how they caught their suspects, and believe me, I didn
’t mind benefiting from their experience. It seemed that in almost every case, the FBI would w
ait to make its arrest until the suspect had finished their work and was about to go home. Some
times they would let the suspect take the material out of a SCIF—a Sensitive Compartmented Inf
ormation Facility, which is a type of building or room shielded against surveillance—and out i
nto the public, where its very presence was a federal crime. I kept imagining a team of FBI age
nts lying in wait for me—there, out in the public light, just at the far end of the Tunnel.
I’d usually try to banter with the guards, and this was where my Rubik’s Cube came in most ha
ndy. I was known to the guards and to everybody else at the Tunnel as the Rubik’s Cube guy, be
cause I was always working the cube as I walked down the halls. I got so adept I could even sol
ve it one-handed. It became my totem, my spirit toy, and a distraction device as much for mysel
f as for my coworkers. Most of them thought it was an affectation, or a nerdy conversation star
ter. And it was, but primarily it relieved my anxiety. It calmed me.
I bought a few cubes and handed them out. Anyone who took to it, I’d give them pointers. The m
ore that people got used to them, the less they’d ever want a closer look at mine.
I got along with the guards, or I told myself I did, mostly because I knew where their minds we
re: elsewhere. I’d done something like their job before, back at CASL. I knew how mind-numbing
 it was to spend all night standing, feigning vigilance. Your feet hurt. After a while, all the
 rest of you hurts. And you can get so lonely that you’ll talk to a wall.
I aimed to be more entertaining than the wall, developing my own patter for each human obstacle
. There was the one guard I talked to about insomnia and the difficulties of day-sleeping (reme
mber, I was on nights, so this would’ve been around two in the morning). Another guy, we discu
ssed politics. He called Democrats “Demon Rats,” so I’d read Breitbart News in preparation f
or the conversation. What they all had in common was a reaction to my cube: it made them smile.
 Over the course of my employment at the Tunnel, pretty much all the guards said some variation
 of, “Oh man, I used to play with that when I was a kid,” and then, invariably, “I tried to 
take the stickers off to solve it.” Me too, buddy. Me too.
It was only once I got home that I was able to relax, even just slightly. I was still worried a
bout the house being wired—that was another one of those charming methods the FBI used against
 those it suspected of inadequate loyalty. I’d rebuff Lindsay’s concerns about my insomniac w
ays until she hated me and I hated myself. She’d go to bed and I’d go to the couch, hiding wi
th my laptop under a blanket like a child because cotton beats cameras. With the threat of imme
diate arrest out of the way, I could focus on transferring the files to a larger external stora
ge device via my laptop—only somebody who didn’t understand technology very well would think 
I’d keep them on the laptop forever—and locking them down under multiple layers of encryption
 algorithms using differing implementations, so that even if one failed the others would keep t
hem safe.
I’d been careful not to leave any traces at my work, and I took care that my encryption left n
o traces of the documents at home. Still, I knew the documents could lead back to me once I’d 
sent them to the journalists and they’d been decrypted. Any investigator looking at which agen
cy employees had accessed, or could access, all these materials would come up with a list with 
probably only a single name on it: mine. I could provide the journalists with fewer materials, 
of course, but then they wouldn’t be able to most effectively do their work. Ultimately, I had
 to contend with the fact that even one briefing slide or PDF left me vulnerable, because all d
igital files contain metadata, invisible tags that can be used to identify their origins.
I struggled with how to handle this metadata situation. I worried that if I didn’t strip the i
dentifying information from the documents, they might incriminate me the moment the journalists
 decrypted and opened them. But I also worried that by thoroughly stripping the metadata, I ris
ked altering the files—if they were changed in any way, that could cast doubt on their authent
icity. Which was more important: personal safety, or the public good? It might sound like an ea
sy choice, but it took me quite a while to bite the bullet. I owned the risk, and left the meta
data intact.
Part of what convinced me was my fear that even if I had stripped away the metadata I knew abou
t, there could be other digital watermarks I wasn’t aware of and couldn’t scan for. Another p
art had to do with the difficulty of scrubbing single-user documents. A single-user document is
 a document marked with a user-specific code, so that if any publication’s editorial staff dec
ided to run it by the government, the government would know its source. Sometimes the unique id
entifier was hidden in the date and time-stamp coding, sometimes it involved the pattern of mic
rodots in a graphic or logo. But it might also be embedded in something, in some way, I hadn’t
 even thought of. This phenomenon should have discouraged me, but instead it emboldened me. The
 technological difficulty forced me, for the first time, to confront the prospect of discarding
 my lifetime practice of anonymity and coming forward to identify myself as the source. I would
 embrace my principles by signing my name to them and let myself be condemned.
Altogether, the documents I selected fit on a single drive, which I left out in the open on my 
desk at home. I knew that the materials were just as secure now as they had ever been at the of
fice. Actually, they were more secure, thanks to multiple levels and methods of encryption. Tha
t’s the incomparable beauty of the cryptological art. A little bit of math can accomplish what
 all the guns and barbed wire can’t: a little bit of math can keep a secret.
24
Encrypt
Most people who use computers, and that includes members of the Fourth Estate, think there’s a
 fourth basic permission besides Read, Write, and Execute, called “Delete.”
Delete is everywhere on the user side of computing. It’s in the hardware as a key on the keybo
ard, and it’s in the software as an option that can be chosen from a drop-down menu. There’s 
a certain finality that comes with choosing Delete, and a certain sense of responsibility. Some
times a box even pops up to double-check: “Are you sure?” If the computer is second-guessing 
you by requiring confirmation—click “Yes”—it makes sense that Delete would be a consequenti
al, perhaps even the ultimate decision.
Undoubtedly, that’s true in the world outside of computing, where the powers of deletion have 
historically been vast. Even so, as countless despots have been reminded, to truly get rid of a
 document you can’t just destroy every copy of it. You also have to destroy every memory of it
, which is to say you have to destroy all the people who remember it, along with every copy of 
all the other documents that mention it and all the people who remember all those other documen
ts. And then, maybe, just maybe, it’s gone.
Delete functions appeared from the very start of digital computing. Engineers understood that i
n a world of effectively unlimited options, some choices would inevitably turn out to be mistak
es. Users, regardless of whether or not they were really in control at the technical level, had
 to feel in control, especially with regard to anything that they themselves had created. If th
ey made a file, they should be able to unmake it at will. The ability to destroy what they crea
ted and start over afresh was a primary function that imparted a sense of agency to the user, d
espite the fact that they might be dependent on proprietary hardware they couldn’t repair and 
software they couldn’t modify, and bound by the rules of third-party platforms.
Think about the reasons that you yourself press Delete. On your personal computer, you might wa
nt to get rid of some document you screwed up, or some file you downloaded but no longer need—
or some file you don’t want anyone to know you ever needed. On your email, you might delete an
 email from a former lover that you don’t want to remember or don’t want your spouse to find,
 or an RSVP for that protest you went to. On your phone, you might delete the history of everyw
here that phone has traveled, or some of the pictures, videos, and private records it automatic
ally uploaded to the cloud. In every instance, you delete, and the thing—the file—appears to 
be gone.
The truth, though, is that deletion has never existed technologically in the way that we concei
ve of it. Deletion is just a ruse, a figment, a public fiction, a not-quite-noble lie that comp
uting tells you to reassure you and give you comfort. Although the deleted file disappears from
 view, it is rarely gone. In technical terms, deletion is really just a form of the middle perm
ission, a kind of Write. Normally, when you press Delete for one of your files, its data—which
 has been stashed deep down on a disk somewhere—is not actually touched. Efficient modern oper
ating systems are not designed to go all the way into the bowels of a disk purely for the purpo
ses of erasure. Instead, only the computer’s map of where each file is stored—a map called th
e “file table”—is rewritten to say “I’m no longer using this space for anything important.
” What this means is that, like a neglected book in a vast library, the supposedly erased file
 can still be read by anyone who looks hard enough for it. If you only erase the reference to i
t, the book itself still remains.
This can be confirmed through experience, actually. Next time you copy a file, ask yourself why
 it takes so long when compared with the instantaneous act of deletion. The answer is that dele
tion doesn’t really do anything to a file besides conceal it. Put simply, computers were not d
esigned to correct mistakes, but to hide them—and to hide them only from those parties who don
’t know where to look.
* * *
THE WANING DAYS of 2012 brought grim news: the few remaining legal protections that prohibited 
mass surveillance by some of the most prominent members of the Five Eyes network were being dis
mantled. The governments of both Australia and the UK were proposing legislation for the mandat
ory recording of telephony and Internet metadata. This was the first time that notionally democ
ratic governments publicly avowed the ambition to establish a sort of surveillance time machine
, which would enable them to technologically rewind the events of any person’s life for a peri
od going back months and even years. These attempts definitively marked, to my mind at least, t
he so-called Western world’s transformation from the creator and defender of the free Internet
 to its opponent and prospective destroyer. Though these laws were justified as public safety m
easures, they represented such a breathtaking intrusion into the daily lives of the innocent th
at they terrified—quite rightly—even the citizens of other countries who didn’t think themse
lves affected (perhaps because their own governments chose to surveil them in secret).
These public initiatives of mass surveillance proved, once and for all, that there could be no 
natural alliance between technology and government. The rift between my two strangely interrela
ted communities, the American IC and the global online tribe of technologists, became pretty mu
ch definitive. In my earliest years in the IC, I could still reconcile the two cultures, transi
tioning smoothly between my spy work and my relationships with civilian Internet privacy folks
—everyone from the anarchist hackers to the more sober academic Tor types who kept me current 
about computing research and inspired me politically. For years, I was able to fool myself that
 we were all, ultimately, on the same side of history: we were all trying to protect the Intern
et, to keep it free for speech and free of fear. But my ability to sustain that delusion was go
ne. Now the government, my employer, was definitively the adversary. What my technologist peers
 had always suspected, I’d only recently confirmed, and I couldn’t tell them. Or I couldn’t 
tell them yet.
What I could do, however, was help them out, so long as that didn’t imperil my plans. This was
 how I found myself in Honolulu, a beautiful city in which I’d never had much interest, as one
 of the hosts and teachers of a CryptoParty. This was a new type of gathering invented by an in
ternational grassroots cryptological movement, at which technologists volunteered their time to
 teach free classes to the public on the topic of digital self-defense—essentially, showing an
yone who was interested how to protect the security of their communications. In many ways, this
 was the same topic I taught for JCITA, so I jumped at the chance to participate.
Though this might strike you as a dangerous thing for me to have done, given the other activiti
es I was involved with at the time, it should instead just reaffirm how much faith I had in the
 encryption methods I taught—the very methods that protected that drive full of IC abuses sitt
ing back at my house, with locks that couldn’t be cracked even by the NSA. I knew that no numb
er of documents, and no amount of journalism, would ever be enough to address the threat the wo
rld was facing. People needed tools to protect themselves, and they needed to know how to use t
hem. Given that I was also trying to provide these tools to journalists, I was worried that my 
approach had become too technical. After so many sessions spent lecturing colleagues, this oppo
rtunity to simplify my treatment of the subject for a general audience would benefit me as much
 as anyone. Also, I honestly missed teaching: it had been a year since I’d stood at the front 
of a class, and the moment I was back in that position I realized I’d been teaching the right 
things to the wrong people all along.
When I say class, I don’t mean anything like the IC’s schools or briefing rooms. The CryptoPa
rty was held in a one-room art gallery behind a furniture store and coworking space. While I wa
s setting up the projector so I could share slides showing how easy it was to run a Tor server 
to help, for example, the citizens of Iran—but also the citizens of Australia, the UK, and the
 States—my students drifted in, a diverse crew of strangers and a few new friends I’d only me
t online. All in all, I’d say about twenty people showed up that December night to learn from 
me and my co-lecturer, Runa Sandvik, a bright young Norwegian woman from the Tor Project. (Runa
 would go on to work as the senior director of information security for the New York Times, whi
ch would sponsor her later CryptoParties.) What united our audience wasn’t an interest in Tor,
 or even a fear of being spied on as much as a desire to re-establish a sense of control over t
he private spaces in their lives. There were some grandparent types who’d wandered in off the 
street, a local journalist covering the Hawaiian “Occupy!” movement, and a woman who’d been 
victimized by revenge porn. I’d also invited some of my NSA colleagues, hoping to interest the
m in the movement and wanting to show that I wasn’t concealing my involvement from the agency.
 Only one of them showed up, though, and sat in the back, legs spread, arms crossed, smirking t
hroughout.
I began my presentation by discussing the illusory nature of deletion, whose objective of total
 erasure could never be accomplished. The crowd understood this instantly. I went on to explain
 that, at best, the data they wanted no one to see couldn’t be unwritten so much as overwritte
n: scribbled over, in a sense, with random or pseudo-random data until the original was rendere
d unreadable. But, I cautioned, even this approach had its drawbacks. There was always a chance
 that their operating system had silently hidden away a copy of the file they were hoping to de
lete in some temporary storage nook they weren’t privy to.
That’s when I pivoted to encryption.
Deletion is a dream for the surveillant and a nightmare for the surveilled, but encryption is, 
or should be, a reality for all. It is the only true protection against surveillance. If the wh
ole of your storage drive is encrypted to begin with, your adversaries can’t rummage through i
t for deleted files, or for anything else—unless they have the encryption key. If all the emai
ls in your inbox are encrypted, Google can’t read them to profile you—unless they have the en
cryption key. If all your communications that pass through hostile Australian or British or Ame
rican or Chinese or Russian networks are encrypted, spies can’t read them—unless they have th
e encryption key. This is the ordering principle of encryption: all power to the key holder.
Encryption works, I explained, by way of algorithms. An encryption algorithm sounds intimidatin
g, and certainly looks intimidating when written out, but its concept is quite elementary. It’
s a mathematical method of reversibly transforming information—such as your emails, phone call
s, photos, videos, and files—in such a way that it becomes incomprehensible to anyone who does
n’t have a copy of the encryption key. You can think of a modern encryption algorithm as a mag
ic wand that you can wave over a document to change each letter into a language that only you a
nd those you trust can read, and the encryption key as the unique magic words that complete the
 incantation and put the wand to work. It doesn’t matter how many people know that you used th
e wand, so long as you can keep your personal magic words from the people you don’t trust.
Encryption algorithms are basically just sets of math problems designed to be incredibly diffic
ult even for computers to solve. The encryption key is the one clue that allows a computer to s
olve the particular set of math problems being used. You push your readable data, called plaint
ext, into one end of an encryption algorithm, and incomprehensible gibberish, called ciphertext
, comes out the other end. When somebody wants to read the ciphertext, they feed it back into t
he algorithm along with—crucially—the correct key, and out comes the plaintext again. While d
ifferent algorithms provide different degrees of protection, the security of an encryption key 
is often based on its length, which indicates the level of difficulty involved in solving a spe
cific algorithm’s underlying math problem. In algorithms that correlate longer keys with bette
r security, the improvement is exponential. If we presume that an attacker takes one day to cra
ck a 64-bit key—which scrambles your data in one of 264 possible ways (18,446,744,073,709,551,
616 unique permutations)—then it would take double that amount of time, two days, to break a 6
5-bit key, and four days to break a 66-bit key. Breaking a 128-bit key would take 264 times lon
ger than a day, or fifty million billion years. By that time, I might even be pardoned.
In my communications with journalists, I used 4096- and 8192-bit keys. This meant that absent m
ajor innovations in computing technology or a fundamental redefining of the principles by which
 numbers are factored, not even all of the NSA’s cryptanalysts using all of the world’s compu
ting power put together would be able to get into my drive. For this reason, encryption is the 
single best hope for fighting surveillance of any kind. If all of our data, including our commu
nications, were enciphered in this fashion, from end to end (from the sender end to the recipie
nt end), then no government—no entity conceivable under our current knowledge of physics, for 
that matter—would be able to understand them. A government could still intercept and collect t
he signals, but it would be intercepting and collecting pure noise. Encrypting our communicatio
ns would essentially delete them from the memories of every entity we deal with. It would effec
tively withdraw permission from those to whom it was never granted to begin with.
Any government hoping to access encrypted communications has only two options: it can either go
 after the keymasters or go after the keys. For the former, they can pressure device manufactur
ers into intentionally selling products that perform faulty encryption, or mislead internationa
l standards organizations into accepting flawed encryption algorithms that contain secret acces
s points known as “back doors.” For the latter, they can launch targeted attacks against the 
endpoints of the communications, the hardware and software that perform the process of encrypti
on. Often, that means exploiting a vulnerability that they weren’t responsible for creating bu
t merely found, and using it to hack you and steal your keys—a technique pioneered by criminal
s but today embraced by major state powers, even though it means knowingly preserving devastati
ng holes in the cybersecurity of critical international infrastructure.
The best means we have for keeping our keys safe is called “zero knowledge,” a method that en
sures that any data you try to store externally—say, for instance, on a company’s cloud platf
orm—is encrypted by an algorithm running on your device before it is uploaded, and the key is 
never shared. In the zero knowledge scheme, the keys are in the users’ hands—and only in the 
users’ hands. No company, no agency, no enemy can touch them.
My key to the NSA’s secrets went beyond zero knowledge: it was a zero-knowledge key consisting
 of multiple zero-knowledge keys.
Imagine it like this: Let’s say that at the conclusion of my CryptoParty lecture, I stood by t
he exit as each of the twenty audience members shuffled out. Now, imagine that as each of them 
passed through the door and into the Honolulu night, I whispered a word into their ear—a singl
e word that no one else could hear, and that they were only allowed to repeat if they were all 
together, once again, in the same room. Only by bringing back all twenty of these folks and hav
ing them repeat their words in the same order in which I’d originally distributed them could a
nyone reassemble the complete twenty-word incantation. If just one person forgot their word, or
 if the order of recitation was in any way different from the order of distribution, no spell w
ould be cast, no magic would happen.
My keys to the drive containing the disclosures resembled this arrangement, with a twist: while
 I distributed most of the pieces of the incantation, I retained one for myself. Pieces of my m
agic spell were hidden everywhere, but if I destroyed just the single lone piece that I kept on
 my person, I would destroy all access to the NSA’s secrets forever.
25
The Boy
It’s only in hindsight that I’m able to appreciate just how high my star had risen. I’d gone
 from being the student who couldn’t speak in class to being the teacher of the language of a 
new age, from the child of modest, middle-class Beltway parents to the man living the island li
fe and making so much money that it had lost its meaning. In just the seven short years of my c
areer, I’d climbed from maintaining local servers to crafting and implementing globally deploy
ed systems—from graveyard-shift security guard to key master of the puzzle palace.
But there’s always a danger in letting even the most qualified person rise too far, too fast, 
before they’ve had enough time to get cynical and abandon their idealism. I occupied one of th
e most unexpectedly omniscient positions in the Intelligence Community—toward the bottom rung 
of the managerial ladder, but high atop heaven in terms of access. And while this gave me the p
henomenal, and frankly undeserved, ability to observe the IC in its grim fullness, it also left
 me more curious than ever about the one fact I was still finding elusive: the absolute limit o
f who the agency could turn its gaze against. It was a limit set less in policy or law than in 
the ruthless, unyielding capabilities of what I now knew to be a world-spanning machine. Was th
ere anyone this machine could not surveil? Was there anywhere this machine could not go?
The only way to discover the answer was to descend, abandoning my panoptic perch for the narrow
 vision of an operational role. The NSA employees with the freest access to the rawest forms of
 intelligence were those who sat in the operator’s chair and typed into their computers the na
mes of the individuals who’d fallen under suspicion, foreigners and US citizens alike. For one
 reason or another, or for no reason at all, these individuals had become targets of the agency
’s closest scrutiny, with the NSA interested in finding out everything about them and their co
mmunications. My ultimate destination, I knew, was the exact point of this interface—the exact
 point where the state cast its eye on the human and the human remained unaware.
The program that enabled this access was called XKEYSCORE, which is perhaps best understood as 
a search engine that lets an analyst search through all the records of your life. Imagine a kin
d of Google that instead of showing pages from the public Internet returns results from your pr
ivate email, your private chats, your private files, everything. Though I’d read enough about 
the program to understand how it worked, I hadn’t yet used it, and I realized I ought to know 
more about it. By pursuing XKEYSCORE, I was looking for a personal confirmation of the depths o
f the NSA’s surveillance intrusions—the kind of confirmation you don’t get from documents bu
t only from direct experience.
One of the few offices in Hawaii with truly unfettered access to XKEYSCORE was the National Thr
eat Operations Center. NTOC worked out of the sparkling but soulless new open-plan office the N
SA had formally named the Rochefort Building, after Joseph Rochefort, a legendary World War II
–era Naval cryptanalyst who broke Japanese codes. Most employees had taken to calling it the R
oach Fort, or simply “the Roach.” At the time I applied for a job there, parts of the Roach w
ere still under construction, and I was immediately reminded of my first cleared job, with CASL
: it was my fate to begin and end my IC career in unfinished buildings.
In addition to housing almost all of the agency’s Hawaii-based translators and analysts, the R
oach also accommodated the local branch of the Tailored Access Operations (TAO) division. This 
was the NSA unit responsible for remotely hacking into the computers of people whom analysts ha
d selected as targets—the agency’s equivalent of the old burglary teams that once snuck into 
enemies’ homes to plant bugs and find compromising material. NTOC’s main job, by contrast, wa
s to monitor and frustrate the activity of the TAO’s foreign equivalents. As luck would have i
t, NTOC had a position open through a contractor job at Booz Allen Hamilton, a job they euphemi
stically described as “infrastructure analyst.” The role involved using the complete spectrum
 of the NSA’s mass surveillance tools, including XKEYSCORE, to monitor activity on the “infra
structure” of interest, the Internet.
Though I’d be making slightly more money at Booz, around $120,000 a year, I considered it a de
motion—the first of many as I began my final descent, jettisoning my accesses, my clearances, 
and my agency privileges. I was an engineer who was becoming an analyst who would ultimately be
come an exile, a target of the very technologies I’d once controlled. From that perspective, t
his particular fall in prestige seemed pretty minor. From that perspective, everything seemed p
retty minor, as the arc of my life bent back toward earth, accelerating toward the point of imp
act that would end my career, my relationship, my freedom, and possibly my life.
* * *
I’D DECIDED TO bring my archives out of the country and pass them to the journalists I’d cont
acted, but before I could even begin to contemplate the logistics of that act I had to go shake
 some hands. I had to fly east to DC and spend a few weeks meeting and greeting my new bosses a
nd colleagues, who had high hopes for how they might apply my keen understanding of online anon
ymization to unmask their more clever targets. This was what brought me back home to the Beltwa
y for the very last time, and back to the site of my first encounter with an institution that h
ad lost control: Fort Meade. This time I was arriving as an insider.
The day that marked my coming of age, just over ten tumultuous years earlier, had profoundly ch
anged not just the people who worked at NSA headquarters but the place itself. I first noticed 
this fact when I got stopped in my rental car trying to turn off Canine Road into one of the ag
ency’s parking lots, which in my memory still howled with panic, ringtones, car horns, and sir
ens. Since 9/11, all the roads that led to NSA headquarters had been permanently closed to anyo
ne who didn’t possess one of the special IC badges now hanging around my neck.
Whenever I wasn’t glad-handing NTOC leadership at headquarters, I spent my time learning every
thing I could—“hot-desking” with analysts who worked different programs and different types 
of targets, so as to be able to teach my fellow team members back in Hawaii the newest ways the
 agency’s tools might be used. That, at least, was the official explanation of my curiosity, w
hich as always exceeded the requirements and earned the gratitude of the technologically inclin
ed. They, in turn, were as eager as ever to demonstrate the power of the machinery they’d deve
loped, without expressing a single qualm about how that power was applied. While at headquarter
s, I was also put through a series of tests on the proper use of the system, which were more li
ke regulatory compliance exercises or procedural shields than meaningful instruction. The other
 analysts told me that since I could take these tests as many times as I had to, I shouldn’t b
other learning the rules: “Just click the boxes until you pass.”
The NSA described XKEYSCORE, in the documents I’d later pass on to journalists, as its “wides
t-ranging” tool, used to search “nearly everything a user does on the Internet.” The technic
al specs I studied went into more detail as to how exactly this was accomplished—by “packetiz
ing” and “sessionizing,” or cutting up the data of a user’s online sessions into manageable
 packets for analysis—but nothing could prepare me for seeing it in action.
It was, simply put, the closest thing to science fiction I’ve ever seen in science fact: an in
terface that allows you to type in pretty much anyone’s address, telephone number, or IP addre
ss, and then basically go through the recent history of their online activity. In some cases yo
u could even play back recordings of their online sessions, so that the screen you’d be lookin
g at was their screen, whatever was on their desktop. You could read their emails, their browse
r history, their search history, their social media postings, everything. You could set up noti
fications that would pop up when some person or some device you were interested in became activ
e on the Internet for the day. And you could look through the packets of Internet data to see a
 person’s search queries appear letter by letter, since so many sites transmitted each charact
er as it was typed. It was like watching an autocomplete, as letters and words flashed across t
he screen. But the intelligence behind that typing wasn’t artificial but human: this was a hum
ancomplete.
My weeks at Fort Meade, and the short stint I put in at Booz back in Hawaii, were the only time
s I saw, firsthand, the abuses actually being committed that I’d previously read about in inte
rnal documentation. Seeing them made me realize how insulated my position at the systems level 
had been from the ground zero of immediate damage. I could only imagine the level of insulation
 of the agency’s directorship or, for that matter, of the US president.
I didn’t type the names of the agency director or the president into XKEYSCORE, but after enou
gh time with the system I realized I could have. Everyone’s communications were in the system
—everyone’s. I was initially fearful that if I searched those in the uppermost echelons of st
ate, I’d be caught and fired, or worse. But it was surpassingly simple to disguise a query reg
arding even the most prominent figure by encoding my search terms in a machine format that look
ed like gibberish to humans but would be perfectly understandable to XKEYSCORE. If any of the a
uditors who were responsible for reviewing the searches ever bothered to look more closely, the
y would see only a snippet of obfuscated code, while I would be able to scroll through the most
 personal activities of a Supreme Court justice or a congressperson.
As far as I could tell, none of my new colleagues intended to abuse their powers so grandly, al
though if they had it’s not like they’d ever mention it. Anyway, when analysts thought about 
abusing the system, they were far less interested in what it could do for them professionally t
han in what it could do for them personally. This led to the practice known as LOVEINT, a gross
 joke on HUMINT and SIGINT and a travesty of intelligence, in which analysts used the agency’s
 programs to surveil their current and former lovers along with objects of more casual affectio
n—reading their emails, listening in on their phone calls, and stalking them online. NSA emplo
yees knew that only the dumbest analysts were ever caught red-handed, and though the law stated
 that anyone engaging in any type of surveillance for personal use could be locked up for at le
ast a decade, no one in the agency’s history had been sentenced to even a day in prison for th
e crime. Analysts understood that the government would never publicly prosecute them, because y
ou can’t exactly convict someone of abusing your secret system of mass surveillance if you ref
use to admit the existence of the system itself. The obvious costs of such a policy became appa
rent to me as I sat along the back wall of vault V22 at NSA headquarters with two of the more t
alented infrastructure analysts, whose workspace was decorated with a seven-foot-tall picture o
f Star Wars’ famous wookie, Chewbacca. I realized, as one of them was explaining to me the det
ails of his targets’ security routines, that intercepted nudes were a kind of informal office 
currency, because his buddy kept spinning in his chair to interrupt us with a smile, saying, “
Check her out,” to which my instructor would invariably reply “Bonus!” or “Nice!” The unsp
oken transactional rule seemed to be that if you found a naked photo or video of an attractive 
target—or someone in communication with a target—you had to show the rest of the boys, at lea
st as long as there weren’t any women around. That was how you knew you could trust each other
: you had shared in one another’s crimes.
One thing you come to understand very quickly while using XKEYSCORE is that nearly everyone in 
the world who’s online has at least two things in common: they have all watched porn at one ti
me or another, and they all store photos and videos of their family. This was true for virtuall
y everyone of every gender, ethnicity, race, and age—from the meanest terrorist to the nicest 
senior citizen, who might be the meanest terrorist’s grandparent, or parent, or cousin.
It’s the family stuff that got to me the most. I remember this one child in particular, a litt
le boy in Indonesia. Technically, I shouldn’t have been interested in this little boy, but I w
as, because my employers were interested in his father. I had been reading through the shared t
argeting folders of a “persona” analyst, meaning someone who typically spent most of their da
y sifting through artifacts like chat logs and Gmail inboxes and Facebook messages, rather than
 the more obscure and difficult, typically hacker-generated traffic of the infrastructure analy
sts.
The boy’s father, like my own father, was an engineer—but unlike my father, this guy wasn’t 
government- or military-affiliated. He was just a regular academic who’d been caught up in a s
urveillance dragnet. I can’t even remember how or why he’d come to the agency’s attention, b
eyond sending a job application to a research university in Iran. The grounds for suspicion wer
e often poorly documented, if they were documented at all, and the connections could be incredi
bly tenuous—“believed to be potentially associated with” and then the name of some internati
onal organization that could be anything from a telecommunications standards body to UNICEF to 
something you might actually agree is menacing.
Selections from the man’s communications had been sieved out of the stream of Internet traffic
 and assembled into folders—here was the fatal copy of the résumé sent to the suspect univer
sity; here were his texts; here was his Web browser history; here was the last week or so of hi
s correspondence both sent and received, tagged to IP addresses. Here were the coordinates of a
 “geo-fence” the analyst had placed around him to track whether he strayed too far from home,
 or perhaps traveled to the university for his interview.
Then there were his pictures, and a video. He was sitting in front of his computer, as I was si
tting in front of mine. Except that in his lap he had a toddler, a boy in a diaper.
The father was trying to read something, but the kid kept shifting around, smacking the keys an
d giggling. The computer’s internal mic picked up his giggling and there I was, listening to i
t on my headphones. The father held the boy tighter, and the boy straightened up, and, with his
 dark crescent eyes, looked directly into the computer’s camera—I couldn’t escape the feelin
g that he was looking directly at me. Suddenly I realized that I’d been holding my breath. I s
hut the session, got up from the computer, and left the office for the bathroom in the hall, he
ad down, headphones still on with the cord trailing.
Everything about that kid, everything about his father, reminded me of my own father, whom I me
t for dinner one evening during my stint at Fort Meade. I hadn’t seen him in a while, but ther
e in the midst of dinner, over bites of Caesar salad and a pink lemonade, I had the thought: I
’ll never see my family again. My eyes were dry—I was exerting as much control as I could—bu
t inside, I was devastated. I knew that if I told him what I was about to do, he would’ve call
ed the cops. Or else he would’ve called me crazy and had me committed to a mental hospital. He
 would’ve done anything he thought he had to do to prevent me from making the gravest of mista
kes.
I could only hope that his hurt would in time be healed by pride.
Back in Hawaii between March and May 2013, a sense of finality suffused nearly every experience
 for me, and though the experiences themselves might seem trivial, they eased my path. It was f
ar less painful to think that this was the last time I’d ever stop at the curry place in Milil
ani or drop by the art-gallery hacker space in Honolulu or just sit on the roof of my car and s
can the nighttime sky for falling stars than to think that I only had another month left with L
indsay, or another week left of sleeping next to her and waking up next to her and yet trying t
o keep my distance from her, for fear of breaking down.
The preparations I was making were those of a man about to die. I emptied my bank accounts, put
ting cash into an old steel ammo box for Lindsay to find so that the government couldn’t seize
 it. I went around the house doing oft-procrastinated chores, like fixing windows and changing 
lightbulbs. I erased and encrypted my old computers, reducing them to the silent husks of bette
r times. In sum, I was putting my affairs in order to try to make everything easier for Lindsay
, or just for my conscience, which periodically would switch allegiance from a world that hadn
’t earned it to the woman who had and the family I loved.
Everything was imbued with this sense of an ending, and yet there were moments when it seemed t
hat no end was in sight and that the plan I’d developed was collapsing. It was difficult to ge
t the journalists to commit to a meeting, mostly because I couldn’t tell them who they were me
eting with, or even, for a while at least, where and when it was happening. I had to reckon wit
h the prospect of them never showing up, or of them showing up but then dropping out. Ultimatel
y I decided that if either of those happened, I’d just abandon the plan and return to work and
 to Lindsay as if everything was normal, to wait for my next chance.
In my wardrives back and forth from Kunia—a twenty-minute ride that could become a two-hour Wi
-Fi scavenger hunt—I’d been researching various countries, trying to find a location for my m
eeting with the journalists. It felt like I was picking out my prison, or rather my grave. All 
of the Five Eyes countries were obviously off-limits. In fact, all of Europe was out, because i
ts countries couldn’t be counted upon to uphold international law against the extradition of t
hose charged with political crimes in the face of what was sure to be significant American pres
sure. Africa and Latin America were no-go zones too—the United States had a history of acting 
there with impunity. Russia was out because it was Russia, and China was China: both were total
ly out of bounds. The US government wouldn’t have to do anything to discredit me other than po
int at the map. The optics would only be worse in the Middle East. It sometimes seemed as if th
e most challenging hack of my life wasn’t going to be plundering the NSA but rather trying to 
find a meeting venue independent enough to hold off the White House and free enough not to inte
rfere with my activities.
The process of elimination left me with Hong Kong. In geopolitical terms, it was the closest I 
could get to no-man’s-land, but with a vibrant media and protest culture, not to mention large
ly unfiltered Internet. It was an oddity, a reasonably liberal world city whose nominal autonom
y would distance me from China and restrain Beijing’s ability to take public action against me
 or the journalists—at least immediately—but whose de facto existence in Beijing’s sphere of
 influence would reduce the possibility of unilateral US intervention. In a situation with no p
romise of safety, it was enough to have the guarantee of time. Chances were that things weren’
t going to end well for me, anyway: the best I could hope for was getting the disclosures out b
efore I was caught.
The last morning I woke up with Lindsay, she was leaving on a camping trip to Kauai—a brief ge
taway with friends that I’d encouraged. We lay in bed and I held her too tightly, and when she
 asked with sleepy bewilderment why I was suddenly being so affectionate, I apologized. I told 
her how sorry I was for how busy I’d been, and that I was going to miss her—she was the best 
person I’d ever met in my life. She smiled, pecked me on the cheek, and then got up to pack.
The moment she was out the door, I started crying, for the first time in years. I felt guilty a
bout everything except what my government would accuse me of, and especially guilty about my te
ars, because I knew that my pain would be nothing compared to the pain I’d cause to the woman 
I loved, or to the hurt and confusion I’d cause my family.
At least I had the benefit of knowing what was coming. Lindsay would return from her camping tr
ip to find me gone, ostensibly on a work assignment, and my mother basically waiting on our doo
rstep. I’d invited my mother to visit, in a move so uncharacteristic that she must have expect
ed another type of surprise—like an announcement that Lindsay and I were engaged. I felt horri
ble about the false pretenses and winced at the thought of her disappointment, but I kept telli
ng myself I was justified. My mother would take care of Lindsay and Lindsay would take care of 
her. Each would need the other’s strength to weather the coming storm.
The day after Lindsay left, I took an emergency medical leave of absence from work, citing epil
epsy, and packed scant luggage and four laptops: secure communications, normal communications, 
a decoy, and an “airgap” (a computer that had never gone and would never go online). I left m
y smartphone on the kitchen counter alongside a notepad on which I scribbled in pen: Got called
 away for work. I love you. I signed it with my call-letter nickname, Echo. Then I went to the 
airport and bought a ticket in cash for the next flight to Tokyo. In Tokyo, I bought another ti
cket in cash, and on May 20 arrived in Hong Kong, the city where the world first met me.
26
Hong Kong
The deep psychological appeal of games, which are really just a series of increasingly difficul
t challenges, is the belief that they can be won. Nowhere is this more clear to me than in the 
case of the Rubik’s Cube, which satisfies a universal fantasy: that if you just work hard enou
gh and twist yourself through all of the possibilities, everything in the world that appears sc
rambled and incoherent will finally click into position and become perfectly aligned; that huma
n ingenuity is enough to transform the most broken and chaotic system into something logical an
d orderly where every face of three-dimensional space shines with perfect uniformity.
I’d had a plan—I’d had multiple plans—in which a single mistake would have meant getting ca
ught, and yet I hadn’t been: I’d made it out of the NSA, I’d made it out of the country. I h
ad beaten the game. By every standard I could imagine, the hard part was over. But my imaginati
on hadn’t been good enough, because the journalists I’d asked to come meet me weren’t showin
g up. They kept postponing, giving excuses, apologizing.
I knew that Laura Poitras—to whom I’d already sent a few documents and the promise of many mo
re—was ready to fly anywhere from New York City at a moment’s notice, but she wasn’t going t
o come alone. She was busy trying to get Glenn Greenwald to commit, trying to get him to buy a 
new laptop that he wouldn’t put online. Trying to get him to install encryption programs so we
 could better communicate. And there I was, in Hong Kong, watching the clock tick away the hour
s, watching the calendar tick off the days, beseeching, begging: please come before the NSA rea
lizes I’ve been gone from work too long. It was tough to think about all the lengths I’d gone
 to only to face the prospect of being left in Hong Kong high and dry. I tried to work up some 
sympathy for these journalists who seemed too busy or too nervous to lock down their travel pla
ns, but then I’d recall just how little of the material for which I was risking everything wou
ld actually make it to the public if the police arrived first. I thought about my family and Li
ndsay and how foolish it was to have put my life in the hands of people who didn’t even know m
y name.
I barricaded myself in my room at the Mira Hotel, which I chose because of its central location
 in a crowded shopping and business district. I put the “Privacy Please—Do Not Disturb” sign
 on the door handle to keep housekeeping out. For ten days, I didn’t leave the room for fear o
f giving a foreign spy the chance to sneak in and bug the place. With the stakes so high, the o
nly move I had was to wait. I converted the room into a poor man’s operations center, the invi
sible heart of the network of encrypted Internet tunnels from which I’d send increasingly shri
ll pleas to the absent emissaries of our free press. Then I’d stand at the window hoping for a
 reply, looking out onto the beautiful park I’d never visit. By the time Laura and Glenn final
ly arrived, I’d eaten every item on the room service menu.
That isn’t to say that I just sat around during that week and a half writing wheedling message
s. I also tried to organize the last briefing I’d ever give—going through the archive, figuri
ng out how best to explain its contents to the journalists in the surely limited time we’d hav
e together. It was an interesting problem: how to most cogently express to nontechnical people 
who were almost certainly inclined to be skeptical of me the fact that the US government was su
rveilling the world and the methods by which it was doing so. I put together dictionaries of te
rms of art like “metadata” and “communications bearer.” I put together glossaries of acrony
ms and abbreviations: CCE, CSS, DNI, NOFORN. I made the decision to explain not through technol
ogies, or systems, but through surveillance programs—in essence, through stories—in an attemp
t to speak their language. But I couldn’t decide which stories to give them first, and I kept 
shuffling them around, trying to put the worst crimes in the best order.
I had to find a way to help at least Laura and Glenn understand something in the span of a few 
days that it had taken me years to puzzle out. Then there was another thing: I had to help them
 understand who I was and why I’d decided to do this.
* * *
AT LONG LAST, Glenn and Laura showed up in Hong Kong on June 2. When they came to meet me at th
e Mira, I think I disappointed them, at least initially. They even told me as much, or Glenn di
d: He’d been expecting someone older, some chain-smoking, tipsy depressive with terminal cance
r and a guilty conscience. He didn’t understand how a person as young as I was—he kept asking
 me my age—not only had access to such sensitive documents, but was also so willing to throw h
is life away. For my part, I didn’t know how they could have expected some graybeard, given my
 instructions to them about how to meet: Go to a certain quiet alcove by the hotel restaurant, 
furnished with an alligator-skin-looking pleather couch, and wait around for a guy holding a Ru
bik’s Cube. The funny thing was that I’d originally been wary of using that bit of tradecraft
, but the cube was the only thing I’d brought with me that was likely to be unique and identif
iable from a distance. It also helped me hide the stress of waiting for what I feared might be 
the surprise of handcuffs.
That stress would reach its visible peak just ten or so minutes later, when I’d brought Laura 
and Glenn up to my room—#1014, on the tenth floor. Glenn had barely had the chance to stow his
 smartphone in my minibar fridge at my request when Laura started rearranging and adjusting the
 lights in the room. Then she unpacked her digital video camera. Though we’d agreed, over encr
ypted email, that she could film our encounter, I wasn’t ready for the reality.
Nothing could have prepared me for the moment when she pointed her camera at me, sprawled out o
n my unmade bed in a cramped, messy room that I hadn’t left for the past ten days. I think eve
rybody has had this kind of experience: the more conscious you are of being recorded, the more 
self-conscious you become. Merely the awareness that there is, or might be, somebody pressing R
ecord on their smartphone and pointing it at you can cause awkwardness, even if that somebody i
s a friend. Though today nearly all of my interactions take place via camera, I’m still not su
re which experience I find more alienating: seeing myself on film or being filmed. I try to avo
id the former, but avoiding the latter is now difficult for everyone.
In a situation that was already high-intensity, I stiffened. The red light of Laura’s camera, 
like a sniper’s sight, kept reminding me that at any moment the door might be smashed in and I
’d be dragged off forever. And whenever I wasn’t having that thought, I kept thinking about h
ow this footage was going to look when it was played back in court. I realized there were so ma
ny things I should have done, like putting on nicer clothes and shaving. Room-service plates an
d trash had accumulated throughout the room. There were noodle containers and half-eaten burger
s, piles of dirty laundry and damp towels on the floor.
It was a surreal dynamic. Not only had I never met any filmmakers before being filmed by one, I
 had never met any journalists before serving as their source. The first time I ever spoke alou
d to anyone about the US government’s system of mass surveillance, I was speaking to everyone 
in the world with an Internet connection. In the end, though, regardless of how rumpled I looke
d and stilted I sounded, Laura’s filming was indispensable, because it showed the world exactl
y what happened in that hotel room in a way that newsprint never could. The footage she shot ov
er the course of our days together in Hong Kong can’t be distorted. Its existence is a tribute
 not just to her professionalism as a documentarian but to her foresight.
I spent the week between June 3 and June 9 cloistered in that room with Glenn and his colleague
 from the Guardian, Ewen MacAskill, who joined us a bit later that first day. We talked and tal
ked, going through the NSA’s programs, while Laura hovered and filmed. In contrast to the fren
etic days, the nights were empty and desolate. Glenn and Ewen would retreat to their own hotel,
 the nearby W, to write up their findings into articles. Laura would disappear to edit her foot
age and do her own reporting with Bart Gellman of the Washington Post, who never made it to Hon
g Kong but worked remotely with the documents he received from her.
I’d sleep, or try to—or else I’d put on the TV, find an English-language channel like the BB
C or CNN, and watch the international reaction. On June 5, the Guardian broke Glenn’s first st
ory, the FISA court order that authorized the NSA to collect information from the American tele
com Verizon about every phone call it handled. On June 6, it ran Glenn’s PRISM story, pretty m
uch simultaneously with a similar account in the Washington Post by Laura and Bart. I knew, and
 I think we all knew, that the more pieces came out the more likely it was that I’d be identif
ied, particularly because my office had begun emailing me asking for status updates and I wasn
’t answering. But though Glenn and Ewen and Laura were unfailingly sympathetic to my ticking t
ime-bomb situation, they never let their desire to serve the truth be tempered by that knowledg
e. And following their example, neither did I.
Journalism, like documentary film, can only reveal so much. It’s interesting to think about wh
at a medium is forced to omit, both by convention and technology. In Glenn’s prose, especially
 in the Guardian, you got a laser-focused statement of fact, stripped of the dogged passion tha
t defines his personality. Ewen’s prose more fully reflected his character: sincere, gracious,
 patient, and fair. Meanwhile, Laura, who saw all but was rarely seen, had an omniscient reserv
e and a sardonic wit—half master spy, half master artist.
As the revelations ran wall to wall on every TV channel and website, it became clear that the U
S government had thrown the whole of its machinery into identifying the source. It was also cle
ar that when they did, they would use the face they found—my face—to evade accountability: in
stead of addressing the revelations, they’d impugn the credibility and motives of “the leaker
.” Given the stakes, I had to seize the initiative before it was too late. If I didn’t explai
n my actions and intentions, the government would, in a way that would swing the focus away fro
m its misdeeds.
The only hope I had of fighting back was to come forward first and identify myself. I’d give t
he media just enough personal detail to satisfy their mounting curiosity, with a clear statemen
t that what mattered wasn’t me, but rather the subversion of American democracy. Then I’d van
ish just as quickly as I’d appeared. That, at least, was the plan.
Ewen and I decided that he’d write a story about my IC career and Laura suggested filming a vi
deo statement to appear alongside it in the Guardian. In it, I’d claim direct and sole respons
ibility as the source behind the reporting on global mass surveillance. But even though Laura h
ad been filming all week (a lot of that footage would make it into her feature documentary, Cit
izenfour), we just didn’t have the time for her to go through everything she’d shot in search
 of snippets of me speaking coherently and making eye contact. What she proposed, instead, was 
my first recorded statement, which she started filming right there and then—the one that begin
s, “Uh, my name is Ed Snowden. I’m, ah, twenty-nine years old.”
Hello, world.
* * *
WHILE I’VE NEVER once regretted tugging aside the curtain and revealing my identity, I do wish
 I had done it with better diction and a better plan in mind for what was next. In truth, I had
 no plan at all. I hadn’t given much thought to answering the question of what to do once the 
game was over, mainly because a winning conclusion was always so unlikely. All I’d cared about
 was getting the facts out into the world: I figured that by putting the documents into the pub
lic record, I was essentially putting myself at the public’s mercy. No exit strategy could be 
the only exit strategy, because any next step I might have premeditated taking would have run t
he risk of undermining the disclosures.
If I’d made preexisting arrangements to fly to a specific country and seek asylum, for example
, I would’ve been called a foreign agent of that country. Meanwhile, if I returned to my own c
ountry, the best I could hope for was to be arrested upon landing and charged under the Espiona
ge Act. That would’ve entitled me to a show trial deprived of any meaningful defense, a sham i
n which all discussion of the most important facts would be forbidden.
The major impediment to justice was a major flaw in the law, a purposeful flaw created by the g
overnment. Someone in my position would not even be allowed to argue in court that the disclosu
res I made to journalists were civically beneficial. Even now, years after the fact, I would no
t be allowed to argue that the reporting based on my disclosures had caused Congress to change 
certain laws regarding surveillance, or convinced the courts to strike down a certain mass surv
eillance program as illegal, or influenced the attorney general and the president of the United
 States to admit that the debate over mass surveillance was a crucial one for the public to hav
e, one that would ultimately strengthen the country. All these claims would be deemed not just 
irrelevant but inadmissible in the kind of proceedings that I would face were I to head home. T
he only thing my government would have to prove in court is that I disclosed classified informa
tion to journalists, a fact that is not in dispute. This is why anyone who says I have to come 
back to the States for trial is essentially saying I have to come back to the States for senten
cing, and the sentence would, now as then, surely be a cruel one. The penalty for disclosing to
p secret documents, whether to foreign spies or domestic journalists, is up to ten years per do
cument.
From the moment that Laura’s video of me was posted on the Guardian website on June 9, I was m
arked. There was a target on my back. I knew that the institutions I’d shamed would not relent
 until my head was bagged and my limbs were shackled. And until then—and perhaps even after th
en—they would harass my loved ones and disparage my character, prying into every aspect of my 
life and career, seeking information (or opportunities for disinformation) with which to smear 
me. I was familiar enough with how this process went, both from having read classified examples
 of it within the IC and from having studied the cases of other whistleblowers and leakers. I k
new the stories of heroes like Daniel Ellsberg and Anthony Russo, and more recent opponents of 
government secrecy like Thomas Tamm, an attorney with the Justice Department’s Office of Intel
ligence Policy and Review who served as a source for much of the warrantless wiretapping report
ing of the mid-2000s. There were also Drake, Binney, Wiebe, and Loomis, the digital-age success
ors to Perry Fellwock, who back in 1971 had revealed the existence of the then-unacknowledged N
SA in the press, which caused the Senate’s Church Committee (the forerunner of today’s Senate
 Select Committee on Intelligence) to try to ensure that the agency’s brief was limited to the
 gathering of foreign rather than domestic signals intelligence. And then there was US Army Pri
vate Chelsea Manning, who for the crime of exposing America’s war crimes was court-martialed a
nd sentenced to thirty-five years in prison, of which she served seven, her sentence commuted o
nly after an international outcry arose over the treatment she received during solitary confine
ment.
All of these people, whether they faced prison or not, encountered some sort of backlash, most 
often severe and derived from the very abuse that I’d just helped expose: surveillance. If eve
r they’d expressed anger in a private communication, they were “disgruntled.” If they’d eve
r visited a psychiatrist or a psychologist, or just checked out books on related subjects from 
a library, they were “mentally unsound.” If they’d been drunk even once, they were said to b
e alcoholics. If they’d had even one extramarital affair, they were said to be sexual deviants
. Not a few lost their homes and were bankrupted. It’s easier for an institution to tarnish a 
reputation than to substantively engage with principled dissent—for the IC, it’s just a matte
r of consulting the files, amplifying the available evidence, and, where no evidence exists, si
mply fabricating it.
As sure as I was of my government’s indignation, I was just as sure of the support of my famil
y, and of Lindsay, who I was certain would understand—perhaps not forgive, but understand—the
 context of my recent behavior. I took comfort from recalling their love: it helped me cope wit
h the fact that there was nothing left for me to do, no further plans in play. I could only ext
end the belief I had in my family and Lindsay into a perhaps idealistic belief in my fellow cit
izens, a hope that once they’d been made aware of the full scope of American mass surveillance
 they’d mobilize and call for justice. They’d be empowered to seek that justice for themselve
s, and, in the process, my own destiny would be decided. This was the ultimate leap of faith, i
n a way: I could hardly trust anyone, so I had to trust everyone.
* * *
WITHIN HOURS AFTER my Guardian video ran, one of Glenn’s regular readers in Hong Kong contacte
d him and offered to put me in touch with Robert Tibbo and Jonathan Man, two local attorneys wh
o then volunteered to take on my case. These were the men who helped get me out of the Mira whe
n the press finally located me and besieged the hotel. As a diversion, Glenn went out the front
 lobby door, where he was immediately thronged by the cameras and mics. Meanwhile, I was bundle
d out of one of the Mira’s myriad other exits, which connected via a skybridge to a mall.
I like Robert—to have been his client is to be his friend for life. He’s an idealist and a cr
usader, a tireless champion of lost causes. Even more impressive than his lawyering, however, w
as his creativity in finding safe houses. While journalists were scouring every five-star hotel
 in Hong Kong, he took me to one of the poorest neighborhoods of the city and introduced me to 
some of his other clients, a few of the nearly twelve thousand forgotten refugees in Hong Kong
—under Chinese pressure, the city has maintained a dismal 1 percent approval rate for permanen
t residency status. I wouldn’t usually name them, but since they have bravely identified thems
elves to the press, I will: Vanessa Mae Bondalian Rodel from the Philippines, and Ajith Pushpak
umara, Supun Thilina Kellapatha, and Nadeeka Dilrukshi Nonis, all from Sri Lanka.
These unfailingly kind and generous people came through with charitable grace. The solidarity t
hey showed me was not political. It was human, and I will be forever in their debt. They didn’
t care who I was, or what dangers they might face by helping me, only that there was a person i
n need. They knew all too well what it meant to be forced into a mad escape from mortal threat,
 having survived ordeals far in excess of anything I’d dealt with and hopefully ever will: tor
ture by the military, rape, and sexual abuse. They let an exhausted stranger into their homes—
and when they saw my face on TV, they didn’t falter. Instead, they smiled, and took the opport
unity to reassure me of their hospitality.
Though their resources were limited—Supun, Nadeeka, Vanessa, and two little girls lived in a c
rumbling, cramped apartment smaller than my room at the Mira—they shared everything they had w
ith me, and they shared it unstintingly, refusing my offers to reimburse them for the cost of t
aking me in so vociferously that I had to hide money in the room to get them to accept it. They
 fed me, they let me bathe, they let me sleep, and they protected me. I will never be able to e
xplain what it meant to be given so much by those with so little, to be accepted by them withou
t judgment as I perched in corners like a stray street cat, skimming the Wi-Fi of distant hotel
s with a special antenna that delighted the children.
Their welcome and friendship was a gift, for the world to even have such people is a gift, and 
so it pains me that, all these years later, the cases of Ajith, Supun, Nadeeka, and Nadeeka’s 
daughter are still pending. The admiration I feel for these folks is matched only by the resent
ment I feel toward the bureaucrats in Hong Kong, who continue to deny them the basic dignity of
 asylum. If folks as fundamentally decent and selfless as these aren’t deemed worthy of the pr
otection of the state, it’s because the state itself is unworthy. What gives me hope, however,
 is that just as this book was going to press, Vanessa and her daughter received asylum in Cana
da. I look forward to the day when I can visit all of my old Hong Kong friends in their new hom
es, wherever those may be, and we can make happier memories together in freedom.
On June 14, the US government charged me under the Espionage Act in a sealed complaint, and on 
June 21 they formally requested my extradition. I knew it was time to go. It was also my thirti
eth birthday.
Just as the US State Department sent its request, my lawyers received a reply to my appeal for 
assistance from the UN High Commissioner on Refugees: there was nothing that could be done for 
me. The Hong Kong government, under Chinese pressure or not, resisted any UN effort at affordin
g me international protection on its territory, and furthermore asserted that it would first ha
ve to consider the claims of my country of citizenship. In other words, Hong Kong was telling m
e to go home and deal with the UN from prison. I wasn’t just on my own—I was unwelcome. If I 
was going to leave freely, I had to leave now. I wiped my four laptops completely clean and des
troyed the cryptographic key, which meant that I could no longer access any of the documents ev
en if compelled. Then I packed the few clothes I had and headed out. There was no safety to be 
found in the “fragrant harbor.”
27
Moscow
For a coastal country at the northwestern edge of South America, half a globe away from Hong Ko
ng, Ecuador is in the middle of everything: not for nothing does its name translate to “The Re
public of the Equator.” Most of my fellow North Americans would correctly say that it’s a sma
ll country, and some might even know enough to call it historically oppressed. But they are ign
orant if they think it’s a backwater. When Rafael Correa became president in 2007, as part of 
a tide of so-called democratic socialist leaders who swept elections in the late 1990s and earl
y 2000s in Bolivia, Argentina, Brazil, Paraguay, and Venezuela, he initiated a spate of policie
s intended to oppose and reverse the effects of US imperialism in the region. One of these meas
ures, reflecting President Correa’s previous career as an economist, was an announcement that 
Ecuador would consider its national debt illegitimate—technically, it would be classified as 
“odious debt,” which is national debt incurred by a despotic regime or through despotic imper
ialist trade policies. Repayment of odious debt is not enforceable. With this announcement, Cor
rea freed his people from decades of economic serfdom, though he made not a few enemies among t
he class of financiers who direct much of US foreign policy.
Ecuador, at least in 2013, had a hard-earned belief in the institution of political asylum. Mos
t famously, the Ecuadorean embassy in London had become, under Correa, the safe haven and redou
bt of WikiLeaks’ Julian Assange. I had no desire to live in an embassy, perhaps because I’d a
lready worked in one. Still, my Hong Kong lawyers agreed that, given the circumstances, Ecuador
 seemed to be the most likely country to defend my right to political asylum and the least like
ly to be cowed by the ire of the hegemon that ruled its hemisphere. My growing but ad hoc team 
of lawyers, journalists, technologists, and activists concurred. My hope was to make it to Ecua
dor proper.
With my government having decided to charge me under the Espionage Act, I stood accused of a po
litical crime, meaning a crime whose victim is the state itself rather than a person. Under int
ernational humanitarian law, those accused in this way are generally exempt from extradition, b
ecause the charge of political criminality is more often than not an authoritarian attempt at q
uashing legitimate dissent. In theory, this means that government whistleblowers should be prot
ected against extradition almost everywhere. In practice, of course, this is rarely the case, e
specially when the government that perceives itself wronged is America’s—which claims to fost
er democracy abroad yet secretly maintains fleets of privately contracted aircraft dedicated to
 that form of unlawful extradition known as rendition, or, as everyone else calls it, kidnappin
g.
The team supporting me had reached out to officials everywhere from Iceland to India, asking if
 they would respect the prohibition against extradition of those accused of political crimes an
d commit to noninterference in my potential travel. It soon became evident that even the most a
dvanced democracies were afraid of incurring the wrath of the US government. They were happy to
 privately express their sympathies, but reluctant to offer even unofficial guarantees. The com
mon denominator of the advice that filtered back to me was to land only in non-extradition coun
tries, and avoid any route that crossed the airspace of any countries with a record of cooperat
ion with or deference to the US military. One official, I think from France, suggested that the
 odds of my successful transit might be significantly increased if I were issued a laissez-pass
er, a UN-recognized one-way travel document typically issued to grant safe passage to refugees 
crossing borders—but obtaining one of those was easier said than done.
Enter Sarah Harrison, a journalist and an editor for WikiLeaks. The moment the news broke that 
an American had unmasked a global system of mass surveillance, she had immediately flown to Hon
g Kong. Through her experience with the website and particularly with the fate of Assange, she 
was poised to offer me the world’s best asylum advice. It didn’t hurt that she also had famil
y connections with the legal community in Hong Kong.
People have long ascribed selfish motives to Assange’s desire to give me aid, but I believe he
 was genuinely invested in one thing above all—helping me evade capture. That doing so involve
d tweaking the US government was just a bonus for him, an ancillary benefit, not the goal. It’
s true that Assange can be self-interested and vain, moody, and even bullying—after a sharp di
sagreement just a month after our first, text-based conversation, I never communicated with him
 again—but he also sincerely conceives of himself as a fighter in a historic battle for the pu
blic’s right to know, a battle he will do anything to win. It’s for this reason that I regard
 it as too reductive to interpret his assistance as merely an instance of scheming or self-prom
otion. More important to him, I believe, was the opportunity to establish a counterexample to t
he case of the organization’s most famous source, US Army Private Chelsea Manning, whose thirt
y-five-year prison sentence was historically unprecedented and a monstrous deterrent to whistle
blowers everywhere. Though I never was, and never would be, a source for Assange, my situation 
gave him a chance to right a wrong. There was nothing he could have done to save Manning, but h
e seemed, through Sarah, determined to do everything he could to save me.
That said, I was initially wary of Sarah’s involvement. But Laura told me that she was serious
, competent, and, most important, independent: one of the few at WikiLeaks who dared to openly 
disagree with Assange. Despite my caution, I was in a difficult position, and as Hemingway once
 wrote, the way to make people trustworthy is to trust them.
Laura informed me of Sarah’s presence in Hong Kong only a day or so before she communicated wi
th me on an encrypted channel, which itself was only a day or two before I actually met her in 
person—and if I’m somewhat loose on my dates here, you’ll have to forgive me: one frenetic d
ay bled into the next. Sarah had been a whirlwind, apparently, since the moment of her landing 
in Hong Kong. Though she wasn’t a lawyer, she had deep expertise when it came to what I’ll ca
ll the interpersonal or subofficial nuances of avoiding extradition. She met with local Hong Ko
ng human rights attorneys to seek independent opinions, and I was deeply impressed by both her 
pace and her circumspection. Her connections through WikiLeaks and the extraordinary courage of
 the Ecuadorean consul in London, Fidel Narváez, together produced a laissez-passer in my name
. This laissez-passer, which was meant to get me to Ecuador, had been issued by the consul on a
n emergency basis, since we didn’t have time for his home government to formally approve it. T
he moment it was in hand, Sarah hired a van to take us to the airport.
That’s how I met her—in motion. I’d like to say that I started off our acquaintance by offer
ing my thanks, but instead the first thing I said was: “When was the last time you slept?” Sa
rah looked just as ragged and disheveled as I did. She stared out the window, as if trying to r
ecall the answer, but then just shook her head: “I don’t know.”
We were both developing colds and our careful conversation was punctuated by sneezes and coughs
. By her own account, she was motivated to support me out of loyalty to her conscience more tha
n to the ideological demands of her employer. Certainly her politics seemed shaped less by Assa
nge’s feral opposition to central power than by her own conviction that too much of what passe
d for contemporary journalism served government interests rather than challenged them. As we hu
rtled to the airport, as we checked in, as we cleared passport control for the first of what sh
ould have been three flights, I kept waiting for her to ask me for something—anything, even ju
st for me to make a statement on Assange’s, or the organization’s, behalf. But she never did,
 although she did cheerfully share her opinion that I was a fool for trusting media conglomerat
es to fairly guard the gate between the public and the truth. For that instance of straight tal
k, and for many others, I’ll always admire Sarah’s honesty.
We were traveling to Quito, Ecuador, via Moscow via Havana via Caracas for a simple reason: it 
was the only safe route available. There were no direct flights to Quito from Hong Kong, and al
l of the other connecting flights traveled through US airspace. While I was concerned about the
 massive layover in Russia—we’d have almost twenty hours before the Havana flight departed—m
y primary fear was actually the next leg of the journey, because traveling from Russia to Cuba 
meant passing through NATO airspace. I didn’t particularly relish flying over a country like P
oland, which during my lifetime has done everything to please the US government, including host
ing CIA black sites where my former IC colleagues subjected prisoners to “enhanced interrogati
ons,” another Bush-era euphemism for “torture.”
I wore my hat down over my eyes to avoid being recognized, and Sarah did the seeing for me. She
 took my arm and led me to the gate, where we waited until boarding. This was the last moment f
or her to back out, and I told her so. “You don’t have to do this,” I said.
“Do what?”
“Protect me like this.”
Sarah stiffened. “Let’s get one thing clear,” she said as we boarded, “I’m not protecting 
you. No one can protect you. What I’m here for is to make it harder for anyone to interfere. T
o make sure everyone’s on their best behavior.”
“So you’re my witness,” I said.
She gave a slight wry smile. “Someone has to be the last person to ever see you alive. It migh
t as well be me.”
Though the three points where I’d thought we were most likely to get stopped were now behind u
s (check-in, passport control, and the gate), I didn’t feel safe on the plane. I didn’t want 
to get complacent. I took the window seat and Sarah sat next to me, to screen me from the other
 passengers across the row. After what felt like an eternity, the cabin doors were shut, the sk
ybridge pulled away, and finally, we were moving. But just before the plane rolled from the tar
mac onto the runway, it halted sharply. I was nervous. Pressing the brim of my hat up against t
he glass, I strained to catch the sound of sirens or the flashing of blue lights. It felt like 
I was playing the waiting game all over again—it was a wait that wouldn’t end. Until, suddenl
y, the plane rolled into motion again and took a turn, and I realized that we were just far bac
k in the line for takeoff.
My spirits rose with the wheels, but it was hard to believe I was out of the fire. Once we were
 airborne, I loosened my grip from my thighs and felt an urge to take my lucky Rubik’s Cube ou
t of my bag. But I knew I couldn’t, because nothing would make me more conspicuous. Instead, I
 sat back, pulled my hat down again, and kept my half-open eyes on the map on the seatback scre
en just in front of me, tracking the pixelated route across China, Mongolia, and Russia—none o
f which would be especially amenable to doing any favors for the US State Department. However, 
there was no predicting what the Russian government would do once we landed, beyond hauling us 
into an inspection so they could search through my blank laptops and empty bag. What I hoped mi
ght spare us any more invasive treatment was that the world was watching and my lawyers and Wik
iLeaks’ lawyers were aware of our itinerary.
It was only once we’d entered Chinese airspace that I realized I wouldn’t be able to get any 
rest until I asked Sarah this question explicitly: “Why are you helping me?”
She flattened out her voice, as if trying to tamp down her passions, and told me that she wante
d me to have a better outcome. She never said better than what outcome or whose, and I could on
ly take that answer as a sign of her discretion and respect.
I was reassured, enough at least to finally get some sleep.
* * *
WE LANDED AT Sheremetyevo on June 23 for what we assumed would be a twenty-hour layover. It has
 now dragged on for over six years. Exile is an endless layover.
In the IC, and in the CIA in particular, you get a lot of training on how not to get into troub
le at customs. You have to think about how you dress, how you act. You have to think about the 
things in your bag and the things in your pockets and the tales they tell about you. Your goal 
is to be the most boring person in line, with the most perfectly forgettable face. But none of 
that really matters when the name on your passport is all over the news.
I handed my little blue book to the bearish guy in the passport control booth, who scanned it a
nd rifled through its pages. Sarah stood stalwart behind me. I’d made sure to take note of the
 time it took for the people ahead of us in line to clear the booth, and our turn was taking to
o long. Then the guy picked up his phone, grumbled some words in Russian, and almost immediatel
y—far too quickly—two security officers in suits approached. They must have been waiting. The
 officer in front took my little blue book from the guy in the booth and leaned in close to me.
 “There is problem with passport,” he said. “Please, come with.”
Sarah immediately stepped to my side and unleashed a fast flurry of English: “I’m his legal a
dviser. Wherever he goes, I go. I’m coming with you. According to the—”
But before she could cite the relevant UN covenants and Genevan codicils, the officer held up h
is hand and glanced at the line. He said, “Okay, sure, okay. You come.”
I don’t know whether the officer had even understood what she said. He just clearly didn’t wa
nt to make a scene.
The two security officers marched us briskly toward what I assumed was going to be a special ro
om for secondary inspection, but instead turned out to be one of Sheremetyevo’s plush business
 lounges—like a business-class or first-class area, with just a few passengers basking oblivio
usly in their luxury seats. Sarah and I were directed past them and down a hall into a conferen
ce room of sorts, filled with men in gray sitting around a table. There were a half-dozen of th
em or so, with military haircuts. One guy sat separately, holding a pen. He was a notetaker, a 
kind of secretary, I guessed. He had a folder in front of him containing a pad of paper. On the
 cover of the folder was a monocolor insignia that I didn’t need Russian in order to understan
d: it was a sword and shield, the symbol of Russia’s foremost intelligence service, the Federa
l Security Service (FSB). Like the FBI in the United States, the FSB exists not only to spy and
 investigate but also to make arrests.
At the center of the table sat an older man in a finer suit than the others, the white of his h
air shining like a halo of authority. He gestured for Sarah and me to sit opposite him, with an
 authoritative sweep of the hand and a smile that marked him as a seasoned case officer, or wha
tever the term is for a CO’s Russian equivalent. Intelligence services the world over are full
 of such figures—dedicated actors who will try on different emotions until they get the respon
se they want.
He cleared his throat and gave me, in decent English, what the CIA calls a cold pitch, which is
 basically an offer by a foreign intelligence service that can be summarized as “come and work
 for us.” In return for cooperation, the foreigners dangle favors, which can be anything from 
stacks of cash to a get-out-of-jail-free card for pretty much anything from fraud to murder. Th
e catch, of course, is that the foreigners always expect something of equal or better value in 
exchange. That clear and unambiguous transaction, however, is never how it starts. Come to thin
k of it, it’s funny that it’s called a cold pitch, because the person making it always starts
 warm, with grins, levity, and words of sympathy.
I knew I had to cut him off. If you don’t cut off a foreign intelligence officer right away, i
t might not matter whether you ultimately reject their offer, because they can destroy your rep
utation simply by leaking a recording of you considering it. So as the man apologized for incon
veniencing us, I imagined the hidden devices recording us, and tried to choose my words careful
ly.
“Listen, I understand who you are, and what this is,” I said. “Please let me be clear that I
 have no intention to cooperate with you. I’m not going to cooperate with any intelligence ser
vice. I mean no disrespect, but this isn’t going to be that kind of meeting. If you want to se
arch my bag, it’s right here,” and I pointed to it under my chair. “But I promise you, there
’s nothing in it that can help you.”
As I was speaking, the man’s face changed. He started to act wounded. “No, we would never do 
that,” he said. “Please believe me, we only want to help you.”
Sarah cleared her throat and jumped in. “That’s quite kind of you, but I hope you can underst
and that all we’d like is to make our connecting flight.”
For the briefest instant, the man’s feigned sorrow became irritation. “You are his lawyer?”
“I’m his legal adviser,” Sarah answered.
The man asked me, “So you are not coming to Russia to be in Russia?”
“No.”
“And so may I ask where you are trying to go? What is your final destination?”
I said, “Quito, Ecuador, via Caracas, via Havana,” even though I knew that he already knew th
e answer. He certainly had a copy of our itinerary, since Sarah and I had traveled from Hong Ko
ng on Aeroflot, the Russian flagship airline.
Up until this point, he and I had been reading from the same intelligence script, but now the c
onversation swerved. “You haven’t heard?” he said. He stood and looked at me like he was del
ivering the news of a death in the family. “I am afraid to inform you that your passport is in
valid.”
I was so surprised, I just stuttered. “I’m sorry, but I—I don’t believe that.”
The man leaned over the table and said, “No, it is true. Believe me. It is the decision of you
r minister, John Kerry. Your passport has been canceled by your government, and the air service
s have been instructed not to allow you to travel.”
I was sure it was a trick, but I wasn’t quite sure to what purpose. “Give us a minute,” I sa
id, but even before I could ask, Sarah had snatched her laptop out of her bag and was getting o
nto the airport Wi-Fi.
“Of course, you will check,” the man said, and he turned to his colleagues and chatted amiabl
y to them in Russian, as if he had all the time in the world.
It was reported on every site Sarah looked at. After the news had broken that I’d left Hong Ko
ng, the US State Department announced that it had canceled my passport. It had revoked my trave
l document while I was still in midair.
I was incredulous: my own government had trapped me in Russia. The State Department’s move mig
ht merely have been the result of bureaucratic proceduralism—when you’re trying to catch a fu
gitive, putting out an Interpol alert and canceling their passport is just standard operating p
rocedure. But in the final accounting it was self-defeating, as it handed Russia a massive prop
aganda victory.
“It’s true,” said Sarah, with a shake of her head.
“So what will you do?” the man asked, and he walked around to our side of the table.
Before I could take the Ecuadorean safe conduct pass out of my pocket, Sarah said, “I’m so so
rry, but I’m going to have to advise Mr. Snowden not to answer any more questions.”
The man pointed at me, and said, “You will come.”
He gestured me to follow him to the far end of the conference room, where there was a window. I
 went and stood next to him and looked. About three or four floors below was street level and t
he largest media scrum I’ve ever seen, scads of reporters wielding cameras and mics.
It was an impressive show, perhaps choreographed by the FSB, perhaps not, most likely half and 
half. Almost everything in Russia is half and half. But at least now I knew why Sarah and I had
 been brought to this conference room in this lounge.
I went back to my chair but didn’t sit down again.
The man turned from the window to face me and said, “Life for a person in your situation can b
e very difficult without friends who can help.” He let the words linger.
Here it comes, I thought—the direct solicitation.
He said, “If there is some information, perhaps, some small thing you could share with us?”
“We’ll be okay on our own,” I said. Sarah stood up next to me.
The man sighed. He turned to mumble in Russian, and his comrades rose and filed out. “I hope y
ou will not regret your decision,” he said to me. Then he gave a slight bow and made his own e
xit, just as a pair of officials from the airport administration entered.
I demanded to be allowed to go to the gate for the flight to Havana, but they ignored me. I fin
ally reached into my pocket and brandished the Ecuadorean safe conduct pass, but they ignored t
hat, too.
All told, we were trapped in the airport for a biblical forty days and forty nights. Over the c
ourse of those days, I applied to a total of twenty-seven countries for political asylum. Not a
 single one of them was willing to stand up to American pressure, with some countries refusing 
outright, and others declaring that they were unable to even consider my request until I arrive
d in their territory—a feat that was impossible. Ultimately, the only head of state that prove
d sympathetic to my cause was Burger King, who never denied me a Whopper (hold the tomato and o
nion).
Soon, my presence in the airport became a global spectacle. Eventually the Russians found it a 
nuisance. On July 1, the president of Bolivia, Evo Morales, left another airport in Moscow, Vnu
kovo, in his Bolivian state plane after attending the annual GECF, or Gas Exporting Countries F
orum. The US government, suspecting that I was onboard due to President Morales’s expressions 
of solidarity, pressured the governments of Italy, France, Spain, and Portugal to deny the plan
e access to their airspace, and succeeded in diverting it to Vienna, Austria. There it was grou
nded, searched, and only allowed to continue on its journey once no traces of me were found. Th
is was a startling violation of sovereignty, which occasioned UN censure. The incident was an a
ffront to Russia, which couldn’t guarantee a visiting head of state safe passage home. And it 
confirmed to Russia and to me that any flight that America suspected me of stowing away on ran 
the same risk of being diverted and grounded.
The Russian government must have decided that it would be better off without me and the media s
warm clogging up the country’s major airport. On August 1 it granted me temporary asylum. Sara
h and I were allowed to leave Sheremetyevo, but eventually only one of us would be heading home
. Our time together served to bind us as friends for life. I will always be grateful for the we
eks she spent by my side, for her integrity and her fortitude.
28
From the Diaries of Lindsay Mills
As far away from home as I was, my thoughts were consumed with Lindsay. I’ve been wary of tell
ing her story—the story of what happened to her once I was gone: the FBI interrogations, the s
urveillance, the press attention, the online harassment, the confusion and pain, the anger and 
sadness. Finally, I realized that only Lindsay herself should be the person to recount that per
iod. No one else has the experience, but more than that: no one else has the right. Luckily, Li
ndsay has kept a diary since adolescence, using it to record her life and draft her art. She ha
s graciously agreed to let me include a few pages here. In the entries that follow, all names h
ave been changed (except those of family), some typos fixed, and a few redactions made. Otherwi
se, this is how it was, from the moment that I left Hawaii.
5.22.2013
Stopped in at K-Mart to get a lei. Trying to welcome Wendy with proper aloha spirit, but I’m p
issed. Ed’s been planning his mother’s visit for weeks. He’s the one who invited her. I was 
hoping he’d be there when I woke up this morning. On the drive back to Waipahu from the airpor
t Wendy was worried. She’s not used to him having to go away on a moment’s notice. I tried to
 tell her this was usual. But it was usual when we lived overseas, not in Hawaii, and I can’t 
remember any other time that Ed was away and wasn’t in touch. We went to a nice dinner to dist
ract ourselves and Wendy talked about how she thought Ed was on medical leave. It didn’t make 
any sense to her that he’d be called away for work while on medical leave. The moment we got h
ome Wendy went to bed. I checked my phone and found I had three missed calls from an unknown nu
mber, and one missed call from a long foreign number, no voicemails. I Googled the long foreign
 number. Ed must be in Hong Kong.
5.24.2013
Wendy was home all day alone, thoughts just running circles in her brain. I feel bad for her an
d can only console myself by thinking how Ed would handle having to entertain my own mother by 
himself. Over dinner, Wendy kept asking me about Ed’s health, which I guess is understandable,
 given her own history of epilepsy. She said she’s worried that he had another seizure, and th
en she started crying, and then I started crying. I’m just realizing that I’m worried too. Bu
t instead of epilepsy, I’m thinking, What if he’s off having an affair? Who is she? Just try 
and get through this visit and have a good time. Take a puddle jumper to the Big Island. To Kil
auea, the volcano, as planned. Once Wendy goes back, reassess things.
6.3.2013
Brought Wendy to the airport, to fly back to MD. She didn’t want to go back, but she has work.
 I took her as far as I could go and hugged her. I didn’t want to let go of the hug. Then she 
got in line for security. Came home to find Ed’s Skype status has changed to: “Sorry but it h
ad to be done.” I don’t know when he changed it. Could’ve been today, could’ve been last mo
nth. I just checked on Skype and happened to notice it, and I’m crazy enough to think he’s se
nding me a message.
6.7.2013
Woke up to a call from NSA Special Agent Megan Smith asking me to call her back about Ed. Still
 feeling sick with fever. I had to drop off my car at the autobody shop and Tod gave me a ride 
back on his Ducati. When we pulled onto the street I saw a white gov vehicle in the driveway an
d gov agents talking to our neighbors. I’ve never even met the neighbors. I don’t know why bu
t my first instinct was to tell Tod to keep driving. I ducked my head down to pretend to look f
or something in my purse. We went to Starbucks, where Tod pointed out a newspaper, something ab
out the NSA. I tried to read the headlines but my paranoia just ran wild. Is that why the white
 SUV was in my driveway? Is that the same SUV in the parking lot outside this Starbucks? Should
 I even be writing this stuff down? Went home again and the SUV was gone. Took some meds and re
alized I hadn’t eaten. In the middle of lunch, cops showed up at the kitchen window. Through t
he window, I could hear them radioing that someone was inside the residence. By someone they me
ant me. I opened the front door to two agents and an HPD1 officer. They were frightening. The H
PD officer searched through the house as Agent Smith asked me about Ed, who’d been due back at
 work on May 31. The HPD officer said it was suspicious when a workplace reported someone missi
ng before the person’s spouse or girlfriend did. He was looking at me like I killed Ed. He was
 looking around the house for his body. Agent Smith asked if she could see all the computers in
 the house and that made me angry. I told her she could get a warrant. They left the house but 
camped out on the corner.
San Diego, 6.8.2013
I got a little afraid that TSA wouldn’t let me leave the island. The TVs in the airport were a
ll full of news about the NSA. Once onboard the plane, I emailed Agent Smith and the HPD Missin
g Persons’ detective that my grandma was having open heart surgery, requiring me to be off-isl
and for a few weeks. The surgery isn’t scheduled until the end of the month and it’s in Flori
da, not San Diego, but this was the only excuse I could think of for getting to the mainland. I
t was a better excuse than saying, I just need to be with my best friend Sandra and also it’s 
her bday. When the wheels left the ground I fell into a momentary coma of relief. When I landed
, I had a raging fever. Sandra picked me up. I hadn’t told her anything because my paranoia wa
s off the charts, but she could tell that something was up, that I wasn’t just visiting her fo
r her bday. She asked me if Ed and I had broken up. I answered maybe.
6.9.2013
I got a phone call from Tiffany. She asked how I was doing and said she was worried about me. I
 didn’t understand. She got quiet. Then she asked if I’d seen the news. She told me Ed had ma
de a video and was on the homepage of the Huffington Post. Sandra hooked up her laptop to the f
latscreen. I calmly waited for the 12-minute YouTube video to load. And then there he was. Real
. Alive. I was shocked. He looked thin, but he sounded like his old self. The old Ed, confident
 and strong. Like how he was before this last tough year. This was the man I loved, not the col
d distant ghost I’d recently been living with. Sandra hugged me and I didn’t know what to say
. We stood in silence. We drove out to Sandra’s bday bbq, at her cousins’ house on this prett
y hill south of the city, right on the Mexican border. Gorgeous place and I could barely see an
y of it. I was shutting down. Not knowing how to even begin to parse the situation. We arrived 
to friendly faces that had no clue what I was going through on the inside. Ed, what have you do
ne? How can you come back from this? I was barely present for all the party small talk. My phon
e was blowing up with calls and texts. Dad. Mom. Wendy. Driving back up to San Diego from the b
bq I drove Sandra’s cousin’s Durango, which Sandra needs this week to move. As we drove, a bl
ack gov SUV followed us and a police car pulled Sandra’s car over, which was the car I’d come
 in. I just kept driving the Durango, hoping I knew where I was going because my phone was alre
ady dead from all the calls.
6.10.2013
I knew Eileen2 was important in local politics, but I didn’t know she was also a fucking gangs
ter. She’s been taking care of everything. While we were waiting for her contacts to recommend
 a lawyer, I got a call from the FBI. An agent named Chuck Landowski, who asked me what I was d
oing in San Diego. Eileen told me to hang up. The agent called back and I picked up, even thoug
h Eileen said I shouldn’t. Agent Chuck said he didn’t want to show up at the house unannounce
d, so he was just calling “out of courtesy” to tell us that agents were coming. This sent Eil
een into overdrive. She’s so goddamned tough, it’s amazing. She had me leave my phone at the 
house and we took her car and drove around to think. Eileen got a text from a friend of hers re
commending a lawyer, a guy named Jerry Farber, and she handed me her phone and had me call him.
 A secretary picked up and I told her that my name was Lindsay Mills and I was the girlfriend o
f Edward Snowden and needed representation. The secretary said, “Oh, let me put you right thro
ugh.” It was funny to hear the recognition in her voice.
Jerry picked up the phone and asked how he could help. I told him about the FBI calls and he as
ked for the agent’s name, so he could talk to the feds. While we waited to hear back from Jerr
y, Eileen suggested we go get burner phones, one to use with family and friends, one to use wit
h Jerry. After the phones, Eileen asked which bank I kept my money at. We drove to the nearest 
branch and she had me withdraw all of my money immediately in case the feds froze my accounts. 
I went and took out all my life savings, split between cashier’s checks and cash. Eileen insis
ted I split the money like that and I just followed her instructions. The bank manager asked me
 what I needed all that cash for and I said, “Life.” I really wanted to say STFU, but I decid
ed if I was polite I’d be forgettable. I was concerned that people were going to recognize me 
since they were showing my face alongside Ed’s on the news. When we got out of the bank I aske
d Eileen how she’d become such an expert at what to do when you’re in trouble. She told me, v
ery chill, “You get to know these things, as a woman. Like, you always take the money out of t
he bank, when you’re getting a divorce.” We got some Vietnamese takeout and took it back to E
ileen’s house and ate it on the floor in the upstairs hallway. Eileen and Sandra plugged in th
eir hairdryers and kept them blowing to make noise, as we whispered to each other, just in case
 they were listening in on us.
Lawyer Jerry called and said we had to meet with the FBI today. Eileen drove us to his office, 
and on the way she noticed we were being followed. It made no sense. We were going to a meeting
 to talk to the feds but also the feds were behind us, two SUVs and a Honda Accord without plat
es. Eileen got the idea that maybe they weren’t the FBI. She thought that maybe they were some
 other agency or even a foreign government, trying to kidnap me. She started driving fast and e
rratically, trying to lose them, but every traffic light was turning red just when we approache
d it. I told her that she was being crazy, she had to slow down. There was a plainclothes agent
 by the door of Jerry’s building, he had gov written all over his face. We went up in the elev
ator and when the door opened, three men were waiting: two of them were agents, one of them was
 Jerry. He was the only man who shook hands with me. Jerry told Eileen that she couldn’t come 
with us to the conference room. He’d call her when we were finished. Eileen insisted that she
’d wait. She sat in the lobby with an expression on her face like she was ready to wait for a 
million years. On the way to the conference room Jerry took me aside and said he’d negotiated 
“limited immunity,” which I said was pretty meaningless, and he didn’t disagree. He told me 
never to lie, and that when I didn’t know what to say, I should say IDK and let him talk. Agen
t Mike had a grin that was a bit too kind, while Agent Leland kept looking at me like I was an 
experiment and he was studying my reactions. Both of them creeped me out. They started with que
stions about me that were so basic, it was like they were just trying to show me that they alre
ady knew everything about me. Of course they did. That was Ed’s point. The gov always knows ev
erything. They had me talk about the last two months, twice, and then when I was finished with 
the “timeline,” Agent Mike asked me to start all over again from the beginning. I said, “The
 beginning of what?” He said, “Tell me how you met.”
6.11.2013
Coming out of the interrogation exhausted, late at night, with days of interrogations ahead of 
me. They wouldn’t tell me how many exactly. Eileen drove us to meet Sandra for dinner at some 
diner, and as we left Downtown we noticed we still had our tails. Eileen tried to lose them by 
speeding and making illegal U-turns again, and I begged her to stop. I thought her driving like
 that just made me look worse. It made me look suspicious. But Eileen is a stubborn mama bear. 
In the parking lot of the diner, Eileen banged on the windows of the surveillance vehicles and 
yelled that I was cooperating, so there was no reason for them to be following. It was a little
 embarrassing, like when your mother sticks up for you in school, but mostly I was just in awe.
 The nerve to go up to a vehicle with federal agents and tell them off. Sandra was at a table i
n the back and we ordered and talked about “media exposure.” I was all over the news.
Halfway through dinner, two men walked up to our table. One tall guy in a baseball hat, who had
 braces, and his partner who was dressed like a guy going clubbing. The tall guy identified him
self as Agent Chuck, the agent who’d called me before. He asked to speak with me about “the d
riving behavior” once we’d finished eating. The moment he said that we decided we were finish
ed. The agents were out in front of the diner. Agent Chuck showed his badge and told me that hi
s main goal was my protection. He said there could be threats against my life. He tapped his ja
cket and said if there was any danger he would take care of it, because he was on “the armed t
eam.” It was all such macho posturing or an attempt to get me to trust him, by putting me in a
 vulnerable position. He went on to say I was going to be surveilled/followed by the FBI 24/7, 
for the foreseeable future, and the reckless driving Eileen was doing would not be tolerated. H
e said agents are never supposed to talk to their assignments but he felt that, given the circu
mstances, he had to “take the team in this direction for everyone’s safety.” He handed me a 
business card with his contact info and said he’d be parked just outside Eileen’s house all n
ight, and I should call him if I needed him, or needed anything, for any reason. He told me I w
as free to go anywhere (you’re damn right, I thought), but that whenever I planned to go anywh
ere, I should text him. He said, “Open communication will make everything easier.” He said, 
“If you give us a heads-up, you’ll be that much safer, I promise.”
6.16.2013–6.18.2013
Haven’t written for days. I’m so angry that I have to take a deep breath and figure out who a
nd what exactly I’m angry at, because it all just blurs together. Fucking Feds! Exhausting int
errogations where they treat me like I’m guilty and follow me everywhere, but what’s worse is
 that they’ve broken my routine. Usually I’d tear off into the woods and shoot or write, but 
now I have a surveillance team audience wherever I go. It’s like by taking away my energy and 
time and desire to write, they took away the last little bit of privacy I had. I need to rememb
er everything that’s happened. First they had me bring in my laptop and copied the hard drive.
 They probably put a bunch of bugs on it, too. Then they had copies of all my emails and chats 
printed out, and they were reading me things I wrote to Ed and things Ed wrote to me and demand
ing I explain them. The FBI thinks that everything’s a code. And sure, in a vacuum anyone’s m
essages look strange. But this is just how people who’ve been together for eight years communi
cate! They act like they’ve never been in a relationship! They were asking questions to try to
 emotionally exhaust me so that when we returned to “the timeline,” my answers would change. 
They won’t accept I know nothing. But still, we keep returning to “the timeline,” now with t
ranscripts of all my emails and chats and my online calendar printed out in front of us.
I would expect that gov guys would understand that Ed was always secretive about his work and I
 had to accept this secrecy to be with him, but they don’t. They refuse to. After a while, I j
ust broke down in tears, so the session ended early. Agent Mike and Agent Leland offered to giv
e me a ride back to Eileen’s, and before I left, Jerry took me aside and said that the FBI see
med sympathetic. “They seem to have taken a liking to you, especially Mike.” He told me to be
 careful, though, about being too casual on the ride home. “Don’t answer any of their questio
ns.” The moment we drove away Mike chimed in with, “I’m sure Jerry said not to answer any qu
estions, but I only have a couple.” Once Mike got talking, he told me that the FBI office in S
an Diego had a bet. Apparently, the agents had a pool going to bet how long it would be before 
the media figured out my location. The winner would get a free martini. Later, Sandra said she 
had her doubts. “Knowing men,” she said, “the bet’s about something else.”
6.19.2013–6.20.2013
While the rest of the country is coming to grips with the fact that their privacy is being viol
ated, mine’s being stripped from me on a whole new level. Both things thanks to Ed. I hate sen
ding Chuck “departure updates,” and then I hate myself that I don’t have the nerve not to se
nd them. The worst was this one night sending a “departure update” that I’m leaving to meet 
Sandra and then getting lost on the way but not wanting to stop and ask the agents following me
 for help, so I was just leading them around in circles. I got to thinking maybe they’d bugged
 Eileen’s car, so I began talking aloud in the car, thinking maybe they could hear me. I wasn
’t talking, I was cursing them out. I had to pay Jerry, and after I did all I could think abou
t was all the tax money being wasted on just following me to my lawyer’s office and the gym. A
fter the first two days of meetings I’d already run out of the only decent clothes I had, so I
 went to Macy’s. Agents followed me around the women’s department. I wondered if they’d come
 into the fitting room, too, and tell me that looks good, that doesn’t, green’s not your colo
r. At the fitting room’s entrance was a TV blaring the news and I froze when the announcer sai
d “Edward Snowden’s girlfriend.” I fled the stall, and stood in front of the screen. Watchin
g as my photos flicked by. I whipped out my phone and made the mistake of Googling myself. So m
any comments labeling me a stripper or whore. None of this is me. Just like the feds, they had 
already decided who I was.
6.22.2013–6.24.2013
Interrogations over, for now. But a tail still following. I left the house, happy to get back i
n the air at this local aerial silks studio. Made it to the studio and couldn’t find street pa
rking, but my tail did. He had to leave his spot when I drove out of range, so I doubled back a
nd stole his spot. Had a phone call with Wendy, where we both said that however badly Ed hurt u
s, he did the right thing by trying to ensure that when he was gone, Wendy and I were together.
 That’s why he’d invited her and been so insistent about her coming. He’d wanted us to be to
gether in Hawaii when he went public, so that we could keep each other company and give each ot
her strength and comfort. It’s so hard to be angry at someone you love. And even harder to be 
angry at someone you love and respect for doing the right thing. Wendy and I were both in tears
 and then we both went quiet. I think we had the same thought, at the same time. How can we tal
k like normal people when they’re eavesdropping on all our calls?
6.25.2013
LAX to HNL. Wore the copper-colored wig to the airport, through security, and throughout the fl
ight. Sandra came with. We grabbed a gross preflight lunch in the food court. More TVs tuned to
 CNN, still showing Ed, and still surreal, which is the new real for everyone, I think. Got a t
ext from Agent Mike, telling me and Sandra to come see him at Gate 73. Really? He came up to LA
 from San Diego? Gate 73 was roped off and empty. Mike was sitting waiting for us on a row of c
hairs. He crossed his legs and showed us he was wearing an ankle pistol. More macho bullshit in
timidation. He had paperwork for me to sign in order for the FBI to release Ed’s car keys to m
e in Hawaii. He said two agents would be waiting for us in Honolulu with the key. Other agents 
would be with us on the flight. He apologized that he wasn’t coming personally. Ugh.
6.29.2013
Been packing the house for days now with only minor interruptions from the FBI, coming by with 
more forms to sign. It’s torture, going through everything. Finding all these little things th
at remind me of him. I’m like a crazy woman, cleaning up, and then just gazing at his side of 
the bed. More often, though, I find what’s missing. What the FBI took. Technology, yes, but al
so books. What they left behind were footprints, scuff marks on the walls, and dust.
6.30.2013
Waipahu yard sale. Three men responded to Sandra’s “take it all, best offer” Craigslisting. 
They showed up to rummage through Ed’s life, his piano, guitar, and weight set. Anything I cou
ldn’t bear to live with or afford to ship to the mainland. The men filled their pickup with as
 much as they could, and then came back for a second load. To my surprise, and I think to Sandr
a’s, too, I wasn’t too bothered by their scavenging. But the moment they were gone, the secon
d time, I lost it.
7.2.2013
Everything got shipped today, except the futons and couch, which I’m just ditching. All that w
as left of Ed’s stuff after the FBI raided the house fit into one small cardboard box. Some ph
otos and his clothes, lots of mismatched socks. Nothing that could be used as evidence in court
, just evidence of our life together. Sandra brought some lighter fluid and brought the metal t
rash can back around to the lanai. I dumped all of Ed’s stuff, the photos and clothes, inside,
 and lit a book of matches on fire and tossed it in. Sandra and I sat around while it burned an
d the smoke rose into the sky. The glow and the smoke reminded me of the trip I took with Wendy
 to Kilauea, the volcano on the Big Island. That was just over a month ago, but it feels like y
ears in the past. How could we have known that our own lives were about to erupt? That Volcano 
Ed was going to destroy everything? But I remember the guide at Kilauea saying that volcanoes a
re only destructive in the short term. In the long term, they move the world. They create islan
ds, cool the planet, and enrich the soil. Their lava flows uncontrolled and then cools and hard
ens. The ash they shoot into the air sprinkles down as minerals, which fertilize the earth and 
make new life grow.
29
Love and Exile
If at any point during your journey through this book you paused for a moment over a term you w
anted to clarify or investigate further and typed it into a search engine—and if that term hap
pened to be in some way suspicious, a term like XKEYSCORE, for example—then congrats: you’re 
in the system, a victim of your own curiosity.
But even if you didn’t search for anything online, it wouldn’t take much for an interested go
vernment to find out that you’ve been reading this book. At the very least, it wouldn’t take 
much to find out that you have it, whether you downloaded it illegally or bought a hard copy on
line or purchased it at a brick-and-mortar store with a credit card.
All you wanted to do was to read—to take part in that most intensely intimate human act, the j
oining of minds through language. But that was more than enough. Your natural desire to connect
 with the world was all the world needed to connect your living, breathing self to a series of 
globally unique identifiers, such as your email, your phone, and the IP address of your compute
r. By creating a world-spanning system that tracked these identifiers across every available ch
annel of electronic communications, the American Intelligence Community gave itself the power t
o record and store for perpetuity the data of your life.
And that was only the beginning. Because once America’s spy agencies had proven to themselves 
that it was possible to passively collect all of your communications, they started actively tam
pering with them, too. By poisoning the messages that were headed your way with snippets of att
ack code, or “exploits,” they developed the ability to gain possession of more than just your
 words. Now they were capable of winning total control of your whole device, including its came
ra and microphone. Which means that if you’re reading this now—this sentence—on any sort of 
modern machine, like a smartphone or tablet, they can follow along and read you. They can tell 
how quickly or slowly you turn the pages and whether you read the chapters consecutively or ski
p around. And they’ll gladly endure looking up your nostrils and watching you move your lips a
s you read, so long as it gets them the data they want and lets them positively identify you.
This is the result of two decades of unchecked innovation—the final product of a political and
 professional class that dreams itself your master. No matter the place, no matter the time, an
d no matter what you do, your life has now become an open book.
* * *
IF MASS SURVEILLANCE was, by definition, a constant presence in daily life, then I wanted the d
angers it posed, and the damage it had already done, to be a constant presence too. Through my 
disclosures to the press, I wanted to make this system known, its existence a fact that my coun
try, and the world, could not ignore.In the years since 2013, awareness has grown, both in scop
e and subtlety. But in this social media age, we have always to remind ourselves: awareness alo
ne is not enough.
In America, the initial press reports on the disclosures started a “national conversation,” a
s President Obama himself conceded. While I appreciated the sentiment, I remember wishing that 
he had noted that what made it “national,” what made it a “conversation,” was that for the 
first time the American public was informed enough to have a voice.
The revelations of 2013 particularly roused Congress, both houses of which launched multiple in
vestigations into NSA abuses. Those investigations concluded that the agency had repeatedly lie
d regarding the nature and efficacy of its mass surveillance programs, even to the most highly 
cleared Intelligence Committee legislators.
In 2015, a federal court of appeals ruled in the matter of ACLU v. Clapper, a suit challenging 
the legality of the NSA’s phone records collection program. The court ruled that the NSA’s pr
ogram had violated even the loose standards of the Patriot Act and, moreover, was most probably
 unconstitutional. The ruling focused on the NSA’s interpretation of Section 215 of the Patrio
t Act, which allowed the government to demand from third parties “any tangible thing” that it
 deemed “relevant” to foreign intelligence and terror investigations. In the court’s opinion
, the government’s definition of “relevant” was so expansive as to be virtually meaningless.
 To call some collected data “relevant” merely because it might become relevant at some amorp
hous point in the future was “unprecedented and unwarranted.” The court’s refusal to accept 
the government’s definition caused not a few legal scholars to interpret the ruling as casting
 doubt on the legitimacy of all government bulk-collection programs predicated on this doctrine
 of future relevance. In the wake of this opinion, Congress passed the USA Freedom Act, which a
mended Section 215 to explicitly prohibit the bulk collection of Americans’ phone records. Goi
ng forward, those records would remain where they originally had been, in the private control o
f the telecoms, and the government would have to formally request specific ones with a FISC war
rant in hand if it wanted to access them.
ACLU v. Clapper was a notable victory, to be sure. A crucial precedent was set. The court decla
red that the American public had standing: American citizens had the right to stand in a court 
of law and challenge the government’s officially secret system of mass surveillance. But as th
e numerous other cases that resulted from the disclosures continue to wend their slow and delib
erate ways through the courts, it becomes ever clearer to me that the American legal resistance
 to mass surveillance was just the beta phase of what has to be an international opposition mov
ement, fully implemented across both governments and private sector.
The reaction of technocapitalists to the disclosures was immediate and forceful, proving once a
gain that with extreme hazards come unlikely allies. The documents revealed an NSA so determine
d to pursue any and all information it perceived as being deliberately kept from it that it had
 undermined the basic encryption protocols of the Internet—making citizens’ financial and med
ical records, for example, more vulnerable, and in the process harming businesses that relied o
n their customers entrusting them with such sensitive data. In response, Apple adopted strong d
efault encryption for its iPhones and iPads, and Google followed suit for its Android products 
and Chromebooks. But perhaps the most important private-sector change occurred when businesses 
throughout the world set about switching their website platforms, replacing http (Hypertext Tra
nsfer Protocol) with the encrypted https (the S signifies security), which helps prevent third-
party interception of Web traffic. The year 2016 was a landmark in tech history, the first year
 since the invention of the Internet that more Web traffic was encrypted than unencrypted.
The Internet is certainly more secure now than it was in 2013, especially given the sudden glob
al recognition of the need for encrypted tools and apps. I’ve been involved with the design an
d creation of a few of these myself, through my work heading the Freedom of the Press Foundatio
n, a nonprofit organization dedicated to protecting and empowering public-interest journalism i
n the new millennium. A major part of the organization’s brief is to preserve and strengthen F
irst and Fourth Amendment rights through the development of encryption technologies. To that en
d, the FPF financially supports Signal, an encrypted texting and calling platform created by Op
en Whisper Systems, and develops SecureDrop (originally coded by the late Aaron Swartz), an ope
n-source submission system that allows media organizations to securely accept documents from an
onymous whistleblowers and other sources. Today, SecureDrop is available in ten languages and u
sed by more than seventy media organizations around the world, including the New York Times, th
e Washington Post, the Guardian, and the New Yorker.
In a perfect world, which is to say in a world that doesn’t exist, just laws would make these 
tools obsolete. But in the only world we have, they have never been more necessary. A change in
 the law is infinitely more difficult to achieve than a change in a technological standard, and
 as long as legal innovation lags behind technological innovation institutions will seek to abu
se that disparity in the furtherance of their interests. It falls to independent, open-source h
ardware and software developers to close that gap by providing the vital civil liberties protec
tions that the law may be unable, or unwilling, to guarantee.
In my current situation, I’m constantly reminded of the fact that the law is country-specific,
 whereas technology is not. Every nation has its own legal code but the same computer code. Tec
hnology crosses borders and carries almost every passport. As the years go by, it has become in
creasingly apparent to me that legislatively reforming the surveillance regime of the country o
f my birth won’t necessarily help a journalist or dissident in the country of my exile, but an
 encrypted smartphone might.
* * *
INTERNATIONALLY, THE DISCLOSURES helped to revive debates about surveillance in places with lon
g histories of abuses. The countries whose citizenries were most opposed to American mass surve
illance were those whose governments had most cooperated with it, from the Five Eyes nations (e
specially the UK, whose GCHQ remains the NSA’s primary partner) to nations of the European Uni
on. Germany, which has done much to reckon with its Nazi and Communist past, provides the prima
ry example of this disjunction. Its citizens and legislators were appalled to learn that the NS
A was surveilling German communications and had even targeted Chancellor Angela Merkel’s smart
phone. At the same time, the BND, Germany’s premier intelligence agency, had collaborated with
 the NSA in numerous operations, even carrying out certain proxy surveillance initiatives that 
the NSA was unable or unwilling to undertake on its own.
Nearly every country in the world found itself in a similar bind: its citizens outraged, its go
vernment complicit. Any elected government that relies on surveillance to maintain control of a
 citizenry that regards surveillance as anathema to democracy has effectively ceased to be a de
mocracy. Such cognitive dissonance on a geopolitical scale has helped to bring individual priva
cy concerns back into the international dialogue within the context of human rights.
For the first time since the end of World War II, liberal democratic governments throughout the
 world were discussing privacy as the natural, inborn right of every man, woman, and child. In 
doing so they were harking back to the 1948 UN Universal Declaration of Human Rights, whose Art
icle 12 states: “No one shall be subjected to arbitrary interference with his privacy, family,
 home or correspondence, nor to attacks upon his honor and reputation. Everyone has the right t
o the protection of the law against such interference or attacks.” Like all UN declarations, t
his aspirational document was never enforceable, but it had been intended to inculcate a new ba
sis for transnational civil liberties in a world that had just survived nuclear atrocities and 
attempted genocides and was facing an unprecedented surfeit of refugees and the stateless.
The EU, still under the sway of this postwar universalist idealism, now became the first transn
ational body to put these principles into practice, establishing a new directive that seeks to 
standardize whistleblower protections across its member states, along with a standardized legal
 framework for privacy protection. In 2016, the EU Parliament passed the General Data Protectio
n Regulation (GDPR), the most significant effort yet made to forestall the incursions of techno
logical hegemony—which the EU tends to regard, not unfairly, as an extension of American hegem
ony.
The GDPR treats the citizens of the European Union, whom it calls “natural persons,” as also 
being “data subjects”—that is, people who generate personally identifiable data. In the US, 
data is usually regarded as the property of whoever collects it. But the EU posits data as the 
property of the person it represents, which allows it to treat our data subjecthood as deservin
g of civil liberties protections.
The GDPR is undoubtedly a major legal advance, but even its transnationalism is too parochial: 
the Internet is global. Our natural personhood will never be legally synonymous with our data s
ubjecthood, not least because the former lives in one place at a time while the latter lives in
 many places simultaneously.
Today, no matter who you are, or where you are, bodily, physically, you are also elsewhere, abr
oad—multiple selves wandering along the signal paths, with no country to call your own, and ye
t beholden to the laws of every country through which you pass. The records of a life lived in 
Geneva dwell in the Beltway. The photos of a wedding in Tokyo are on a honeymoon in Sydney. The
 videos of a funeral in Varanasi are up on Apple’s iCloud, which is partially located in my ho
me state of North Carolina and partially scattered across the partner servers of Amazon, Google
, Microsoft, and Oracle, throughout the EU, UK, South Korea, Singapore, Taiwan, and China.
Our data wanders far and wide. Our data wanders endlessly.
We start generating this data before we are born, when technologies detect us in utero, and our
 data will continue to proliferate even after we die. Of course, our consciously created memori
es, the records that we choose to keep, comprise just a sliver of the information that has been
 wrung out of our lives—most of it unconsciously, or without our consent—by business and gove
rnment surveillance. We are the first people in the history of the planet for whom this is true
, the first people to be burdened with data immortality, the fact that our collected records mi
ght have an eternal existence. This is why we have a special duty. We must ensure that these re
cords of our pasts can’t be turned against us, or turned against our children.
Today, the liberty that we call privacy is being championed by a new generation. Not yet born o
n 9/11, they have spent their entire lives under the omnipresent specter of this surveillance. 
These young people who have known no other world have dedicated themselves to imagining one, an
d it’s their political creativity and technological ingenuity that give me hope.
Still, if we don’t act to reclaim our data now, our children might not be able to do so. Then 
they, and their children, will be trapped too—each successive generation forced to live under 
the data specter of the previous one, subject to a mass aggregation of information whose potent
ial for societal control and human manipulation exceeds not just the restraints of the law but 
the limits of the imagination.
Who among us can predict the future? Who would dare to? The answer to the first question is no 
one, really, and the answer to the second is everyone, especially every government and business
 on the planet. This is what that data of ours is used for. Algorithms analyze it for patterns 
of established behavior in order to extrapolate behaviors to come, a type of digital prophecy t
hat’s only slightly more accurate than analog methods like palm reading. Once you go digging i
nto the actual technical mechanisms by which predictability is calculated, you come to understa
nd that its science is, in fact, anti-scientific, and fatally misnamed: predictability is actua
lly manipulation. A website that tells you that because you liked this book you might also like
 books by James Clapper or Michael Hayden isn’t offering an educated guess as much as a mechan
ism of subtle coercion.
We can’t allow ourselves to be used in this way, to be used against the future. We can’t perm
it our data to be used to sell us the very things that must not be sold, such as journalism. If
 we do, the journalism we get will be merely the journalism we want, or the journalism that the
 powerful want us to have, not the honest collective conversation that’s necessary. We can’t 
let the godlike surveillance we’re under be used to “calculate” our citizenship scores, or t
o “predict” our criminal activity; to tell us what kind of education we can have, or what kin
d of job we can have, or whether we can have an education or a job at all; to discriminate agai
nst us based on our financial, legal, and medical histories, not to mention our ethnicity or ra
ce, which are constructs that data often assumes or imposes. And as for our most intimate data,
 our genetic information: if we allow it to be used to identify us, then it will be used to vic
timize us, even to modify us—to remake the very essence of our humanity in the image of the te
chnology that seeks its control.
Of course, all of the above has already happened.
* * *
EXILE: NOT A day has passed since August 1, 2013, in which I don’t recall that “exile” was w
hat my teenage self used to call getting booted off-line. The Wi-Fi died? Exile. I’m out of si
gnal range? Exile. The self who used to say that now seems so young to me. He seems so distant.
When people ask me what my life is like now, I tend to answer that it’s a lot like theirs in t
hat I spend a lot of time in front of the computer—reading, writing, interacting. From what th
e press likes to describe as an “undisclosed location”—which is really just whatever two-bed
room apartment in Moscow I happen to be renting—I beam myself onto stages around the world, sp
eaking about the protection of civil liberties in the digital age to audiences of students, sch
olars, lawmakers, and technologists.
Some days I take virtual meetings with my fellow board members at the Freedom of the Press Foun
dation, or talk with my European legal team, led by Wolfgang Kaleck, at the European Center for
 Constitutional and Human Rights. Other days, I just pick up some Burger King—I know where my 
loyalties lie—and play games I have to pirate because I can no longer use credit cards. One fi
xture of my existence is my daily check-in with my American lawyer, confidant, and all-around c
onsigliere Ben Wizner at the ACLU, who has been my guide to the world as it is and puts up with
 my musings about the world as it should be.
That’s my life. It got significantly brighter during the freezing winter of 2014, when Lindsay
 came to visit—the first time I’d seen her since Hawaii. I tried not to expect too much, beca
use I knew I didn’t deserve the chance; the only thing I deserved was a slap in the face. But 
when I opened the door, she placed her hand on my cheek and I told her I loved her.
“Hush,” she said, “I know.”
We held each other in silence, each breath like a pledge to make up for lost time.
From that moment, my world was hers. Previously, I’d been content to hang around indoors—inde
ed, that was my preference before I was in Russia—but Lindsay was insistent: she’d never been
 to Russia and now we were going to be tourists together.
My Russian lawyer, Anatoly Kucherena, who helped me get asylum in the country—he was the only 
lawyer who had the foresight to show up at the airport with a translator—is a cultured and res
ourceful man, and he proved as adept at obtaining last-minute tickets to the opera as he is at 
navigating my legal issues. He helped arrange two box seats at the Bolshoi Theater, so Lindsay 
and I got dressed and went, though I have to admit I was wary. There were so many people, all p
acked so tightly into a hall. Lindsay could sense my growing unease. As the lights dimmed and t
he curtain rose, she leaned over, nudged me in the ribs, and whispered, “None of these people 
are here for you. They’re here for this.”
Lindsay and I also spent time at some of Moscow’s museums. The Tretyakov Gallery contains one 
of the world’s richest collection of Russian Orthodox icon paintings. The artists who made the
se paintings for the Church were essentially contractors, I thought, and so were typically not 
allowed to sign their names to their handiwork, or preferred not to. The time and tradition tha
t fostered these works was not given much to recognizing individual achievement. As Lindsay and
 I stood in front of one of the icons, a young tourist, a teenage girl, suddenly stepped betwee
n us. This wasn’t the first time I was recognized in public, but given Lindsay’s presence, it
 certainly threatened to be the most headline-worthy. In German-accented English, the girl aske
d whether she could take a selfie with us. I’m not sure what explains my reaction—maybe it wa
s this German girl’s shy and polite way of asking, or maybe it was Lindsay’s always mood-impr
oving, live-and-let-live presence—but without hesitation, for once, I agreed. Lindsay smiled a
s the girl posed between us and took a photo. Then, after a few sweet words of support, she dep
arted.
I dragged Lindsay out of the museum a moment later. I was afraid that if the girl posted the ph
oto to social media we could be just minutes away from unwanted attention. I feel foolish now f
or thinking that. I kept nervously checking online, but the photo didn’t appear. Not that day,
 and not the day after. As far as I can tell, it was never shared—just kept as a private memor
y of a personal moment.
* * *
WHENEVER I GO outside, I try to change my appearance a bit. Maybe I get rid of my beard, maybe 
I wear different glasses. I never liked the cold until I realized that a hat and scarf provide 
the world’s most convenient and inconspicuous anonymity. I change the rhythm and pace of my wa
lk, and, contrary to the sage advice of my mother, I look away from traffic when crossing the s
treet, which is why I’ve never been caught on any of the car dashcams that are ubiquitous here
. Passing buildings equipped with CCTV I keep my head down, so that no one will see me as I’m 
usually seen online—head-on. I used to worry about the bus and metro, but nowadays everybody’
s too busy staring at their phones to give me a second glance. If I take a cab, I’ll have it p
ick me up at a bus or metro stop a few blocks away from where I live and drop me off at an addr
ess a few blocks away from where I’m going.
Today, I’m taking the long way around this vast strange city, trying to find some roses. Red r
oses, white roses, even blue violets. Any flowers I can find. I don’t know the Russian names o
f any of them. I just grunt and point.
Lindsay’s Russian is better than mine. She also laughs more easily and is more patient and gen
erous and kind.
Tonight, we’re celebrating our anniversary. Lindsay moved out here three years ago, and two ye
ars ago today, we married.
NOTES
1. Hawaii Police Department
2. Sandra’s mother
ACKNOWLEDGMENTS
In May 2013, as I sat in that hotel room in Hong Kong wondering whether any journalists would s
how up to meet me, I’d never felt more alone. Six years later, I find myself in quite the oppo
site situation, having been welcomed into an extraordinary and ever-expanding global tribe of j
ournalists, lawyers, technologists, and human rights advocates to whom I owe an incalculable de
bt. At the conclusion of a book, it’s traditional for an author to thank the people who helped
 make the book possible, and I certainly intend to do that here, but given the circumstances I
’d be remiss if I didn’t also thank the people who have helped make my life possible—by advo
cating for my freedom and, especially, by working ceaselessly and selflessly to protect our ope
n societies as well as the technologies that have brought us, and that bring everyone, together
.
Over the last nine months, Joshua Cohen has taken me to writing school, helping to transform my
 rambling reminiscences and capsule manifestos into a book that I hope he can be proud of.
Chris Parris-Lamb proved himself a shrewd and patient agent, while Sam Nicholson provided astut
e and clarifying edits and support, as did the entire team at Metropolitan, from Gillian Blake 
to Sara Bershtel, Riva Hocherman, and Grigory Tovbis.
The success of this team is a testament to its members’ talents, and to the talents of the man
 who assembled it—Ben Wizner, my lawyer, and, I am honored to say, my friend.
In the same vein, I’d like to thank my international team of lawyers who have worked tirelessl
y to keep me free. I would also like to thank Anthony Romero, the ACLU’s director, who embrace
d my cause at a time of considerable political risk for the organization, along with the other 
ACLU staff who have helped me throughout the years, including Bennett Stein, Nicola Morrow, Noa
 Yachot, and Daniel Kahn Gillmor.
Additionally, I’d like to acknowledge the work of Bob Walker, Jan Tavitian, and their team at 
the American Program Bureau, who have allowed me to make a living by spreading my message to ne
w audiences around the world.
Trevor Timm and my fellow board members at the Freedom of the Press Foundation have provided th
e space and resources for me to return to my true passion, engineering for social good. I am es
pecially grateful to our CTO Micah Lee, former FPF operations manager Emmanuel Morales, and cur
rent FPF board member Daniel Ellsberg, who has given the world the model of his rectitude, and 
given me the warmth and candor of his friendship.
This book was written using free and open-source software. I would like to thank the Qubes Proj
ect, the Tor Project, and the Free Software Foundation.
My earliest intimations of what it was like to write against deadline came from the masters, Gl
enn Greenwald, Laura Poitras, Ewen Macaskill, and Bart Gellman, whose professionalism is inform
ed by a passionate integrity. Having been edited now myself, I have gained a new appreciation o
f their editors, who refused to be intimidated and took the risks that gave meaning to their pr
inciples.
My deepest gratitude is reserved for Sarah Harrison.
And my heart belongs to my family, extended and immediate—to my father, Lon, to my mother, Wen
dy, and to my brilliant sister, Jessica.
The only way I can end this book is the way I began it: with a dedication to Lindsay, whose lov
e makes life out of exile.
ABOUT THE AUTHOR
Edward Snowden was born in Elizabeth City, North Carolina, and grew up in the shadow of Fort Me
ade. A systems engineer by training, he served as an officer of the Central Intelligence Agency
 and worked as a contractor for the National Security Agency. He has received numerous awards f
or his public service, including the Right Livelihood Award, the German Whistleblower Prize, th
e Ridenhour Prize for Truth-Telling, and the Carl von Ossietzky Medal from the International Le
ague of Human Rights. Currently, he serves as president of the board of directors of the Freedo
m of the Press Foundation.
CONTENTS
Title Page
Dedication
Preface
PART ONE
1. Looking Through the Window
2. The Invisible Wall
3. Beltway Boy
4. American Online
5. Hacking
6. Incomplete
7. 9/11
8. 9/12
9. X-Rays
10. Cleared and in Love
PART TWO
11. The System
12. Homo contractus
13. Indoc
14. The Count of the Hill
15. Geneva
16. Tokyo
17. Home on the Cloud
18. On the Couch
PART THREE
19. The Tunnel
20. Heartbeat
21. Whistleblowing
22. Fourth Estate
23. Read, Write, Execute
24. Encrypt
25. The Boy
26. Hong Kong
27. Moscow
28. From the Diaries of Lindsay Mills
29. Love and Exile
Notes
Acknowledgments
About the Author
Copyright
First published 2019 by Metropolitan Books, Henry Holt and Company, LLC
First published in the UK 2019 by Macmillan
This electronic edition first published in the UK 2019 by Macmillan
an imprint of Pan Macmillan 20 New Wharf Road, London N1 9RR
Associated companies throughout the world
www.panmacmillan.com
ISBN 978-1-5290-3567-4
Copyright © Edward Snowden 2019.
Jacket design by Rodrigo Corral
Jacket photograph © Platon
The right of Edward Snowden to be identified as the author of this work has been asserted by hi
m in accordance with the Copyright, Designs and Patents Act 1988.
You may not copy, store, distribute, transmit, reproduce or otherwise make available this publi
cation (or any part of it) in any form, or by any means (electronic, digital, optical, mechanic
al, photocopying, recording or otherwise), without the prior written permission of the publishe
r. Any person who does any unauthorized act in relation to this publication may be liable to cr
iminal prosecution and civil claims for damage.
A CIP catalogue record for this book is available from the British Library.
Visit www.panmacmillan.com to read more about all our books and to buy them. You will also find
 features, author interviews and news of any author events, and you can sign up for e-newslette
rs so that you’re always first to hear about our new releases.
